 and Conservapedia. MediaWiki is also used internally by a large number of companies, including Novell and Intel. 
MediaWiki provides a rich core feature set and a mechanism to attach extensions to provide additional functionality. 
Due to the strong emphasis on multilingualism in the Wikimedia projects, internationalization and localization has received significant attention by developers. The user interface has been fully or partially translated into more than 300 languages on translatewiki.net, and can be further customized by site administrators (the entire interface is editable through the wiki). 
Several extensions, most notably those collected in the MediaWiki Language Extension Bundle, are designed to further enhance the multilingualism and internationalization of MediaWiki. 
Installation of MediaWiki requires that the user have administrative privileges on a server running both PHP and a compatible type of SQL database. Some users find that setting up a virtual host is helpful if the majority of one's site runs under a framework (such as Zope or Ruby on Rails) that is largely incompatible with MediaWiki. Cloud hosting can eliminate the need to deploy a new server. 
MediaWiki uses an extensible lightweight wiki markup designed to be easier to use and learn than HTML. Tools exist for converting content such as tables between MediaWiki markup and HTML. Efforts have been made to create a MediaWiki markup spec, but a consensus seems to have been reached that Wikicode requires context-sensitive grammar rules. The following side-by-side comparison illustrates the differences between wiki markup and HTML: 
MediaWiki's default page-editing tools have been described as somewhat challenging to learn. A survey of students assigned to use a MediaWiki-based wiki found that when they were asked an open question about main problems with the wiki, 24% cited technical problems with formatting, e.g. "Couldn't figure out how to get an image in. Can't figure out how to show a link with words; it inserts a number." 
To make editing long pages easier, MediaWiki allows the editing of a subsection of a page (as identified by its header). A registered user can also indicate whether or not an edit is minor. Correcting spelling, grammar or punctuation are examples of minor edits, whereas adding paragraphs of new text is an example of a non-minor edit. 
Sometimes while one user is editing, a second user saves an edit to the same part of the page. Then, when the first user attempts to save the page, an edit conflict occurs. The second user is then given an opportunity to merge their content into the page as it now exists following the first user's page save. 
MediaWiki's user interface has been localized in many different languages. A language for the wiki content itself can also be set, to be sent in the "Content-Language" HTTP header and "lang" HTML attribute. 
MediaWiki supports rich content generated through specialized syntax. For example, the software comes with optional support for rendering mathematical formulas using LaTeX and a special parser written in OCaml. Similar functionality for other content, ranging from graphical timelines over mathematical plotting and musical scores to Egyptian hieroglyphs, is available via extensions. 
The software has become more powerful at dealing with a wide variety of uploaded media files. Its richest functionality is in the area of images, where image galleries and thumbnails can be generated with relative ease. There is also support for Exif metadata. The use of MediaWiki to operate the Wikimedia Commons, one of the largest free content media archives, has driven the need for further functionality in this area. 
For WYSIWYG editing, VisualEditor is available to use in MediaWiki which simplifying editing process for editors and has been bundled since MediaWiki 1.35. Other extensions exist for handling WYSIWYG editing to different degrees. 
Another important tool is watchlisting. Each logged-in user has a watchlist to which the user can add whatever pages he or she wishes. When an edit is made to one of those pages, a summary of that edit appears on the watchlist the next time it is refreshed. As with the recent changes page, recent edits that appear on the watchlist contain clickable links for easy review of the article history and specific changes made. 
There is also capability to review all edits made by any particular user. In this way, if an edit is identified as problematic, it is possible to check the user's other edits for issues. 
MediaWiki allows one to link to specific versions of articles. This has been useful to the scientific community, in that expert peer reviewers could analyse articles, improve them and provide links to the trusted version of that article. 
Interwiki links function much the same way as namespaces. A set of interwiki prefixes can be configured to cause, for instance, a page title of wikiquote:Jimbo Wales to direct the user to the Jimbo Wales article on Wikiquote. Unlike internal wikilinks, interwiki links lack page existence detection functionality, and accordingly there is no way to tell whether a blue interwiki link is broken or not. 
Interlanguage links are the small navigation links that show up in the sidebar in most MediaWiki skins which connect an article with related articles in other languages within the same Wiki family. This can provide language-specific communities connected by a larger context, with all wikis on the same server or each on its own server. 
Previously, Wikipedia used interlanguage links to link an article to other articles on the same topic in other editions of Wikipedia. This was superseded by the launch of Wikidata. 
Namespaces can be viewed as folders that separate different basic types of information or functionality. Custom namespaces can be added by the site administrators. There are 16 namespaces by default for content, with 2 "pseudo-namespaces" used for dynamically generated "Special:" pages and links to media files. Each namespace on MediaWiki is numbered: content page namespaces have even numbers and their associated talk page namespaces have odd numbers. 
Users can create new categories and add pages and files to those categories by appending one or more category tags to the content text. Adding these tags creates links at the bottom of the page that take the reader to the list of all pages in that category, making it easy to browse related articles. The use of categorization to organize content has been described as a combination of: 
In addition to namespaces, content can be ordered using subpages. This simple feature provides automatic breadcrumbs of the pattern [[Page title/Subpage title]] from the page after the slash (in this case, "Subpage title") to the page before the slash (in this case, "Page title"). 
If the feature is enabled, users can customize their stylesheets and configure client-side JavaScript to be executed with every pageview. On Wikipedia, this has led to a large number of additional tools and helpers developed through the wiki and shared among users. For instance, navigation popups is a custom JavaScript tool that shows previews of articles when the user hovers over links, and also provides shortcuts for common maintenance tasks. 
The "MediaWiki:" namespace was originally also used for creating custom text blocks that could then be dynamically loaded into other pages using a special syntax. This content was later moved into its own namespace, "Template:". 
The MediaWiki codebase contains various hooks using callback functions to add additional PHP code in an extensible way. This allows developers to write extensions without necessarily needing to modify the core or having to submit their code for review. Installing an extension typically consists of adding a line to the configuration file, though in some cases additional changes such as database updates or core patches are required. 
MediaWiki can be made more advanced and useful for various purposes through its extensions. These extensions vary greatly in complexity. 
The Wikimedia Foundation operates a Git server where many extensions host their repository. Most of them also have a documentation page on the MediaWiki website. 
MediaWiki code review was itself historically facilitated through a MediaWiki extension. As of March 2012, it has been done through Gerrit. 
A generic Widgets extension exists that allows MediaWiki to integrate with virtually anything. Other examples of extensions that could improve a wiki are category suggestion extensions and extensions for inclusion of Flash Videos, YouTube videos, and RSS feeds. Metavid, a site that archives video footage of the U.S. Senate and House floor proceedings, was created using code extending MediaWiki into the domain of collaborative video authoring. 
MediaWiki comes pre-installed with a standard text-based search. Extensions exist to let MediaWiki use more sophisticated third-party search engines, including Elasticsearch (which since 2014 has been in use on Wikipedia), Lucene and Sphinx. 
Various MediaWiki extensions have also been created to allow for more complex, faceted search, on both data entered within the wiki and on metadata such as pages' revision history. Semantic MediaWiki is one such extension. 
Empirical evidence shows most revisions in MediaWiki databases tend to differ only slightly from previous revisions. Therefore, subsequent revisions of an article can be concatenated and then compressed, achieving very high data compression ratios of up to 100x. 
For more information on the architecture, such as how it stores wikitext and assembles a page, see External links. 
The parser serves as the de facto standard for the MediaWiki syntax, as no formal syntax has been defined. Due to this lack of a formal definition, it has been difficult to create WYSIWYG editors for MediaWiki, although several WYSIWYG extensions do exist, including the popular VisualEditor. 
MediaWiki is not designed to be a suitable replacement for dedicated online forum or blogging software, although extensions do exist to allow for both of these. 
Upgrading MediaWiki is usually fully automated, requiring no changes to the site content or template programming. Historically troubles have been encountered when upgrading from significantly older versions. 
MediaWiki developers are spread around the world, though with a majority in the United States and Europe. Face-to-face meetings and programming sessions for MediaWiki developers have been held once or several times a year since 2004. 
A 2009 study that compared students' experience with MediaWiki to that with Google Documents found that students gave the latter a much higher rating on user-friendly layout. 
Meegahakivula Divisional Secretariat is a  Divisional Secretariat  of Badulla District, of Uva Province, Sri Lanka. 
Diane Lamoureux (born 20 October 1954) is a Canadian professor, essayist, and writer. She serves as Professor of Sociology in the Political Science Department of Laval University in Quebec. Her research focuses on the intersection of politics, sociology, and feminism. 
The Columbia Lions baseball team is a varsity intercollegiate athletic team of Columbia University in New York City. The team is a member of the Ivy League, which is part of the National Collegiate Athletic Association's Division I. Columbia's first baseball team was fielded in 1868. The team plays its home games at Robertson Field at Satow Stadium in New York City. The Lions are coached by Brett Boretti. 
IMOINDA or She Who Will Lose Her Name (2008) is the first libretto to be written by an African-Caribbean woman, Professor Joan Anim-Addo. It is a re-writing of Aphra Behn's Oroonoko, first published in 1688. 
The libretto was first published in Italian (translated by Dr Giovanna Covi and Chiara Pedrotti) by the University of Trento and then later re-published in English by Mango Publishing as demand for it grew. It has been performed in New York City, United States. In May 2008, the State University of New York at Geneseo and the Rochester School of the Arts put on a performance with funding from the New York State Music Fund. 
Past-Time Rail ran railtours for over 40 years but in June 2009 they went bankrupt and they sold all of their tours to a company called Pathfinder Tours. 
This United Kingdom rail transport related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1969, local author Neil Thompson published a book, The Elliston Incident, which included the camp oven story and said that Geharty (spelled Gehirty in the book) was involved in rounding up Aboriginal people and driving them over the cliffs south of Elliston, resulting in 20 deaths. For many years, Aboriginal people from the west coast of South Australia have retold the story of a massacre at Elliston as part of their oral history. 
In December 1971, a small granite memorial to Hamp was erected at the site of his hut, and in the early 1970s the locations of events leading up the alleged massacre were marked by P. J. Baillie. These included the sites of the Beevor and Easton huts, the tree from which Beevor's murderers were hanged, and Easton's grave at Lake Hamilton. Until 2017, no memorial to the Aboriginal people killed in the lead-up to or during the fatal clash had been erected. 
As part of the investigations that led to the establishment of the memorial, the Elliston council engaged an anthropologist, Tim Haines, to examine the event. He concluded that "[w]e won't ever know for certain what exactly happened on the cliffs overlooking Waterloo Bay", but indicated that while it was unlikely that hundreds of Aboriginal people were killed there, it was likely that tens or scores were killed. 
Born at Beccles in Suffolk, Jones first started working for Ealing Council on a commission only basis in 1863 until he was given a salaried post in 1882, which he held until he retired in 1913, shortly before his death on 24 August of the same year. 
 His first work for the council in 1863 was to lay out the towns first proper sewage system. As the Thames at this time suffered from gross pollution from raw sewage he also designed a sewage farm to treat the effluent; this was built at Clayponds down Occupation Lane off the South Ealing Road. Over the next two decades this was incrementally expanded to cope with the rapidly expanding population. 
To go behind the new Town Hall he designed a fire engine station. The building is still in existence but has long ceased to be used for its original purpose. Whilst not thought notable enough to warrant statutory protection, it has nevertheless been 'locally listed' by Ealing Council as being of architectural interest. 
Another task he was charged with was to design and oversee the first Electricity Generating Station and distribution system which came on line in 1894 and provided Ealing with its first electric street lighting. This was also situated down Occupation Lane. The sludge from the sewage farm next door, was filtered out and burnt here as fuel. 
During this time the council was also purchased properties from local notables which came with large plots of open land. Jones oversaw the work of turning these into public pleasure parks. He was also responsible for having the chestnut tree avenues planted on Ealing Common which gave it much of its present-day character. 
An early design of Jones's was the Congregational Church (1860) on Ealing Green (now the United Reformed and Methodist Church). Style: Gothic. 
Methodist Church (1869) at the north end of Windsor Road just before the Junction of Uxbridge Road. Style: Gothic. This now a Polish Roman Catholic Church of 'Our Lady Mother of the Church'.  English Heritage has classified it as a Grade II listed building. 
To comply with the first education acts the council had to use whatever buildings were available in which to hold lessons. Jones then set about designing the borough first purpose built State schools. He undertook the designs of Drayton Green (1908) (see below), Lammas (1910)[demolished], Little Ealing (1905)[see below], North Ealing Primary School (1911) in Pitshanger Village, and Northfields (1905) [demolished]. 
Drayton Green Primary School (pictured) at the terminus of Drayton Grove, Ealing W13 has been built in yellow brick, with red brick dressing and featuring keystoned window arches. A centrally placed, square-shaped, part-louvered, cupola bell house sits on the red terracotta tiled roof. It provides a very good example of typical late-Victorian architecture.  
Little Ealing Primary School, on Weymouth Avenue, is a single story, yellow brick building with key-stoned arched windows and terracotta tiled roof. The main hall is baronial in style with wall posts supporting the hammer beams and curved braces. At each end of the long corridor, white hexagonal ventilation cupolas sit in the roof. From the horizontal ties upwards both these roofs are glazed. 
He took advantage of rapidly increasing housing costs by accepting board membership of the Ealing, Acton & Hanwell Permanent Benefit Building Society. 
When land up at Castle Bar belonging to Kent House, the former home of Prince Edward, Duke of Kent and Strathearn, was sold off, Jones purchased much of it for his own private house building projects. He did this in the face of competition from the newly formed housing associations such as the Ealing Tenants Association who were buying up land, on which to build cheap houses for the working classes. 
He was also a member of the first Local Board of Health. His membership was necessary, along with other engineers, politicians and medical scientists to take measures to resist the spread of water borne disease. 
He was a founding member and the first honorary secretary of the Institute of Municipal and County Engineers. 
Grimms' Rockin' Duck combines pop music and poetry, recorded at Island Studios, London, England (and at Strawberry Studios, Stockport, England). 
This biographical article related to a Portuguese association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Christopher Wernitznig (born 24 February 1990) is an Austrian footballer who plays for Wolfsberger AC in the Austrian Bundesliga. 
This biographical article related to association football in Austria, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Garin Regional Park is a regional park located in Hayward, California, that is part of the East Bay Regional Parks system. It shares a contiguous border with sister park Dry Creek Pioneer Regional Park. The park is the site of the former Garin Ranch, sold by Andrew J. Garin to the district in 1966. 
The park is situated behind the California State University, East Bay campus, and extends south, sharing a border with Pleasanton Ridge Regional Park. Summits in the park reach as high as 1,500 feet. Among the maintained trails, Garin Regional Park features several fenced off abandoned trails, some of which lead deep into the forest. 
The park is used by the Hayward Area Athletic League as a high-school cross-country course. It is considered the home course of Moreau Catholic High School. Due to the hilly nature of the course race times are generally slower on this course than comparable distances elsewhere. The 2 and 3 mile trails that are used climb the hills at the front of the park. The entire San Francisco Bay can be viewed from the hills. 
The park contains a small historic apple orchard with heirloom varieties. The park hosts the Garin Apple Festival in late Summer, with apples available for tasting. 
Peter Hall (born June 5, 1949) is a sailor from Canada, who represented his country at the 2018 Vintage Yachting Games in Hellerup Denmark. Hall as helmsman together with his fellow crew members Gord de Vries and Johan Offermans (The Netherlands) took the Silver medal in the Soling. Hall is representing Group P in the council of World Sailing. Furthermore, he was president of the International Soling Association from 2015 - 2016. 
He was born on June 5, 1949, in Montreal, Quebec, Hall attended the Lower Canada College at Monkland Village, and earned a Bachelor's degree in Business Administration from Queen's University at Kingston and a bachelor's degree in law from McGill University at Montreal. 
Hall lives in Montreal, is married with Margot. The couple has 3 children: Krista, Nicolas and William. 
This biographical article related to yacht racing or sailing in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 A minority religion is a religion held by a minority of the population of a country, state, or region. Minority religions may be subject to stigma or discrimination. An example of a stigma is using the term cult with its extremely negative connotations for certain new religious movements. People who belong to a minority religion may be subject to discrimination and prejudice, especially when the religious differences correlate with ethnic differences. 
Laws are made in some countries to protect the rights of religious minorities, such as protecting the minorities' culture and to promote harmony with the majority. 
TVP Kultura is the first TV theme channel to be run by the Polish public broadcaster TVP. It was launched on 24 April 2005 and is dedicated to arts and culture. Every day of the week, the channel concentrates on other disciplines; e.g., cinema, music, etc. It is broadcast from the TVP headquarters in Warsaw and is available on cable networks and on digital platforms in Poland. 
This article about a property in Scott County, Iowa on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a building or structure in Iowa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Emmanuel FC is a football club of East Timor based in Dili. The team plays in the Liga Futebol Amadora. 
In 2020, the club participated in the 2020 Copa FFTL, the competition had 20 clubs divided into 4 groups of 5 teams, the two teams that had the most points in the group would advance to the Quarterfinals. With just one win, one draw and two defeats, the Emmanuel FC team ended their participation in third place in group D. 
In 2013 the agency was merged with the organisation Swedish Trade Council, to form a new organisation named Business Sweden. 
This biographical article relating to association football in the country of Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Signed in 1983 as a free agent by the Washington Capitals after starring for the University of Minnesota men's ice hockey team, Erickson played parts of two seasons with the Capitals before he was traded to the Los Angeles Kings. 
This biographical article relating to an American ice hockey winger is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Knucklebones, also known as snobs, astragalus, tali, dibs, fivestones, jacks, or jackstones, among many other names, is a game of dexterity played with a number of small objects that are thrown up, caught, and manipulated in various manners. It is ancient in origin and is found in various cultures worldwide.  
The name "knucklebones" is derived from the Ancient Greek version of the game, which uses the astragalus (a bone in the ankle, or hock) of a sheep. However, different variants of the game from various cultures use other objects, including stones, seashells, seeds, and cubes. 
Knucklebones is of ancient indeterminate origin and has probably been independently invented several times. It is found throughout various cultures worldwide. 
In the Middle East, e.g., in Turkey and Iran, there is a similar game called "ye qol do qol".[circular reference] 
In Malaysia, Indonesia, Brunei, and Singapore, the game is called batu seremban (literally "five stones"), selambut, or serembat. Like the name implies, it only uses five pieces, usually stones, seeds (usually Adenanthera pavonina), or small pyramidal bags of sand or rice. It also involves multiple levels of difficulty, varying in the number of stones collected and tossed. It does not have a specialized stone for throwing, though the one picked for throwing is also referred to as the "mother". 
The second, probably derivative, form of the game was one of pure chance, the stones being thrown upon a table, either from the hand or from a cup, and the values of the sides upon which they fell were counted. The shape of the pastern bones used for astragaloi as well as for the tali of the Romans, with whom knucklebones was also popular, determined the manner of counting. 
The pastern bone of a sheep, goat, or calf has two rounded ends upon which it cannot stand and two broad and two narrow sides, one of each pair being concave and one convex. The convex narrow side, called chios or "the dog", was counted as 1, the convex broad side as 3, the concave broad side as 4, and the concave narrow side as 6. 
Four astragali were used and 35 different scores were possible in a single throw. Many of these throws received distinctive names such as: Aphrodite, Midas, Solon, and Alexander. Among the Romans, some of the names were: Venus, King, and Vulture. The highest throw in Greece counted 40, and was called the Euripides. It was probably a combination throw, since more than four sixes could not be thrown at a single time. The lowest throw, both in Greece and Rome, was the Dog. 
Versions of the game are popular among children of Amazigh origin across North Africa, and goes by a wide variety of names in the various Tamazight dialects. 
The two forms of the game are present, the throw and catch version is called kapichua, payana, payanga, payanca, or payaya and it's a child's game played with stone pebbles, while the throw and gamble based on position it's called jogo do osso or taba and are played with a single cow knucklebone. 
Songs for John Doe is the 1941 debut album and first released product of the Almanac Singers, an influential early folk music group. 
For the album, six masters were recorded in a two- or three-hour session. "'C' For Conscription" and "Washington Breakdown" were recorded as a single take. 
Godegisel was the educator and uncle of Clotilde, wife of the Frankish king Clovis I. Since 463 he was a sub-king of the Burgundians. With the help of Clovis, Godegisel attempted to become the king of all the kingdom of the Burgundians by eliminating his brother Gundobad. Gundobad had previously seized the rest of the kingdom after the assassination of their brother Chilperic II.  
Nikolai Tsvetkov (born 1960) is a Russian oligarch, the founder and president of Nikoil Financial. As of 2009[update], with a wealth of $1.8 billion, he was the world's 397th-richest person. 
This Russian business-related biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Chloe Dancer/Crown of Thorns" is a song by the Seattle, Washington-based rock band Mother Love Bone. The song is the fourth track on the band's debut EP, Shine (1989). "Chloe Dancer/Crown of Thorns" is actually two songs sequenced together. "Crown of Thorns" is found by itself on the band's sole studio album, Apple (1990). "Chloe Dancer" is not available as a stand-alone track. 
"Chloe Dancer" is about lead singer Andy Wood's muse/fiancee, Xana La Fuente, who had planned to be a stripper to support the pair, but left the club after one hour. "Crown of Thorns" was written about their nasty breakup over his on and-off-again dabbling in heroin, which he eventually dies from. "This song is about a relationship ruined by drugs," she explains. "He wrote it about our near breakup, and how I tried to control him and the drugs--hence his allusion to being tied to the ceiling." 
The song was featured in director Cameron Crowe's 1989 film, Say Anything..., but it was not included on the film's soundtrack. The song is featured on the soundtrack for Crowe's 1992 film, Singles. It was also featured in the One Tree Hill episode "Pictures of You" in 2007 and can be found on The Road Mix: Music from the Television Series One Tree Hill, Volume 3. 
In April 2011, Kevin Wood (Andrew Wood's brother) teamed up with hard rock band Lace Weeper to record Mother Love Bone's "Crown of Thorns" as a tribute to Andy's 21 years passing. The single was released on Kevin's Wammybox Records. 
Shawn Smith has also on multiple occasions covered the song, with and without his band Sweet Water. They were also accompanied by Seattle Symphony Orchestra on an occasion to cover the song. 
On July 7, 2015 at a NYC show Slipknot and Stone Sour front man Corey Taylor performed a cover of Chloe Dancer. 
The discography of T.S.O.L., an American punk rock band, consists of eleven studio albums, three live albums, three compilation albums, two EPs, two video albums, three singles, and five music videos. 
^ I Who's Screwin' Who? was re-released by Cleopatra Records in 2008 as F#*k You Tough Guy: The Collection and in 2011 as Code Blue. 
The following T.S.O.L. songs were released on compilation albums. This is not an exhaustive list; songs that were first released on the band's albums, EPs, or singles are not included. 
Born in Cornwall, Canada West, the son of Alexander Eugene Macdonald and Grace Mackay Taylor, Macdonald was educated in the schools of Cornwall before joining the 2nd Cornwall Volunteer Militia Rifle Company as an ensign in 1863. He was promoted to lieutenant in 1865, captain in 1866, major in 1871, and lieutenant-colonel in 1877. He served during the Fenian raids of 1866, the Red River expedition of 1870, and the North-West Rebellion of 1885. 
In 1874, he joined the stores branch of the Department of Militia and Defence. In 1896, he was appointed chief superintendent of stores. He was promoted to colonel in 1900 and was made Director-General of Ordnance for Canada in 1903. In 1904, he was appointed Quartermaster-General of the Canadian Militia. He was promoted to brigadier-general in 1908 and major-general in 1912. He was responsible for equipping the first Canadian formations raised in World War I. 
Ilona Jokinen (born 1981) is a Finnish soprano opera singer, whose repertoire ranges from baroque to contemporary music. She has won many prizes in Finnish national singing competitions and lied music competitions, such as first prize in Pentti Koskimies lied competition, third prizes at the Merikanto singing competition, and Toivo Kuula competition. 
Ilona Jokinen has held prominent roles at Savonlinna Opera Festival, Finnish National Opera, and other venues. She has performed as Fransquita (Bizet: Carmen), Vera (Kortekangas: Daddy's Girl), Thyra (Hakola: Vieriva kivi), Young Shepherd (Wagner: Tannhauser), and Susanna (Mozart: Le Nozze di Figaro) to mention a few. 
Tricholoma atroviolaceum is a mushroom of the agaric genus Tricholoma. It is from the fungi kingdom. It was described as new to science by American mycologist Alexander H. Smith in 1944. The mushroom seems to be exclusive to the Pacific coast of North America; it can be found in the Pacific Northwest under conifers, usually in sparse quantities. 
The cap is broadly convex to flat with a hard texture, covered with purplish gray-brown fibrous scales. The flesh tends to stain red-gray. The gills are pinkish-gray. The stipe is thick, sometimes larger at the base, and browns with age. The flesh has a starchy odor and slightly bitter taste. 
Villa Jacini is a large rural palace located on Via Conte Stefano Jacini the frazione of Zuccone Robasacco, within the town limits of Triuggio, Province of Monza and Brianza, region of Lombardy, Italy. 
The location was notable since 1289 by the presence of a chapel or small church, still present on the property as the chapel of the Blessed Virgin Mary. Zuccone San Giovanni led to the construction of a rural palace of lodge, later also known as Villa Sacro Cuore, Villa Zuccone Jacini, or Villa Zuccone Rubasacco. 
A request to build an oratory at the site was made in 1571, by Battista Fedele to the archbishop of Milan, Carlo Borromeo. The property came into hands of the Cardinal Angelo Maria Durini (1725-1796) who used the property as a hunting lodge. 
The interiors were decorated in the late 19th-century with trompe-l'oeil and stucco. Photographs from the 19th-century document sumptuous decoration and artwork with carved wooden ceilings in the main salon. A Palazzo Jacini is located in Casalbuttano in the province of Cremona. 
Damon Styles is expelled from school on his eighteenth birthday.  He gets himself a firearms licence and intends to get a job shooting pigs with Pigman. But Damon harbours secrets and the citizens of the town of Strathven believe they know what Damon is planning and set out to stop him. 
Holly Harper for Readings hadn't "been this impressed with a main character in quite some time" and thought the author "has created an absolutely unforgettable cast of characters". 
O.K. Ken? is the second studio album by the blues band, Chicken Shack, released in February 1969. O.K Ken? reached number 9 in the UK Albums Chart, three places higher than its predecessor, 40 Blue Fingers, Freshly Packed and Ready to Serve. 
 Low Etherley is a village in County Durham, in England. It is located a few miles to the west of Bishop Auckland. 
In 1825 the Stockton and Darlington Railway opened a horse-drawn branch line, the Etherley Incline Railway, from West Auckland to serve Witton Park Colliery, north of Etherley. This line passed through Low Etherley, where it was worked by a cable-hauled incline powered by a stationary steam engine. 
Home for the Holidays is the fifty-second album by American singer/guitarist Glen Campbell, released in 1993 (see 1993 in music). 
Diadelia griseola is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Breuning in 1939. 
Elfi Graf (born Elfriede Sepp 20 November 1952 in Dornbirn, Vorarlberg) is an Austrian Schlagersinger. 
Graf was born in Dornbirn and grew up there with her two siblings. She studied classical music, but did not complete the course. In 1971, she won the talent competition Show Chance and then the schlager singer Gus Backus discovered her in Talentschuppen. 
In 1990, Graf competed in the German preliminary round of Grand Prix der Volksmusik with the song Einen Adam, einen Apfel und ein kleines Paradies, and in 1995, she competed in the Austrian round with the song Lieber Leierkastenmann. 
By now, Mara was now willing to admit the Yankees into the NFL, as the only survivor of the defunct AFL. He even allowed the team to play its home games at Yankee Stadium. However, Mara was able to dictate the Yankees' schedule. When the Giants were in the Polo Grounds, the Yankees were to be on the road. 
In 1929, Mara was looking for a player who might approach Grange in fan appeal. He saw Benny Friedman of the Detroit Wolverines as the best option available. When he couldn't make a deal for Friedman, Mara simply bought the entire Detroit franchise for $10,000. For the next few years Mara had ultimate ownership of three NFL franchises; however, he never interfered with the management of any of the teams that operated under his leases. 
During the Great Depression in 1930, New York Mayor Jimmy Walker approached Mara about playing a charity exhibition game, which he quickly agreed to do. The Giants defeated the Notre Dame All-Stars, which included the legendary Four Horsemen. The Giants easily outscored Notre Dame, 21-0. As a result of the game, Mara and the Giants raised $115,153 for the New York City Unemployment Fund. 
In 1936 and 1937, Mara successfully battled for New York's pro football market against the Brooklyn Tigers and the New York Yankees of the second American Football League. He also successfully outlasted the New York Yankees of the third third American Football League.[citation needed] 
However, from 1946 to 1949, Mara engaged in an all-out war with the All-America Football Conference. Mara and the Giants were faced with two AAFC opponents in the New York City area, the New York Yankees and the Brooklyn Dodgers. Again Mara fought hard for New York's pro football fanbase and eventually won. When the two leagues partially merged after the 1949 season, Mara demanded and got the best players from the combined New York-Brooklyn franchise that had operated in 1949.[citation needed] 
Mara died in 1959 at the age of 71. His vast contributions to the NFL were recognized with his 1963 election to the charter class of 17 members in the Pro Football Hall of Fame.[citation needed] 
A jangseung or village guardian is a Korean totem pole usually made of wood. Jangseungs were traditionally placed at the edges of villages to mark village boundaries and frighten away demons. They were also worshipped as village tutelary deities. 
In the Jeolla region, jangseungs are often made of stone bearing some resemblance to the dolhareubangs of Jeju Island. 
In Seoul, 18th century Joseon Dynasty King Jeongjo ordered jangseungs erected in the area near Sangdo to ward off evil spirits when he made a royal procession to Suwon, where his father's tomb was located. Since then, the district has been called Jangseungbaegi and has given its name to the Jangseungbaegi Station on the Seoul Metropolitan Subway's Line 7. 
Depending on the location or affiliation, jangseung can be divided into village guardian, temple guardian, and public guardian. 
The village guardian is the god of dongje, and has the functions of village guardian, mural, expelling the harmful ghosts, fire prevention, and gathering happiness for the village. 
The temple guardian post has the function of protecting the temple from the invisible evil spirits. The temple guardian is the boundary mark of the temple. 
The public guardian is a milestone and a street god to protect the safety of the gate, barracks, and roads and sea roads. 
Mid-size cars would first be implemented for this NASCAR Grand National Cup Series season. Ten years later, the rising price of gas for passenger vehicles caused all car classes to shrink. Automakers moved previously "full-size" nameplates to smaller platforms. 
There are four of Chuuk's 40 municipalities in the Pattiw area. Houk and Poluwat are municipalities, while Pollap atoll is divided into the municipalities of Pollap (north) and Tamatam (south). The largest municipality of Pattiw is Poluwat, with a population of 1,015 (as of 2000). 
This Federated States of Micronesia location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rambhau Mhalgi Prabodhini is a not-for-profit organisation established in memory of the Rambhau Mhalgi. Established in 1982, RMP is a learning and research organisation for aspiring political leaders and current elected representatives of India. RMP operates nationally through its offices in Delhi, Pune, Mumbai, and its headquarters in Thane. 
RMP is often linked with the Bharatiya Janata Party and right-wing Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh outfit. It is a recognized research centre by Mumbai University. 
RMP political leadership training mission was implemented first at the behest of parliamentarian Rambhau Mhalgi. Mhalgi was influenced by RSS thinker and BJP leader Deendayal Upadhyaya, who had conceived the idea of a learning  establishment for aspiring political leaders and current elected representatives of India. In 1982, Pramod Mahajan, senior BJP leader, opened Rambhau Mhalgi Prabodhini campus at Uttan village, near Bhayandar. 
In January 2020, the Congress party objected to training government officials at RMP citing right-wing political leaning of RMP. 
The Culbertson 4-5 notrump is a slam seeking convention in the game of contract bridge. It was devised in the early 1930s by Ely Culbertson. Most four-notrump conventions (Blackwood and its variants being the best known) demand that bidder's partner define their hand using agreed codified responses. In contrast, the Culbertson 4-5 describes the bidder's hand, and invites partner to use their judgement in the light of that information. 
Culbertson's proposal of this convention threatened to disrupt the publication of the 1935 version of the Laws of Contract Bridge. The Portland Club, guardian of the laws in England, considered it equivalent to playing with exposed cards. Noel Mobbs persuaded the Club that they were wrong. 
In his 1949 book Design for Bidding, "Skid" Simon called the Culbertson 4-5 "an adult weapon" and Blackwood "merely a nice toy". 
The Culbertson 4-5 has been superseded by Blackwood and other conventions, but was reported in 1967 to still be popular among some leading British players. 
OW2 is an independent non-profit organization dedicated to developing open source code infrastructure for middleware enterprise information systems. OW2 federates IT vendors and users, universities, and research centers from Europe, Asia, and the Americas, representing thousands of IT professionals. 
OW2 provides developers with technical infrastructure, offering project hosting and providing a number of services to facilitate the collaborative work (versioning, bug tracking, licenses, etc.). 
OW2 runs an open source governance system helping members connect with each other and with the international open source ecosystem at large. OW2 Governance provides the collaboration framework for its activities, namely, its Projects, Initiatives, and Local Chapters. As part of its governance efforts, OW2 develops its own project quality and assessment system made available as the Open Source Capability Assessment Radar (OSCAR) and the Market Readiness Index (MRI). 
OW2 engages in marketing activities to promote its brand, its code base and its members. OW2 regularly takes part in industry conferences and trade shows around the world including Cloud Expo Europe, Cloud Computing World Expo, FISL, FOSDEM, OpenStack Summit, OSCON, Paris Open Source Summit, etc. It also hosts its own yearly conference, known as OW2con. 
In addition, OW2 provides information dissemination and community building services for R&D collaborative projects funded by European or French research programs. 
Initiatives are joint efforts by multiple members targeted at meeting a common market need. Initiatives arise from examining market trends and identifying areas of need. Initiatives are constituted by several projects and facilitate their implementations into business solutions by systems integrators, OEMs, and end-users. 
A Local Chapter is a group of OW2 members who combine their efforts to promote the goals of the consortium within a community characterized by its geography or language. Current OW2 Local Chapters can be found throughout Europe, China, Brazil, and North America. 
OW2con is OW2's global annual conference for the OW2 community and IT professionals, organized since 2009. Topics of the two-day conference are open source software for enterprise information systems, cloud computing, big data, privacy and security, and accessibility. Traditionally held in Paris, each annual conference is focussed on a new central theme. 
During the off-season the Thunder were purchased by Steven Brothers Sports Management, LLC from long time owner Horn Chen. The Thunder resigned eight players from the 2010-11 season. 
The series premiered on 27 May 2013.[citation needed] The final episode of the series aired on 10 December 2015.[citation needed] 
The first season mainly covers the teenage years of Maharana Pratap. The second season ends with Pratap's death from illness and the coronation of his son, Amar Singh, as the next Rana of Mewar.[citation needed] 
Rehearsal is the second studio album by Australian surf music and garage rock band Skegss, released on 26 March 2021. The album debuted at number one on the ARIA Albums Chart. Upon announcement, Skegss' Ben Reed said he was "not expecting it", and CEO of ARIA Annabelle Herd remarked that the band's "good time energy is exactly what we need right now". 
At the 2021 ARIA Music Awards, Chris Collins was nominated for Engineer of the Year for work on this album. 
This biographical article about a Czech politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Atlanta Crackers were Minor League Baseball teams based in Atlanta, Georgia, between 1901 and 1965. The Crackers were Atlanta's home team until the Atlanta Braves moved from Milwaukee, Wisconsin, in 1966. 
The Crackers won the Dixie Series, a postseason interleague championship between the champions of the Southern Association and the Texas League, in 1938 and 1954. 
According to Tim Darnell, who wrote The Crackers: Early Days of Atlanta Baseball, the origins of the team name is unknown. 
During the period of Reconstruction following the American Civil War, there was also a political party of the same name. Organized in Augusta, Georgia, this party's platform was one of "opposition to Catholics and segregation of blacks". 
While now sometimes used as a derogatory term for a white southerner that promotes racism, it is also used as a term of pride by some white southerners to indicate one that is descended from those original settlers of the area. 
As in several other cities, Atlanta's local Negro league team was named after the local White league team: the Atlanta Black Crackers joined the Negro Southern League in 1920, and existed until the early 1950s. 
Play-by-play announcer Ernie Harwell called Cracker games on the radio from 1943 to 1949 before being traded to Brooklyn Dodgers for catcher Cliff Dapper,[citation needed] the only time an announcer has been traded for a player. 
According to a 1989 archeological survey, the structure was built in the 1130s and may have been used for less than a century. Although its original purpose is unknown, theories suggest it was either used as a shelter during the turbulent times on Gotland at the end of the Viking Age or that it was the site of a last stand. 
Among the archeological finds at the Bulverket are the remains of three boats. One of these served as a model for the reconstruction of a Viking boat, the Krampmacken, in 1980. Krampmacken has subsequently made several journeys following old Viking waterways through Eastern Europe. 
One of the recommended ways of seeing the Bulverket is during the winter, when the ice is smooth and clear and the lake is used for tour skating. 
Dendrochronological and Carbon-14 examinations shows that the Bulverket was built in the 1130s, and archeologists are as of 2015[update] trying to ascertain how long it was in use. The current estimates are a few years up to a century. 
The Congressional Medal of Merit is the United States Congress' award for young Americans.  This award is for ages 14 to 23.  It is intended to honor individuals who have shown outstanding achievement in areas such as academics and service. The award is presented by a member of congress to the individual regardless of partisanship. 
The Congressional Medal of Merit was established in 1942 by President Franklin D. Roosevelt. It was first created to honor citizens of the United States for their services during World War II.  In present times a member of the United States Congress may award the Congressional Medal of Merit to their constituents as a way to honor citizens for their contributions, leadership, and achievements. 
Much traditional Chinese art was made for the imperial court, often to be then redistributed as gifts. As well as Chinese painting, sculpture and Chinese calligraphy, there are a great range of what may be called decorative or applied arts.  Chinese fine art is distinguished from Chinese folk art, which differs in its style and purpose.  This article gives an overview of the many different applied arts of China. 
The Chinese imperial court collected calligraphy pieces from the most skilled calligraphers in the country. The collection contains many masterpieces made by well-known calligraphers throughout Chinese art history. Furthermore, because of calligraphy's high artistic value, calligraphy collecting was popular among several Chinese emperors in multiple dynasties. 
Calligraphy on fan by Mo Shilong, China, Ming dynasty, 16th century, ink on gold paper, Honolulu Academy of Arts 
Chinese ceramics, whose history originates back to the pre-dynastic periods, has continuously improved since then, and it is one of the most significant forms of Chinese art. 
After opium was introduced to China, snuff bottles became popular. The Chinese royalties were addicted to them, as they used opium as a long-life medicine. The design of the snuff bottles flourished because of the money that the rich poured into the industry. Many of these bottles were made by talented artisans using tiny paints brushes; they were painted from inside of the bottle, reaching down from the top of the narrow neck. They are still highly collectible up to this day.[citation needed] 
Pilgrim flask decorated with peaches and pomegranates; Ming dynasty, 1st half of 17th century, Museum Rietberg, Zurich 
A golden canteen made during the Chinese Ming dynasty, dated 15th century, Freer and Sackler Galleries, Washington D.C. 
In the 18th Century, a Qing dynasty covered vase depicting a woman holding a lingzhi fungus and a peony branch was created. The woman was also accompanied by a boy, a crane, and a deer as shown below.[citation needed] 
Covered Vase Decorated with Female Figure, Qing dynasty, 18th century, coral, Asian collection in the Worcester Art Museum, Worcester, Massachusetts 
Ruyi is a scepter that serves primarily as a decoration. Its history began in the Qing dynasty when Ruyi scepters were given to noted visitors of the emperor. Now, they're given as birthday presents. Ruyi is made of different materials, including porcelain and jade. The term Ruyi means "may your wish be granted" or "as you wish". The unusual shape is meant to imitate the shape of a stemmed lotus flower. 
Chinese embroidery is one of the oldest extant needlework. The four major regional styles of Chinese embroidery are Suzhou (Su Xiu), Hunan (Xiang Xiu), Guangdong (Yue Xiu) and Sichuan (Shu Xiu). All of them are nominated as Chinese Intangible Cultural Heritage.[citation needed] 
Detail of qifu (imperial dragon robe), late 19th or early 20th century, silk, gilt thread, twill and damask weave, embroidery, Honolulu Academy of Arts 
Chinese summer court robe ("dragon robe"), c. 1890s, silk gauze couched in gold thread, East-West Center 
Detail of qifu (imperial dragon robe), late 19th or early 20th century, silk, gilt thread, twill and damask weave, embroidery, Honolulu Academy of Arts 
Hall had a traumatic brain injury and near death experience in 2009, when a car operated by a distracted driver struck her as she was crossing a street in Beverly Hills. It took years of recovery from the TBI for her to return to her work. 
SoftEther Corporation is a Japanese software company. It was founded as an industry-academia-government venture in April 2004 by University of Tsukuba students, with the goal to develop the software of the same name, SoftEther VPN. The name indicated that a software emulates an Ethernet. 
The VPN software called SoftEther (SoftEther 1.0) was written by Daiyu Nobori, who became the Representative Director and Chairman of the new company. In 2003, the software's development was adopted as one of the projects of the Exploratory Youth program, sponsored by Information Technology Promotion Agency, Japan. "In addition to being highly evaluated by the project manager, there were 1 million downloads in three months after making it available at the website." 
The first SoftEther sales version was released in August 2004 called SoftEther CA, by Mitsubishi Materials Corporation, Japan. 
The second version of the software, released in December 2005, the name of the software was changed to PacketiX VPN 2.0 from SoftEther 2.0. In 2006, PacketiX VPN 2.0 won the "Software of the Year" award from the Information-Technology Promotion Agency. 
In 2010 March, PacketiX VPN 3.0 was released by Softether Corporation. Some functions were added to new version (as examples: support IPv6, 802.1Q VLAN, TLS 1.0). This version is compatible with PacketiX VPN 2.0. 
In 2013 July, PacketiX VPN 4.0 was released by SoftEther Corporation. In this version, some existent protocols support was added. 
In 2010 June, UT-VPN was released by SoftEther Corporation and University of Tsukuba. UT-VPN is an open source VPN software. UT-VPN has compatible as PacketiX VPN products of SoftEther Corporation. 
UT-VPN developed based on PacketiX VPN 3.0, but some functions was deleted. For example, the RADIUS client is supported by PacketiX VPN Server, but it is not supported by UT-VPN Server. 
In 2013 July, SoftEther VPN was released by SoftEther VPN Project with SoftEther Corporation and University of Tsukuba. 
SoftEther VPN 1.0 developed based on PacketiX VPN 4.0. Compatibility and the restrictions of functions follow UT-VPN. It is scheduled to release source codes with the GNU General Public License (GPL) in 2013. 
On January 4, 2014, SoftEther VPN announced that the source code of SoftEther VPN was released as open-source software under the GPLv2 license. SoftEther VPN is the underlying VPN engine of VPN Gate. 
The women's rhythmic group 5 balls competition of the rhythmic gymnastics events at the 2011 Pan American Games was held on October 17 at the Nissan Gymnastics Stadium. The draw for the competition took place on August 1, 2011 in Guadalajara. The defending Pan American Games champion was team Brazil. 
 Shooting first entered the Summer Paralympic Games in 1976. Australia has competed at every Paralympic shooting competition. 
The Amazing Race 9 is the ninth installment of the American reality television show The Amazing Race. The season featured eleven teams of two, all with pre-existing relationships, in a race around the world for a US$1 million grand prize. The show premiered on Tuesday, February 28, 2006, and concluded on May 17, 2006. 
Additionally, this season of The Amazing Race was the first one to start and end at the same location: Red Rocks Amphitheatre, the world-famous outdoor concert venue outside Denver. Other seasons have started and ended in the same city (Season 1 in New York City and Season 6 in Chicago), but the location of the Starting and Finish Lines were different.  
As a result of scheduling conflicts after the season finale aired, runners-up Eric & Jeremy were unable to attend the premiere of The Da Vinci Code, which had moved from Hollywood to the Cannes Film Festival and was their prize for securing first place in Leg 6. They later announced that CBS had given them a different prize as compensation. 
Applications for The Amazing Race 9 were closed on July 26, 2005 (a day after the original deadline). Semi-finalist interviews were held sometime in September 2005. Final casting interviews took place in October 2005. 
Following the Family Edition experiment of Season 8, which featured teams of four family members racing in the United States and Central America, this season returned to the traditional format of eleven teams of two competing in a race around the world. The teams included hippie best friends, a couple married for 40 years, and sisters living in different states. 
After the season finale, Eric announced that he was dating Danielle and had planned to move to New York to be closer to her. After the two participated in the All-Star season in 2007, Eric & Danielle said in a post-show interview that they were no longer dating due to distance and were now just friends. Danielle married in 2011 and is now a mother of two young daughters, born in 2009 and 2012. 
Ray proposed to Yolanda on The Early Show the morning after the season finale, and she accepted. This episode also showed their full progress on the final leg of The Amazing Race, including Yolanda's progress on the Roadblock. 
Joseph & Monica got married a few years after the season ended, but it ended in divorce. Monica remarried Green Bay Packers long snapper Brett Goode. 
Lisa Hinds died on August 22, 2017, following a battle with cancer, at the age of 59, one day before her 60th birthday. 
Eric Sanchez and Danielle Turner were also selected to race in The Amazing Race: All-Stars among a cast of returning teams from seasons 1-10. Jeremy Ryan was featured in the closing minutes appearance of the season finale on that season. 
Since September 2019, Lake and Michelle Garner have starred on their own local TV show called The Tooth Hurts. The show features both their home lives and their business lives. It is also available for viewing on both the show's YouTube homepage and Facebook homepage. 
On August 27, 2006, Season 9 won a Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Reality-Competition Program, the fourth consecutive award for the series. Producers nominated this season instead of the critically lambasted Family Edition, which was also eligible for the award. 
The following teams participated in the season, each listed along with their placements in each leg and relationships as identified by the program. Note that this table is not necessarily reflective of all of the content broadcast on television, owing to the inclusion or exclusion of some data. Placements are listed in finishing order: 
Individual prizes were awarded to the first team to complete a leg unless otherwise noted. Excluding Leg 6's prize, trips were provided by Travelocity. The prizes were: 
This leg's first Detour was a choice between Scrub or Scour. In Scrub, teams had travel to a trolley bus depot at 8 Trolley Park and had to thoroughly wash a Russian public trolleybus inside and out to the satisfaction of the trolleybus attendant to receive their next clue. In Scour, teams had travel to Dubrovka Theatre to search among 1,500 pieces of Russian nesting dolls to find one of 10 with a microscopic clue hidden inside a doll. 
In this leg's second Roadblock, one team member had to search among 150 hats and feet scattered across a large field for one of eleven hidden Travelocity Roaming Gnomes containing their next clue. 
This leg's second Detour was a choice between Break It or Slap It. In Break It, teams broke stunt bottles over each other's heads until they found prost, the German word for cheers, written on the back of the label to receive their next clue. However, they could only smash one bottle per cuckoo from a traditional German cuckoo clock. In Slap It, teams had to learn and correctly perform a traditional Schuhplattler dance to receive their next clue. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to correctly piece together a classical Greek statue, excluding two extra pieces that did not belong unbeknownst to the racers, to receive their next clue from an archeologist. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to participate in a popular Italian sport: kayak polo. They would join a professional team and participate in an ongoing match. When the team member scored one goal, a coach would give them their next clue. 
This season's first Fast Forward had teams travel on foot less than a mile to Stamatopoulos Taverna and take part in a traditional Greek method of dispelling mischievous spirits: plate breaking. Teams had to break plates to find a route marker flag baked into only one of hundreds of plate. The first team to find the flag would win the Fast Forward award. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to dig into 117 sand dunes to find one of 6 Omani underground ovens with a shuwa, a woven pouch with a meal of lamb wrapped in a dried palm leaf bag and steamed in the oven, which they would have for dinner, to receive their next clue from a Bedouin. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to search a block of Fremantle Prison for one of several cells within Division 4 that contained Duracell CopperTop batteries and a flashlight. They then had to search for an entrance to a darkened cavern, descend underground, and use the flashlight to search a set of either wet or dry tunnels for their next clue. 
This season's second Fast Forward required teams to travel to a restaurant outside of Lopburi to complete a favorite local after-school activity, which they would discover was eating a bowl of fried crickets and grasshoppers. The first team to clear the bowl would win the Fast Forward and the right to go directly to the Pit Stop. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to recreate a properly carved and arranged fruit ceremonial feast and give it to monkeys at Prang Sam Yot, much like locals do during an annual festival, to receive their next clue. 
In this leg's Roadblock, one team member had to ride on three extreme rides in the following order: The Pizza, Dodonpa, and Fujiyama. While riding, they had to spot a man holding a message somewhere along one of the rides. After their third ride, they had to tell the park manager what message they saw to receive their next clue; if not, they would have to go on all three rides again. 
After his parliamentary service, his Megalong Valley enterprise and his discharge from bankruptcy on 19 Nov 1901, Wall's activity switched back to the Mudgee area. Between August 1907 and May 1908, he took up further mining leases in Windeyer and Hargraves. The complex geology of the district held/holds many opportunities and gold mining the deeper reefs using modern techniques is still being carried out (Aug. 2008) in all the Mudgee areas where Wall once held mining leases. 
In May 1911 he held Lease PL No. 232 adjoining the Traelman Gold mining Company at Ivy Paddock near Mudgee and was also investigating the setting-up of a 'hill-side' furnace on the Dunedoo rail line, near Mudgee. In October 1912, a William Wall is listed as holding a 4 acre mining lease at Yambulla (south of Cooma, NSW). 
In the letter from Yalgogrin to his daughter Ethel (June 1919), he describes the severe drought at that time and states his intention to come down to Sydney via Mudgee as soon as he can process his ore at the Yalgogrin stamper battery. 
Wall was an autodidact. When he was 12, the Mechanics Institute Library was located in a property at 3 Short Street Mudgee belonging to his uncle, Thomas Spicer. It contained 200 volumes. It is likely that this library provided the beginning for his extensive knowledge of minerals, geology and mining practice. As noted above, he was interested in forestry and his Hansard speeches show his interests ranged widely. 
He was also an inventor, and his interests ranged over many issues during his life. Some of his 'Letters to Editor' appear in the Sydney Morning Herald from the 1880s through to the early 1900s. 
Jones played drums as a child and started on clarinet at age 8; his father encouraged him to explore jazz. He studied with Simeon Bellison, Joe Allard, Charlie Parker, and George Russell. He played with Ray McKinley from 1949 into the mid-1950s, and then with Hal McIntyre before rejoining McKinley later in the decade. 
Late in his life he moved to Germany, where he ceased performing due to emphysema. He died there in 1980. 
The Human Centipede 2 (Full Sequence) received substantial attention and controversy for its graphic depictions of violence, sexual violence and body horror. It was subject to heavy censorship throughout the world, where it was sometimes edited to remove objectionable content or banned altogether. It was critically panned by critics, with much criticism focused on its acting, plot, and violence. 
The scene cuts back to the tollbooth, with Martin watching the credits of First Sequence on his laptop, with exactly the same reaction as the initial scene, implying the events that followed had never actually happened. 
Six was inspired to make the movie a metafilm after reporters kept asking him if he worried about people committing copycat crimes inspired by the first film. Although he had previously considered the concept for a possible sequel, the questions cemented his idea. 
Principal photography for Full Sequence began in London in June 2010 with a largely British cast. A teaser trailer was released on 24 September, in which Six introduced Martin, a man wearing a cardboard box over his head, as the new doctor. 
The film had its United States premiere at Fantastic Fest in Austin, Texas, on 22 September 2011. The film's distributor, IFC Films, gave audience members complimentary barf bags at the screening, and stationed an ambulance outside the theater as a gimmick. However, one audience member became so physically ill during the premiere that actual paramedics had to assist her. 
The film began a limited theatrical release in the United States on 7 October 2011. It was released unrated and only had midnight showings. The film was released in an "unrated director's cut" on DVD and Blu-ray on 14 February 2012; the film runs a total 91 minutes. 
A full-color version of the film was released for the first time in the United States on 27 October 2015, exclusively on The Human Centipede: The Complete Sequence Blu-ray set. 
In April 2016, a Tennessee high school teacher was suspended after the film was played during class. Tom Six responded by tweeting "It should be mandatory to watch THC2 in school classes...It deals with a character that is bullied and what to do!" Six also said that he would be giving the teacher an autographed copy of the film. 
We are really pleased that after nearly four months of detailed discussion and debate, we have been able to reach an agreement with the BBFC and to produce a very viable cut of the film which will both excite and challenge its fans. Naturally we have a slight disappointment that we have had to make cuts, but we feel that the storyline has not been compromised and the level of horror has been sustained.
In May 2011, the uncut film was originally granted an R18+ classification by the Australian Classification Board (ACB). However, this decision was later overruled after Minister for Justice Brendan O'Connor asked for a review of the rating by the Australian Classification Review Board. On 28 November 2011, the film was reviewed and by unanimous decision of a three-person board, refused classification. 
Several groups and individuals, including FamilyVoice Australia, Collective Shout and Cardinal George Pell, the Archbishop of Sydney, welcomed the decision. Monster Pictures, the Australian distributor of the film, criticised the decision and announced their intention to re-edit and re-submit the film for review. 
On 13 December 2011, the ACB classified a modified version of the film at R18+ for "high impact themes, violence and sexual violence". Monster Pictures expressed their "delight", and clarified that thirty seconds of the film had been "modified". They concluded that "this decision highlights the absurdity of Classification Review Board's decision to ban the film in the first place." 
Due to the reaction by Australian film authorities, the film was not submitted for theatrical distribution in New Zealand. However, in April 2012, the DVD version was classified as  "objectionable" (banned) by the New Zealand Office of Film & Literature Classification. 
The Human Centipede 2 (Full Sequence) opened at 45th place with $49,456, for an average of $2,748, in the 18 theaters where it premiered. With four theaters added the next weekend, the film dropped a modest 29.9% with $34,679. Its third weekend saw a 56.2% drop despite having two more theaters added. However, in its fourth weekend, the film lost 12 theaters, causing a 61.9% drop ($5,792). In its final weekend, it grossed $2,267, putting the movie's resting spot at #95 for the weekend. 
The film grossed $5,824 in Iceland and $1,511 in the United Kingdom. Released in Peru in April 2012, the horror picture grossed $21,111 there. At the end of its run, the film made $141,877, about half of what the previous installment had grossed. 
The film has a rating of 29% at Rotten Tomatoes based on 82 reviews, with a weighted average of 3.28/10. The site's consensus reads: "The Human Centipede II (Full Sequence) attempts to weave in social commentary but as the movie wears on, it loses its ability to repulse and shock and ends up obnoxious and annoying." At Metacritic, it rates 17 out of 100, indicating "overwhelming dislike", based on 22 reviews. 
Some reviewers found the extreme nature of the film boring. Robert Koehler, writing for Variety, found the gore so excessive that he termed it a form of lazy filmmaking. "More boring than stomach-churning, the film nevertheless contains scattered scenes and sequences so far beyond the tolerance of the squeamish that it can't be overstated; one, detailing the violent birth and death of a baby, is here simply to shock the most jaded of the jaded," he wrote. 
Roger Ebert, of the Chicago Sun-Times, who did not assign a star rating to the original, gave this film zero stars on review, calling it "reprehensible, dismaying, ugly, artless and an affront to any notion, however remote, of human decency." He would later name it the worst movie of 2011. 
In the UK, the reception of the film was just as hostile. Scott Weinberg and Catherine Shoard in The Guardian and Mark Kermode in The Observer praised the BBFC for heavily censoring the film, their only regret being that the BBFC could not make The Human Centipede 2 into a "better" film. 
Around late 2012, actor Dieter Laser and Six ended their legal battle about creative differences, which had been ongoing since March 2012. Laser and Harvey returned for the third film, which is set in the United States, and played new characters. Six had said that the film would star a "big American celebrity," have "a storyline that nobody would expect," and feature a centipede consisting of 500+ people. 
Filming commenced in May 2013, with Eric Roberts added to the cast. Other cast members include former pornographic actress Bree Olson, Robert LaSardo, and Tommy "Tiny" Lister, Jr.. Filming concluded in June, with the film taking place in a prison. The official tagline for the film is "100% Politically Incorrect." The Human Centipede 3 (Final Sequence) was released both theatrically and on video on demand on 22 May 2015. 
The Following lines run through Tirana. Some start at the city center near Skanderbeg Square (hence the name "Qender", meaning "Centre") or near the Clock Tower of Tirana.  
In anticipation of the construction of the two new multi-modal bus terminals near Kamza Overpass on the western entrance of Tirana, and near TEG Shopping Center in southeastern Tirana, inter-city lines depart from different locations around Tirana as follows: 
McPherson specializes in vacuum fabrication, ultraviolet optical systems, spectroscopic technique, and high resolution spectral test and measurement instrumentation. End-user and OEM applications include research, metrology, semiconductors, pharmaceuticals, nanotechnology, aerospace and defense. 
Today, McPherson instruments are employed in laboratory environments around the world, for spectroscopic analysis in the infrared, visible, vacuum ultraviolet, and soft x-ray regions. 
Additional patents (3,026,435) (3,161,769) (3,490,848) (3,433,557)3 for easily exchangeable optics, ultraviolet light sources and detectors have also been granted to McPherson. 
Chondrometopum arcuatum is a species of ulidiid or picture-winged fly in the genus Chondrometopum of the family Tephritidae. 
This article related to members of the insect family Ulidiidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
IslandWood is a non-profit environmental education organization with programs on Bainbridge Island, Seattle, and Woodinville in Washington.  
IslandWood runs the Graduate Program in Education for Environment and Community (EEC) which is offered in partnership with the University of Washington College of Education. 
In 2014, IslandWood partnered with Antioch University Seattle (AUS) to launch the Urban Environmental Education Program. In 2019, IslandWood and AUS ended their partnership, with AUS taking over the program. 
This Kitsap County, Washington state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to bobsleigh in Bulgaria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Iglesia Watawat ng Lahi, often considered as the original Rizalist group, was established on December 25, 1936.   Rev. Fr. Luis Fabrigar and Jose Baricanosa was the sect's first Supreme Bishop and president respectively. The founder od Iglesia Watawat ng Lahi was Arsenio Deguzman  
The sect's headquarters is located in Calamba, Laguna and has established 100 chapters throughout the Philippines. In the 1980s, the number of Rizalista converts was about 100,000 the highest amount in sect's history but within the same period, the group experienced a schism with four new groups seceding from the Iglesia Watawat ng Lahi. . 
The birth and death anniversary of Rizal are considered one of the most important holidays for the sect. During these days the sect celebrates Misa de Tres an elaborate celebration of flowers, flags, and parades. Gomburza Day, Bonifacio Day and other national holidays are also important holidays for the sect.  The sect also celebrates Christmas every October 3, the date they consider as the true birthday of Jesus Christ. 
During many religious celebrations, sect members often wear clothing with the colors of the Philippine flag. 
Finds from the area include a 12th-century silver finger ring, a bone comb, fragments of a lignite bracelet, skeletal remains from fields surrounding the church and an early 10th-century copper alloy and crutch-headed pin now in the British Museum. 
For more information see The Troubles in Kilmore, County Armagh, which includes a list of incidents in Kilmore during The Troubles resulting in two or more fatalities. 
The nearest GAA club to Kilmore is Ballyhegan Davitts GAC, one of the oldest clubs in County Armagh. 
This article related to the geography of County Armagh, Northern Ireland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
KALV-FM (101.5 MHz, "Live 101-5") is a commercial FM radio station in Phoenix, Arizona. It is owned by Audacy, Inc. and it airs a Top 40/CHR format. KALV-FM's studios are located in downtown Phoenix, and its transmitter is in South Mountain Park. (There is an AM station in Alva, Oklahoma, also using the KALV call letters but they are not related.) 
By 1989, EZ Communications had taken the station completely live and local with a Hot AC format as "The All New Magic 101." In May 1990, it moved to an AC format as KMXX ("Mix 101"). It was later sold to Sundance Broadcasting in 1992, and on July 31 of that year, it switched to AAA as KZON ("The Zone"). The "Zone" moniker would carry throughout its incarnations of modern rock, Modern AC, Adult Top 40 and back to modern rock in 2000 up until its flip to hot talk in January 2006. 
As of 2010, KZON has expanded its focus to include Dance and Pop tracks, overtaking KZZP and KKFR in the Arbitron PPMs. 
On February 2, 2017, CBS Radio announced it would merge with Entercom. The merger was approved on November 9, 2017, and was consummated on the 17th. 
The Jeep Wagoneer and the Jeep Grand Wagoneer are full-size SUVs produced by the North American division of Stellantis under the Jeep marque. Both vehicles were revealed in March 2021 for the 2022 model year. Production of the 2022 Jeep Wagoneer and Jeep Grand Wagoneer commenced in the first half of 2021 at Warren Truck Assembly. 
On December 5, 2019, spy shots surfaced of FCA testing a Jeep Wagoneer using a RAM 1500 body on frame SUV; it was not known at the time if there would be a Grand Wagoneer to accompany it at this point but later confirmed that there will be a long-wheelbase companion. Due to the 2020 COVID-19 pandemic, FCA delayed the start of production by at least three months, and was expected to debut this full-size version in early 2021 as a 2022 model. 
The standard Wagoneer model is equipped with rear-wheel-drive or an optional four-wheel-drive, while the Grand Wagoneer received four-wheel-drive as standard. The Quadra-Trac full-time four-wheel-drive system will also be addition to the lineup. 
Both the Wagoneer and the Grand Wagoneer will be offered in three trim levels: Series I, Series II, and Series III. Another trim level, Obsidian, will only be exclusive on the Grand Wagoneer. 
The fifth generation UConnect 5 infotainment suite is available in either 10.1" in the Wagoneer or 12" in the Grand Wagoneer. Both have high resolution displays. Other features include Amazon Alexa, wireless Apple CarPlay and Android Auto smartphone integration, SiriusXM Satellite Radio with 360L, SiriusXM Travel Link services, and SiriusXM-powered UConnect Guardian. An integrated virtual assistant is also available as an option. 
There are two McIntosh premium audio systems available on the Wagoneer and Grand Wagoneer: a 19-speaker system with 950-watt amplifier and 10" subwoofer, and a larger 23-speaker McIntosh system with 1,375-watt amplifier and 12" subwoofer. 
Stellantis' Torqueflite 8-speed automatic will be the exclusive transmission choice. It is based on the ZF 8HP transmission. 
Excalibur is a 1973 Arthurian fantasy novel by American writer Sanders Anne Laubenthal. It was first published by Ballantine Books as the sixtieth volume of the Ballantine Adult Fantasy series in August, 1973, and has been reprinted a number of times since. 
The novel is set in modern times against the background of the legendary Medieval Welsh colonization of Mobile, Alabama under the prince Madoc in the 12th century. The modern Pendragon, King Arthur's secret successor, must recover Arthur's famed sword Excalibur. 
John Clute praised Excalibur as "a powerful fantasy which conflates the matter of Britain with an American Gothic version of Mobile, Alabama." 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The Bristol Belle (G-AVTL) was the name given to the first modern hot air balloon in Britain. The balloon was created from an idea developed by members of the Bristol Gliding Club in the UK. Following developments by Ed Yost in the United States, members of the Bristol Gliding Club decided to create their own hot air balloon.  Bill Malpas (chairman of the project), Mark Westwood, Giles Bulmer of the Bulmer cider making family and Don Cameron were the four project creators. 
Three other members, Charles Meisl, a Czechoslovakian citizen, Tom Sage, a press photographer from London and Malcolm Brighton subsequently joined the group. Malcolm Brighton had built a number of balloons and became the main builder for the project. 
In the summer of 1966, the team went to Dunstable Air Day and saw a number of attempts at a hot air balloon flight by other teams. One, built by teacher Mr. Turner and students at Bolton Technical School, succeeded with a tethered flight before breaking free unintentionally and taking its pilot some distance before the pilot escaped unhurt, but with the balloon draped over a power line. The committee of the air day prohibited any further balloon take offs that day. 
The first flight of the Bristol Belle took place on 9 July 1967 from RAF Weston-on-the-Green, and was covered by the Daily Telegraph and other media. The balloon took part in some famous flights including one from HMS Ark Royal, where it was piloted by Lt Terry Adams, accompanied by Lt Howard Draper both of 849 Squadron, B Flight. This early morning launch carried mail to Malta while the Ark Royal was steaming off the southern coast of the island on 29 November 1970. 
Adelphicos latifasciatum, the Oaxaca burrowing snake, is a colubrid snake described by John D. Lynch and Hobart Muir Smith in 1966. 
In 2013, Lebanon was banned by FIBA in all sanctioned events after political interventions in Lebanese basketball. Therefore, Lebanon didn't participate in the 2013 FIBA Asia Championship missing the chance to qualify to the 2014 FIBA Basketball World Cup for the fourth time in a row. The ban was then removed in early 2014 after the election of a new basketball federation. 
In the William Jones Cup, Lebanon finished second overall two times, in 2007 and 2010, and third once, in 2009.[citation needed] 
Lebanon originally qualified for the tournament after placing second in the 2013 West Asian Basketball Championship.  
Opposition: Iraq (21 February) Venue: Nouhad Nawfal Sports Complex, Zouk Mikael Opposition: Bahrain (24 February) Venue: Nouhad Nawfal Sports Complex, Zouk Mikael 
The coat of arms or national seal of Belize was adopted upon independence, and the current coat of arms is only slightly different from that used when Belize was a British colony (the Union Jack has been removed, and a Mestizo woodcutter has replaced one of the supporting Afro-Belizean woodcutters). 
The circular border of the coat is formed by 25 leaves. Within the circle is a mahogany tree, in front of which is a shield tierced per pall inverted.  Within the shield are the tools of a woodcutter in the upper sections and a ship in the lower one.  These are symbolic of the importance of mahogany in the 18th- and 19th-century Belizean economy. 
The Irish Women Workers' Union was a trade union which was set up at a meeting on 5 September 1911 in Dublin,  Ireland. The meeting had been organized by Delia Larkin. The union was created because other trade unions of the time excluded women workers. 
The union's membership peaked at 6,000 in 1955, then continually fell until it merged into the Federated Workers' Union of Ireland in 1984. 
The wolves in Wolf's Rain use illusions to give themselves a human appearance, enabling them to blend into the human world and escape detection. The wolves always retain their true nature, neither thinking nor acting as the true humans in the world do. 
Mumuni Adams was a Ghanaian politician. He was the member of parliament for the Wala constituency from 1965 to 1966. 
Adams was born in 1907 at Wa, the capital of the Upper West Region of Ghana. He was educated at the Wa Government School where he studied from 1917 to 1925. 
The oldest part of the building dates from the 15th century in Valencian Gothic style, but was restored and turned into a sanctuary by the Society of Jesus. It is attached to the wall that surrounds the city and has two gates, a Gothic one and one from the Renaissance. 
Its remarkable interior has some interesting spaces, like the Golden Gallery, made in Baroque style, and the Crown Hall. 
This article about a railroad station in Punjab, Pakistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gerton is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) in Henderson County, North Carolina, United States. As of the 2010 census it had a population of 254. It is part of the Asheville Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
Fire protection is provided by Gerton Fire and Rescue, which has a class 4 DOI rating.[citation needed] 
Soy curls are a meat alternative created and sold by Butler Foods LLC, based in Grand Ronde, Oregon. The product is made from non-GMO soybeans that have not been sprayed with chemical pesticides. Once cooked, the curls have a unique texture and flavor, similar to that of chicken. Other comparable products are seitan and tempeh. 
To prepare, the soy curls have to be first rehydrated by soaking in warm water for 10 minutes. Then they are drained, added to a skillet, seasoned, and cooked until lightly browned. 
 Ben Chebet Kipruto (born 22 February 1982) is a Kenyan long-distance runner who competes professionally in marathon races. He is coached by Italian trainer Claudio Berardelli. He has a personal best time of 2:09:26 hours for the marathon distance and has won a number races in Europe, including the Italian Marathon, Florence Marathon and Maratona di Sant'Antonio in Padua. 
The Roman Catholic Diocese of Fidenza (Latin: Dioecesis Fidentina) in the Province of Parma, Italy, was until 1927 named the Diocese of Borgo San Donnino. It is now a suffragan of the Metropolitan Archdiocese of Modena-Nonantola, though historically it was long subject to the Archdiocese of Bologna. 
The diocese has a Minor Basilica, the Basilica di San Lorenzo, in Monticelli d'Ongina; it was assigned that honor on 9 January 1942. 
In 1199 a long and bloody war was in progress between Parma and Piacenza over Borgo San Donnino. Pope Innocent III rallied the bishops of Lombardy and wrote threateningly to both combatants, attempting to force them to make peace. But the Pope also asserted Church ownership of the Borgo, and claimed the right to assign its civil jurisdiction. 
To provide income to support the administration of the new diocese, the Pope transferred territory from the diocese of Cremona situated south of the Po and adjacent to the diocese of Piacenza, to the diocese of Borgo San Donnino. This included Busseto, Polesine Parmense, and Monticelli d'Ogina. 
In the papal consistory of 8 January 1603 Pope Clement VIII appointed the last provost, Papiro Picedi da Castel Vezzano, to be the first Bishop of Borgo San Donnino. A brief  (breve) addressed to him  on the same day informed him of his appointment, recalling that  Picedi had been a priest of the diocese of Luni-Sarzana; that he held the degree of Doctor in utroque iure; that he had been a Referendary of the Two Signatures (judge in the Roman Curia); and that he was a familiaris of the Pope. 
The diocese also had three collegiate churches: Insigne de Busseto (5 Canons), Monticelli d'Ongina (4 Canons), and Pieve Ottoville (4 canons). 
In 1828, Bishop Aloisio San Vitale was assigned the task and the honor of creating the new diocese of Guastalla by Pope Leo XII. The Pope also consecrated the first bishop of Bishop of Guastalla, Giovanni Tommaso Neuschel, who later became Bishop of Borgo San Donnino on Bishop San Vitale's death. 
In 1885, the Cathedral Chapter consisted of four dignities (Archdeacon, Archpriest, Primicerius, and Penitentiarius) and eight Canons. The diocesan seminary was headed by a priest who was also the Vicar General of the diocese, and it had five professors and two masters; there were thirty-eight students. 
During World War II, in May 1944, Fidenza was bombed, and on 2 May the Episcopal Palace was hit. There was heavy damage to the diocesan archives. On 13 May another attack destroyed the Episcopal Palace and the Seminary. On 29 January 1948, Bishop Francesco Giberti opened the drive to rebuild the Seminary. 
The most famous native son of Borgo San Donnino was Cardinal Innocenzo Ciocchi del Monte, the adopted nephew of Pope Julius III. 
A diocesan synod was an irregular but important meeting of the bishop of a diocese and his clergy. Its purpose was (1) to proclaim generally the various decrees already issued by the bishop; (2) to discuss and ratify measures on which the bishop chose to consult with his clergy; (3) to publish statutes and decrees of the diocesan synod, of the provincial synod, and of the Holy See. 
The women's single sculls competition at the 2020 Summer Paralympics in Tokyo took place at the Sea Forest Waterway. 
Health Oriented Preventive Education (HOPE) is a Pakistan NGO which provides the poor with service in the sectors of health and education, particularly focusing on women and children. Founded in July 1997, it is mainly based in Karachi, the largest city in Pakistan, and its vicinity, but is working nationwide through its offices. 
For the health care services, HOPE runs several medical centers, providing primary health care services for those who cannot afford private hospitals. Some other services are also involved: nutrition support for malnourished mothers and children, distribution of water-purifying agent for the access to safe water, ante-natal care for reducing maternal mortality rate, etc. 
HOPE also arranges emergency relief in the case of floods or earthquake. For example, when the 2008 Ziarat earthquake (a doublet earthquake) occurred, several relief operations were conducted by HOPE team consisted of doctors, paramedics, and social workers. HOPE provided food, proof tents, and clothes as well as medical care, and more than 6000 people were stood to benefit. 
The following is a partial list of minor planets, running from minor-planet number 461001 through 462000, inclusive. The primary data for this and other partial lists is based on JPL's "Small-Body Orbital Elements" and "Data Available from the Minor Planet Center". A detailed description of the table's columns and additional sources are given on the main page including a complete list of every page in this series, and a statistical break-up on the dynamical classification of minor planets. 
Also see the summary list of all named bodies in numerical and alphabetical order, and the corresponding naming citations for the number range of this particular list. Note that new namings may only be added to this list after official publication, as the preannouncement of names is condemned by the Working Group Small Body Nomenclature of the International Astronomical Union. 
"Nobody Else" is a song by American singer Tyrese Gibson. It was written by Gibson along with Jake Carter, Trevor Job, Joe Sayles, and Kevin Scott for his self-titled debut studio album (1998), while production was helmed by Carter. Released as his debut with RCA Records, the single reached number 36 on the Billboard Hot 100 and number 12 on the Hot R&B/Hip-Hop Songs chart. 
Here, Alice     ( A )   {\displaystyle (A)}   initiates the communication to Bob     B   {\displaystyle B}  .     S   {\displaystyle S}   is a server trusted by both parties. In the communication: 
The protocol is vulnerable to a replay attack (as identified by Denning and Sacco). If an attacker uses an older, compromised value for      K  A B     {\displaystyle K_{AB}}  , he can then replay the message     {  K  A B   , A  }   K  B S       {\displaystyle \{K_{AB},A\}_{K_{BS}}}   to Bob, who will accept it, being unable to tell that the key is not fresh. 
This flaw is fixed in the Kerberos protocol by the inclusion of a timestamp. It can also be fixed with the  use of nonces as described below. At the beginning of the protocol: 
Here, Alice     ( A )   {\displaystyle (A)}   and Bob     ( B )   {\displaystyle (B)}   use a trusted server     ( S )   {\displaystyle (S)}   to distribute public keys on request. These keys are: 
At the end of the protocol,     A   {\displaystyle A}   and     B   {\displaystyle B}   know each other's identities, and know both      N  A     {\displaystyle N_{A}}   and      N  B     {\displaystyle N_{B}}  . These nonces are not known to eavesdroppers. 
This protocol is vulnerable to a man-in-the-middle attack. If an impostor     I   {\displaystyle I}   can persuade     A   {\displaystyle A}   to initiate a session with them, they can relay the messages to     B   {\displaystyle B}   and convince     B   {\displaystyle B}   that he is communicating with     A   {\displaystyle A}  . 
Ignoring the traffic to and from     S   {\displaystyle S}  , which is unchanged, the attack runs as follows: 
At the end of the attack,     B   {\displaystyle B}   falsely believes that     A   {\displaystyle A}   is communicating with him, and that      N  A     {\displaystyle N_{A}}   and      N  B     {\displaystyle N_{B}}   are known only to     A   {\displaystyle A}   and     B   {\displaystyle B}  . 
and the intruder cannot successfully replay the message because A is expecting a message containing the identity of I whereas the message will have identity of B. 
On December 18, 1856, he married Princess Atsu, adopted daughter of Shimazu Nariakira and Konoe Tadahiro. She was known as Midaidokoro Atsuko (first-wife Atsuko). 
On October 21, 1857, Iesada received American ambassador Townsend Harris in an audience at Edo Castle. 
Under Hotta Masayoshi's advice, Iesada ultimately signed the Harris Treaty of 1858 (the Treaty of Amity and Commerce between Japan and the United States), and subsequently other Unequal Treaties (including the Anglo-Japanese Friendship Treaty, and Anglo-Japanese Treaty of Amity and Commerce) which broke the sakoku (isolation) policy and opened Japan to foreign influences. 
A widespread cholera outbreak from 1858 to 1860 is believed to have killed between 100,000 and 200,000 people in Edo alone. Iesada died childless in 1858, possibly from the cholera outbreak. His grave is at the Tokugawa clan temple of Kan'ei-ji in Ueno. His buddhist name was Onkyoin. 
West of Memphis is a 2012 New Zealand-American documentary film directed and co-written by Amy J. Berg, produced by Peter Jackson and Damien Echols, and released in the US by Sony Pictures Classics to critical acclaim. It received a nomination for Best Documentary Screenplay from the Writers Guild of America. 
As with the Paradise Lost film and its two sequels, West of Memphis follows the events of the West Memphis Three, a case in which three teenagers (Jessie Misskelley, Damien Echols and Jason Baldwin) were arrested for the murders of three 8-year-old children. 
West of Memphis premiered at the Sundance Film Festival on January 21, 2012, at the Deauville American Film Festival on September 2, 2012, and at the Toronto International Film Festival on September 8, 2012. 
Film critic Philip French of The Observer called West of Memphis "riveting", and a "shocking indictment of the American criminal justice system and a tribute to the dedication of selfless civil rights lawyers and their supporters from all over the world". 
Roger Ebert of Chicago Sun-Times gave the film a perfect four star rating, writing: "Do we need a fourth film? Yes, I think we do. If you only see one of them, this is the one to choose, because it has the benefit of hindsight." 
In 2012, he also won the 10,000m European Cup in Bilbao, setting a new personal best in the event. That year, he won the European 10,000 m title also. At the same European Championships, he also won the bronze medal in the 5,000 m. At the 2013 Mediterranean Games held in Mersin, Turkey, he became gold medalist in the 10,000 m event. 
In 2016, he won the European 10,000 m title again, and set a new personal best in the 10000 m at the 2016 Summer Olympics. 
In 2019, he competed in the men's marathon at the 2019 World Athletics Championships held in Doha, Qatar. He did not finish his race. 
Fort Sullivan (briefly Fort Sherbrooke) was a 19th-century military fortification in Eastport, Maine.  It lay opposite New Brunswick, Canada, and served as an important coastal defense for the easternmost United States of America during the 19th century. As part of the establishment of New Ireland during the War of 1812,  British Commodore Sir Thomas Hardy, 1st Baronet conquered the fort in 1814 and renamed it Fort Sherbrooke  after John Coape Sherbrooke, the Governor of Nova Scotia. 
In 1808, the United States Army decided to build a fort in Eastport, Massachusetts (now Maine), to protect against possible threats from Britain and other European powers then engaged in warfare.  In 1808 or 1809, Major Lemuel Trescott oversaw the construction of the garrison atop Clark's Hill in the village.  The fort contained a four-gun circular earthwork, a wooden blockhouse, and barracks.  Fort Sullivan reportedly took its name circa March 1813. 
Two active battalions of the Regular Army (1-5 Inf and 2-5 Inf) perpetuate the lineage of the old 40th Infantry Regiment, which was on garrison duty at Fort Sullivan when it was captured by the British. 
The Army stationed officer Nathaniel Dana in the 1st U.S. Artillery at Fort Sullivan on 15 April 1822, when and where his wife bore his son, future major general Napoleon Jackson Tecumseh Dana. 
First Lieutenant George Sears Greene, who would serve as a major general in the Union Army during the American Civil War and was noted for his defense of Culp's Hill at the Battle of Gettysburg, commanded Fort Sullivan from 1831 until 1835.  Tragically, Greene's wife and three children died of tuberculosis during his assignment to Fort Sullivan.  
During American Civil War, the Army constructed earthwork batteries in the area.  Company C of the Maine Coast Guard mustered in at Eastport on 16 May 1864, stationed at Fort Sullivan, and mustered out 6 September 1865, under Captain Thomas P. Hutchinson. 
In 1873, the Army ceased using and occupying Fort Sullivan.  In 1877, the government sold the property at Fort Sullivan.  The new owners moved the northernmost barracks quarters to its present location at 74 Washington Street.  Other parts of the fort collapsed over time.  Ruins of an old powder magazine still exist off McKinley Street, and are the only surviving in situ remains of the fort. 
The Border Historical Society now owns and operates one of the remaining early 19th century officers quarters as the Barracks Museum, a site listed in National Register of Historic Places listings in Washington County, Maine.  Exhibits include the history of Fort Sullivan, the area sardine and ground fishing industries, local history and genealogy. The museum is open in July and August. 
Minami Ishida (born 14 May 1991) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a defender for WE League club Nojima Stella Kanagawa Sagamihara. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Kazakhstani sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Funky 4 + 1 was an American hip hop group from The Bronx, New York, composed of  Jazzy Jeff, Sharon Green, D.J. Breakout, Guy Williams, Keith Keith, The Voice of K.K. and Rodney Stone. The latter two members also performed together as the duo Double Trouble, notably in the film Wild Style. They were the first hip hop group to receive a record deal, as well as the first to perform live on national television. The group was also notable for being the first to have a woman MC, Sha-Rock. 
 "That's the Joint" was interpolated from A Taste of Honey's "Rescue Me". Music critic Robert Christgau of The Village Voice named it the best song of the 1980s. In his 1981 review of the single, Christgau gave it an A rating and wrote of its musical significance:
 Funky 4 + 1 was the first hip hop group to appear on a national television show; on February 14 (Valentine's Day) 1981 they performed on Saturday Night Live hosted by Blondie's Deborah Harry. 
The group was subsequently asked by Harry to open up for Blondie on tour, but were forbidden to do so by Sugarhill Records' CEO, Sylvia Robinson. 
NOTE: Rahiem would later join Grandmaster Flash & the Furious Five, while Smith & Stone left in 1981 to form as a duo known as Double Trouble. 
This biographical article related to Romanian team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Along with writing manuscripts, Lawrence combined his civic and teaching career, composing letters on behalf of the university at Paris. His most significant letter was addressed to the pope, requesting a studium of Greek, Arabic, and Tartar be established (Jensen 1973). 
After a distinguished academic and civic career, scholars assume Lawrence died of old age sometime after 1304. 
To model the epistolary style to students and to complement his treatises, Lawrence wrote many letters. The letters exist in two fourteenth-century collections in manuscript form. 
The men's halfpipe event in snowboarding at the 2006 Winter Olympics was held in Bardonecchia, a village in the Province of Turin, Italy. Competition took place on 12 February 2006. 
The halfpipe event for men took place on 12 February 2006, both the qualification rounds and the finals taking place on that day. Forty-four snowboarders took part in the qualification, the top twelve of whom move on to the finals. 
Allium roseum, commonly called rosy garlic, is an edible, Old World species of wild garlic. It is native to the Mediterranean region and nearby areas, with a natural range extending from Portugal and Morocco to Turkey and the Palestine region. It is cultivated widely, and has become naturalised in scattered locations in other regions outside its natural range. 
The smell and flavour of the bulb is powerful enough to drive squirrels and browsing deer away from gardens, where they are planted as ornamental flowers. For this reason, they are suitable as companion plants to tulips and similar species. 
Allium roseum was originally described and published by Carl Linnaeus in his Species Plantarum in 1753. 
Numerous names have been proposed at the subspecies and varietal levels within the species, but only a few are currently accepted: 
Henricus cuspis is a species of moth of the family Tortricidae. It is found in Carchi Province, Ecuador. 
The species name refers to the sharp ventroterminal processes of the aedeagus and is derived from Greek cuspis (meaning point). 
Chapman received a kidney transplant in July 2010. The actor suffers from severe hypertension and had been undergoing dialysis treatments prior to the transplant.  Due to his battle with his kidney disease, on March 31, 2010, Chapman signed on to be a spokesperson for the National Kidney Foundation. 
Chapman has created his own series of YouTube videos known as "Grizz Chroniclez" featuring him in variety sketches. In 2012, he was in production with writers Sam Morgan and Chadwick Prima for his own series called The Lair, based on the comic store Chapman owns in the Bronx. 
Bourjoly is a village in the Pestel commune of the Corail Arrondissement, in the Grand'Anse department of Haiti. 
The Wills River is a river of the southern West Coast region of New Zealand's South Island. It flows west to reach the Haast River 10 kilometres north of the Haast Pass. 
The river was named by Julius von Haast when he searched for a crossing from Otago to the West Coast. It is named for William John Wills of the Burke and Wills expedition. The nearby Burke River is named for Robert O'Hara Burke. 
"Place name detail: Wills River". New Zealand Gazetteer. New Zealand Geographic Board. Retrieved 12 July 2009. 
This article about a river in the West Coast, New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
William A. Veech was the Edgar O. Lovett Professor of Mathematics at Rice University until his death.  His research concerned dynamical systems; he is particularly known for his work on interval exchange transformations, and is the namesake of the Veech surface. He died unexpectedly on August 30, 2016 in Houston, Texas. 
Veech graduated from Dartmouth College in 1960, and earned his Ph.D. in 1963 from Princeton University under the supervision of Salomon Bochner. 
The Veech surface and the related Veech group are named after Veech, as is the Veech dichotomy according to which geodesic flow on the Veech surface is either periodic or ergodic. 
Veech played a role in the Nobel-prize-winning discovery of buckminsterfullerene in 1985 by a team of Rice University chemists including Richard Smalley. At that time, Veech was chair of the Rice mathematics department, and was asked by Smalley to identify the shape that the chemists had determined for this molecule. Veech answered, "I could explain this to you in a number of ways, but what you've got there, boys, is a soccer ball." 
The Kenyan High Commissioner in London is the official representative of the Government in Nairobi to the Government of the United Kingdom. 
KMFM Shepway and White Cliffs Country is an Independent Local Radio station serving the districts of Dover and Folkestone and Hythe (previously known as Shepway) and the surrounding areas in Kent, South East England. It is the South Kent region of the KMFM radio network (owned by the KM Group), containing local advertisements and sponsorships for the area amongst a countywide schedule of programming. 
The station has been referred to by many names. Its official name is "KMFM Shepway and White Cliffs Country", however the website previously described it as "KMFM Dover and Folkestone", and on air it was referred to as "Shepway's KMFM". 
KMFM Shepway and White Cliffs Country launched on 29 September 1997 as Neptune Radio, broadcasting on 96.4 and 106.8 FM after a month-long trial concluded earlier that same morning. 
The station's roots extend to the 1970s, where it began as pirate radio station Channel Radio, which only broadcast in the Dover area. Run by Dover native Eddie Austin, who previously worked at Radio Caroline, the station was fined numerous times, but Austin maintained it until the town received its own radio licence. 
The station won the UK Radio Station of the Year award twice, in 1999 and 2000, and reached approximately 30,000 listeners each week (a 24% share of the audience). After being bought by Radio Investments Ltd, its successful format was applied to its sister stations Arrow FM in Hastings and Sovereign Radio in Eastbourne. A group, spearheaded by Neptune Radio disc jockey Mark Carter, also applied for the Ashford licence under the name Ashford FM, but they did not gain the licence. 
The station was purchased by the KM Group in 2001 and started programme sharing at weekends with other KM-owned stations in Kent. It was subsequently re-branded to KMFM Shepway and White Cliffs Country in 2003. The KM Group relocated the station from premises on Church Street in Dover to their Folkestone offices for the Kentish Express in Sandgate Road. 
The company was reawarded the licence for the station in July 2008. In April 2009, KMFM were granted permission by Ofcom to move the studios to their building in Ashford, although the sales team remains in Folkestone. Following the arrival of the county-wide breakfast, all KMFM programming is now broadcast from Medway. 
In June 2010 the Breakfast Show was presented live from the Folkestone Multi-Cultural Festival with several guests and show crew. 
Like the rest of the KMFM network, the station was relaunched in September 2010 with new jingles, schedule changes and more emphasis on music. 
The KMFM network switched to a contemporary hit radio format in 2012 following the merging of KMFM Extra with KMFM. The music now focuses mainly on Top 40 hits, and contains a lot more dance and R&B than before. 
All programming across the KMFM network is now shared across all seven stations following OFCOM approval in February 2012. The local breakfast show, by then the only local show on the station, was replaced by a county-wide show on 12 March 2012. 
News bulletins come from the KMFM News Centre in the Medway studios on the hour from 6am - 6pm on weekdays, and 8am - 1pm at weekends. National news bulletins come from Sky News Radio outside these times. Traffic and travel updates are broadcast just before the hour, and every 20 minutes between 7am - 9am and 4pm - 7pm. 
"One More Time" is a song by Australian rock musician, Diesel. It was ireleased as the fifth and final single from his debut album Hepfidelity (1992). It peaked at number 59 in Australia and 39 in New Zealand.  
Giger's first success was when H. H. Kunz, co-owner of Switzerland's first poster publishing company, printed and distributed Giger's first posters, beginning in 1969. 
Giger had a relationship with Swiss actress Li Tobler until she died by suicide in 1975. Tobler's image appears in many of his paintings. He married Mia Bonzanigo in 1979; they divorced a year and a half later. 
Giger started with small ink drawings before progressing to oil paintings. For most of his career, he worked predominantly in airbrush, creating monochromatic canvasses depicting surreal, nightmarish dreamscapes. He also worked with pastels, markers and ink. 
Giger directed a number of films, including Swiss Made (1968), Tagtraum (1973), Giger's Necronomicon (1975) and Giger's Alien (1979). 
Giger created furniture designs, particularly the Harkonnen Capo Chair for a film of the novel Dune that was to be directed by Alejandro Jodorowsky. Many years later, David Lynch directed the film, using only rough concepts by Giger. Giger had wished to work with Lynch, as he stated in one of his books that Lynch's film Eraserhead was closer than even Giger's own films to realizing his vision. 
Giger's art has greatly influenced tattooists and fetishists worldwide. Under a licensing deal Ibanez guitars released an H. R. Giger signature series: the Ibanez ICHRG2, an Ibanez Iceman, features "NY City VI", the Ibanez RGTHRG1 has "NY City XI" printed on it, the S Series SHRG1Z has a metal-coated engraving of "Biomechanical Matrix" on it, and a 4-string SRX bass, SRXHRG1, has "N.Y. City X" on it. 
Giger is often referred to in popular culture, especially in science fiction and cyberpunk. William Gibson (who wrote an early script for Alien 3) seems particularly fascinated: A minor character in Virtual Light, Lowell, is described as having New York XXIV tattooed across his back, and in Idoru a secondary character, Yamazaki, describes the buildings of nanotech Japan as Giger-esque.[citation needed] 
In addition to his awards, Giger was recognized by a variety of festivals and institutions. On the one year anniversary of his death, the Museum of Arts and Design in New York City staged the series The Unseen Cinema of HR Giger in May 2015. 
Dark Star: H. R. Giger's World, a biographical documentary by Belinda Sallin, debuted 27 September 2014 in Zurich, Switzerland. 
The following is a list of Polish generals, that is the people who held the rank of general, as well as those who acted as de facto generals by commanding a division or brigade. 
Note that until the Partitions of Poland of late 18th century the rank of general as such was mostly (though not exclusively) reserved for commanders of artillery, while large tactical units (equivalent of divisions) were usually commanded by hetmans and voivodes. 
The union was founded in 1978, when the Danish Clothing Workers' Union merged with the Danish Textile Workers' Union.  Like its predecessors, the union affiliated to the Danish Confederation of Trade Unions (LO).  In 1983, it absorbed the Danish Shoemakers' Union.  By 1996, the union had 17,229 members, of whom 76% were women.  At the end of 1997, it merged into the Danish General Workers' Union. 
Hosty v. Carter was a 2005 decision by the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit that limited the free press rights of college newspapers. 
In October 2000, the editor of Governors State University's student newspaper, The Innovator, was told by Dean Patricia Carter to hold future issues until they were approved of by a school administrator, because it had published stories and editorials critical of the administration. This was done despite a policy stating that student newspaper staff would "determine content and format of their respective publications without censorship or advance approval." 
Journalists Margaret Hosty, Jeni Porche, and Steven Barba filed suit against the University and Dean Carter in January 2001. A federal district court allowed the case to go forward in November 2001. The school appealed in early 2002. 
The court of appeals held that college newspapers could be subject to the same amount of school control allowed under Hazelwood v. Kuhlmeier (1988) for high school newspapers. 
The revolutionary ideologies dedicated to the overthrow of Porfirio Diaz were often detailed in newspapers written by revolutionary journalists who sometimes wrote under pseudonyms. Many of these journalists were women who incorporated feminist ideals into their revolutionary rhetoric. Included in these feminist revolutionary journalists were Juana Gutierrez, Dolores Jimenez y Muro, Elisa Acufia y Rosette, and Ines Malvaez. 
Juana Gutierrez, Dolores Jimenez y Muro, Elisa Acufia y Rosette, and Ines Malvaez were eventually jailed by the Porfiriato for their revolutionary writings and activism. It was during their time in jail that these feminists joined together united by their similar beliefs and passion for activism and founded Hijas de Cuauhtemoc. 
The organization was known for collecting 1,000 signatures that called for Porfirio Diaz to step down and for the Mexican government to hold a truly free election. 
They are also known to have been a part of a peaceful demonstration during which protesters placed flowers on the graves of those who had died during the often violent revolutionary struggle for independence. Many of these peaceful protesters were arrested 
This biographical article related to a Malaysian swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Matthew Chou Bowman (born May 31, 1991) is an American professional baseball pitcher for the New York Yankees organization.  He previously played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the St. Louis Cardinals and Cincinnati Reds. 
Bowman attended St. Albans School in Washington, D.C. As a senior he was All-Met Player of the Year and All-Conference as a shortstop and right-handed pitcher, and had a 0.70 ERA as a pitcher and a .419 average as a batter. 
On November 2, 2018, Bowman was claimed off waivers by the Cincinnati Reds. He began the 2019 season with the Louisville Bats, and was promoted to the Reds in May. Bowman underwent Tommy John surgery in mid-September 2020. On October 14, 2020, Bowman was outrighted off of the roster. Bowman elected free agency two days later on a October 16. 
On December 14, 2020, Bowman signed a two-year minor league contract with the New York Yankees organization. 
In 2012, Idling published his debut novel, Song for an Approaching Storm, to critical acclaim. The book was nominated for the August Prize, the Dublin Literary Award and is being translated into seven languages. 
His third book, the novel Julia & Paul, was published in 2017. It was followed a year later by 17 April 1975. A Cambodian Journey, written together with the Italian photographer Giovanna Silva. 
A further spot was available through relegation/promotion play-offs, which was eventually taken by 16th placed 2nd Bundesliga team FC Hansa Rostock after losing on aggregate score against FC Ingolstadt 04. 
The following players were nominated as the 3. Liga Player of the season, with Alexander Esswein announced as the winner on 3 June after a public vote. 
Effler is a community in McDowell County, West Virginia, United States. Effler was incorporated into the town of Anawalt. 
This article about a location in McDowell County, West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Laura Ruohonen (born October 9, 1960, in Helsinki, Finland) is a Finnish playwright and theatre director. She works also as Professor of Dramaturgy in Theatre Academy of Finland. 
Pottymouth is the debut studio album by the American punk rock band Bratmobile, released on June 8, 1993 by Kill Rock Stars. 
AllMusic reviewer Stewart Mason felt that Pottymouth "is about the early-'90s indie scene, about the D.I.Y. life in the post-Nirvana age where it seemed like anything could happen." Prominent music critic Robert Christgau of The Village Voice praised the songs "Throwaway" and "No You Don't". In January 1994, Spin placed Pottymouth in its list of 10 Best Albums of the Year You Didn't Hear. 
Ira Robbins wrote approvingly in Trouser Press: "Mustering 17 songs (including a relatively protracted bash at the Runaways' seminal "Cherry Bomb") in under a half-hour, the album is like a slap in the face: it's over before you realize what you're feeling but its sting lasts a good long while." 
Davis was born in Montgomery, Alabama, on February 10, 1889, into a family of limited means. His father was a policeman. He claimed to be a relative of Cecil Rhodes on his mother's side and of Jefferson Davis on his father's side, assertions which remain unproven. He held menial positions on railroad trains and eventually became a locomotive engineer. 
He was involved in many legal battles in the course of his career. In one instance, a British judge called him "an unscrupulous and ruthless financier" and said "I do not accept him as a witness of truth." 
During the 1940 U.S. elections, Davis used funds provided by the German government to contribute approximately $160,000 to a Pennsylvania Democratic organization to help defeat Sen. Joseph Guffey, a Democrat and a prominent critic of Germany, and to bribe the Pennsylvania delegation to the 1940 Democratic National Convention to vote against Roosevelt, moves which both failed.  The German government allocated $5 million, stored at the German embassy, to support Davis's efforts. 
On December 31, 1940, in reaction to Davis's role in forming and financing the No Foreign Wars Committee, U.S. Senator Josh Lee (D-OK) said Davis' support of the new group represented "the diabolically cunning betrayal of the American people." He continued: 
The record of this man Davis shows conclusively the great financial stake he has in a complete Nazi victory in the European war. Much of the gasoline sending showers of fiery death into the defenseless heart of London was sold to the German government by this man Davis.... He is still trying to promote a phony peace through the White House to pull Nazi Germany's chestnuts out of the fire.... The No Foreign Wars Committee is a timely object lesson in the technique of all Nazi infiltration.
Davis asserted his loyalty to the United States and said he hoped a negotiated peace could end the war. He distanced himself from Marshall and the No Foreign War Committee while expressing sympathy for its aims. He asked Sen. Burton Wheeler, a prominent isolationist, to call him before a Senate committee so he could defend himself against "an organized nation-wide campaign ... by financial and  competitive interests". 
On January 7, he was subpoenaed to testify before a Washington, DC, grand jury investigating campaign expenditures  for violations of the Hatch and the Corrupt Practices Acts during the 1940 presidential campaign. The same day, Wheeler scheduled Davis to testify before the Senate Interstate Commerce Subcommittee about the "peace place" described by Marshall. Davis testified before the grand jury on January 9. 
In mid-1941, Josephus Daniels, who as U.S. Ambassador to Mexico had firsthand knowledge of his Davis' business and political dealings, was quoted describing how Davis was viewed when he first began trading Mexican oil: 
Some people regarded Davis as a profiteer; others as a man who would furnish needed markets for Mexican oil; and others as a ... Nazi agent or as a crook. In reality, he was a composite of each of these descriptions.
A document in the papers of British Security Coordination, the British intelligence center headquartered in New York City, records that Davis was involved in a scheme to provide fuel in support of Nazi Germany's attacks on Atlantic shipping and that "The swiftest way to put a stop to this scheme was to remove Davis from the scene." Davis' biographer assesses the motives and opportunities of all who would have benefited from Davis' death and concludes that he likely died of heart problems. 
Davis died of a heart attack in Houston, Texas, on August 2, 1941. At the time, Davis was the head or principal of approximately 20 companies headquartered in New York City, with holdings and operations in several states of the United States and several other countries, including Mexico and Sweden. 
A few years after his death, Davis was named in Assistant U.S. Attorney General O. John Rogge's Nazi Report. It identified him as Abwehr agent C-80, not a spy but an "agent of influence" whose activities were financed with the personal approval of Hitler, and who in that role supplied petroleum to Nazi Germany and helped Germany try to influence U.S. politics. 
The United States government released captured Nazi government documents in 1957 showing how Davis funneled Nazi funds into the 1940 U.S. elections. 
In 1909, Davis had a son, William Rhodes, Jr., by May Tankin. Their marriage has not been documented. William Rhodes, Jr., died in an airplane crash in Nicaragua in 1933 while exploring for oil. Davis married Pearl Peters in 1921 and they had two sons, Joseph Graham Davis and Currie Boyd Davis. Davis later divorced Peters and married Marie M. Tomkunas. 
Joseph Graham Davis married Doris Meyer on November 29, 1941. Their eldest child, Joseph Graham "Gray" Davis, Jr., was Governor of California from 1999 to 2003. 
The Cuban chimaera (Chimaera cubana) is a species of fish in the family Chimaeridae. It is found in Colombia, Cuba, and Puerto Rico. Its natural habitat is open seas. It is threatened by habitat loss. 
On 28 December 2016, Aleksandrov signed with Montana for 6 months plus another year as club's option. On 29 December 2017, his contract was terminated by mutual consent. 
This biographical article related to association football in Bulgaria, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Considering the benandanti to be "a fertility cult", Ginzburg draws parallels with similar visionary traditions found throughout the Alps and also from the Baltic, such as that of the Livonian werewolf, and also to the widespread folklore surrounding the Wild Hunt. He furthermore argues that these Late Medieval and Early Modern accounts represent surviving remnants of a pan-European, pre-Christian shamanistic belief concerning the fertility of the crops. 
In the Archepiscopal Archives of Udine, Ginzburg came across the 16th and 17th century trial records which documented the interrogation of several benandanti and other folk magicians. Historian John Martin of Trinity University in San Antonio, Texas would later characterize this lucky find as the sort of "discovery most historians only dream of." 
The Night Battles is divided into four chapters, preceded by a preface written by Ginzburg, in which he discusses the various scholarly approaches that have been taken to studying Early Modern witchcraft, including the rationalist interpretation that emerged in the 18th century and the Witch-cult hypothesis presented by Margaret Murray. He proceeds to offer an introduction to the benandanti, and then thanks those who have helped him in producing his study. 
"I am a benandante because I go with the others to fight four times a year, that is during the Ember Days, at night; I go invisibly in spirit and the body remains behind; we go forth in the service of Christ, and the witches of the devil; we fight each other, we with bundles of fennel and they with sorghum stalks." 
Ginzburg then makes comparisons between the benandanti and the Perchtenlaufen, an Alpine ceremony in which two masked groups of peasants battled one another with sticks, one dressed to appear ugly and the other to appear beautiful. Debating as to whether the traditions surrounding the processions of the dead originated in Germanic or Slavic Europe, Ginzburg then goes on to discuss the significance of the caul in benandanti belief. 
In Ginzburg's analysis, the benandanti were a "fertility cult" whose members were "defenders of harvests and the fertility of fields." He noted that by the time of the records of the benandanti that were produced in the late 16th and early 17th centuries, the tradition was still an "actual living cult" rather than some "fossilized superstition" from preceding centuries. 
In his original Italian preface, Ginzburg noted that historians of Early Modern witchcraft had become "accustomed" to viewing the confessions of accused witches as being "the consequences of torture and of suggestive questioning by the judges". 
Ginzburg's interpretation of the benandanti tradition would be adopted by a variety of scholars based in continental Europe. It was supported by Eliade. Although the book attracted the attention of many historians studying Early Modern witchcraft beliefs, it was largely ignored by scholars studying shamanism. 
The R-46 was an intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM) design by the Soviet Union during the Cold War. 
The R-46 concept was to launch a very large hydrogen bomb into orbit as a fractional orbital bombardment system (FOBS).  The existence of the system was alluded to in a speech by then Soviet Premier Nikita Khrushchev in 1961.  The design was not developed, however, and the FOBS concept was abandoned as part of SALT II. 
These educators knew their observations and understandings would be strengthened through quantitative research. Accordingly, in 1988 and 1990, two different yet related studies were undertaken: 
Strengthened by their new data, the CGBS and CGDS leadership realized there was great power in collective action. In November 1991, the steering committees of both organizations met and agreed to merge. Fifty-six independent and religiously-affiliated schools officially came together to form the National Coalition of Girls' Schools. Its first collective undertaking: a comprehensive campaign to heighten the visibility and document the value of the girls' school experience. 
Margaret "Meg" Moulton and Whitney "Whitty" Ransome, who had been serving as the Executive Directors of the Coalition of Girls' Boarding Schools since 1989, were asked to stay on as the founding Executive Directors of NCGS. 
In the proceeding years, collaboration replaced competition. Research supported belief. The climate and conversation shifted. Moulton and Ransome's collaborative leadership and relentless advocacy on behalf of girls' schools helped set NCGS on the path to success. 
As NCGS approached its 10th anniversary, girls' schools continued to experience growth and strength. Enrollment at girls' schools was up nearly 40% since 1991, and nearly 70% of NCGS member schools were at full capacity. NCGS continued to expand its membership, advocate for girl-centered education in the media, and provide girls' schools around the world with quality professional development and networking opportunities. 
The Coalition continues to provide and expand its robust resources and opportunities in the areas of research, professional development, advocacy, and networking. 
The National Coalition of Girls' Schools serves over 250 national and international Pre-K through 12th-grade girls' schools (independent, public, charter, and religiously-affiliated). 
Achnopogon is a genus of flowering plants in the daisy family, Asteraceae described as a genus in 1957. 
Star Strike is a single-player video game, released by Mattel for its Intellivision video game system in 1981. The Intellivision's best-selling game in 1982, with over 800,000 copies sold, Star Strike was inspired by the attack on the Death Star in the 1977 film Star Wars. The player must drop bombs on alien weapons silos before Earth moves into range. 
The game's scoring takes the form of a countdown timer. Starting at 8000 points, the timer counts down to zero, at which point Earth is in range of the enemy weapon. When the player destroys the fifth silo, the alien vessel is destroyed and the timer stops, thus representing the player's score for that game. Points are added to the timer for each destroyed alien fighter, giving the player additional time to complete the mission. 
At higher difficulty levels, each silo must be hit on its first pass. One game variation starts with zero score and points awarded for each silo and alien fighter destroyed; any missed silo ends the game. 
Star Strike is included in the Intellivision Lives! collection for computers and other video game consoles, like the PlayStation 2 and GameCube. In June 2010, Star Strike was made available on Microsoft's Game Room service for its Xbox 360 console and for Games for Windows Live. 
James Arthur Renwick is a New Zealand weather and climate researcher. He is professor of physical geography at Victoria University of Wellington, specialising in large-scale climate variations. He was awarded the 2018 New Zealand Prime Minister's Science Prize for Communication by Jacinda Ardern. 
Renwick was a Lead Author for the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) Fourth and Fifth Assessment Reports, as well as a Co-ordinating Lead Author for the IPCC's Sixth Assessment Report. 
He is a well-known science communicator in New Zealand. The citation for his 2018 Prime Minister's Science Prize for Communication stated that he "communicates with warmth, humour and positivity, while always being clear about the seriousness of the issue".  He communicates climate science in the context of art through an initiative called Track Zero. 
The station consists of two opposed ground level side platforms. The station is built on a hill, with the tracks reached via stairs underneath. The station is unattended. 
In fiscal 2015, the station was used by an average of 1,131 passengers daily (boarding passengers only). 
The American Numismatic Association held their annual "World's Fair of Money" here in 1991, 1999, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2019, 2021 and 2022. 
This article about a building or structure in Illinois is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Oliver Appropriate is the eighth studio album by American rock band Say Anything released on January 25, 2019 via Dine Alone Records. The album is a concept album and purported sequel to the band's second full-length album, ...Is a Real Boy, which follows the narrator of said album and his struggles with sexuality. 
Oliver Appropriate received generally favorable reviews according to Metacritic, which assigns a normalized rating out reviews from mainstream publications. In a four-star review from Sarah Jamieson with DIY Magazine she said that "the band yet again manage to navigate the realms of pointedly apt social commentary with a razor sharp wit." She also said the album was a more intimate journey than "...Is a Real Boy" and that it is "flecked with tales of weakness and failure, beauty and humour." 
He came from a well to do titled family and finished high school at Budapest Reformed Gimnazium.  He finished studies at Keszthely Academy, earning a degree in agriculture. Following his father's death he looked after the family property in 1930. 
He married in 1941, held a civil post and served for a short term in the army. He returned to public life in 1945 when the Smallholders Party was reformed. 
He later became the director of the National Library of Agriculture and vice president of Parliament. During the Hungarian Revolution of 1956 he was a member of the Interim National Assembly. 
Monastery of Our Lady of Charity is a historic church monastery at 1900 Montana in San Antonio, Texas. 
This article about a property in Texas on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a building or structure in Texas is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thula is one of five towns in Yemen on the UNESCO World Heritage Tentative List. Dating to the Himyarite period, the town is very well preserved and includes traditional houses and mosques. Archaeological investigation discovered Sabaean period ruins with massive stone architecture beneath the Himyarite. Restoration between 2004 and 2011, restored the Bab al Mayah gate, several watch towers, paths, the traditional cistern, and other portions of the Sabaean fort. 
This site was added to the UNESCO World Heritage Tentative List on July 8, 2002, in the Cultural category. 
Nawton railway station was a minor station serving the village of Nawton, North Yorkshire, England on the former Gilling and Pickering (G&P) line. 
It opened on 1 January 1874, and closed in 1964.  Although the regular passenger service (and the track east from Kirbymoorside to Pickering) ceased in 1953, the station remained open for regular freight services and occasional special passenger trains until 1964. 
Following closure, the former buildings served as the local fish and chip shop (in the weigh-bridge office), the blacksmiths shop, and more recently, the post office. Now known as Station House, it is a private residence. 
This article on a railway station in Yorkshire and the Humber is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chen represented her nation at the 2020 Tokyo Olympics in Welterweight category and reached the Quarter-Finals. On 30th July 2021, she lost to Lovlina Borgohain of India and failed to ensure a medal. 
This biographical article related to Taiwanese boxing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Treyer is a last name of German origin. Other forms of the name are "Dreier" and "Dreyer". The Pennsylvania German form of it is "Troyer". Hans Treyer, an early Anabaptist leader, died as a martyr of his faith in Bern in 1529. 
Bianco, rosso e Verdone[a] is an 1981 Italian comedy film directed and starred by Carlo Verdone, playing three characters. 
It was produced by Sergio Leone, soundtrack composed by Ennio Morricone and guest starred by Mario Brega, all formerly scored in the Dollars trilogy and Spaghetti Western movies in the 1960s. 
This is a list of UNIVAC products. It ends in 1986, the year that Sperry Corporation merged with Burroughs Corporation to form Unisys as a result of a hostile takeover bid launched by Burrough's CEO W. Michael Blumenthal.[circular reference]. 
The city was known as Dniprodzerzhynsk from 1936 to 2016. On 19 May 2016, it was renamed back to its historical name of Kamianske. Along with the city's name change, the city's hydroelectric station was renamed to Middle Dnieper Hydroelectric Power Plant. 
Besides the hydroelectric station, the city houses a few other industrial enterprises: Prydniprovsky Chemical Plant (closed down), Bahley Coke Factory and Dnieper Metallurgical Combine. 
On 15 May 2015 the President of Ukraine Petro Poroshenko signed a bill into law that started a six-month period for the  removal of communist monuments and the mandatory renaming of settlements with names related to Communism. 
On 19 May 2016, the Ukrainian Verkhovna Rada voted to rename a number of populated places in Ukraine including the city of Dniprodzerzhynsk, which reverted to using the name Kamianske. 
Until 18 July 2020, Kamianske was incorporated as a city of oblast significance and the center of Kamianske Municipality. The municipality was abolished in July 2020 as part of the administrative reform of Ukraine, which reduced the number of raions of Dnipropetrovsk Oblast to seven. The area of Kamianske Municipality was merged into the newly established Kamianske Raion. 
On 11 August 1979 two Aeroflot planes collided over the Central Ukraine, killing all 178 people on both planes. 
While mostly located on right bank of Dnieper, Kamianske stretches over the hydroelectric station onto the left bank where the portion of city is known as "Livyi bereh" neighborhood (literally Left bank). The neighborhood arches to the west of the Kamianske's suburb of Kurylivka. 
Several Eastern Orthodox churches, the largest being the Orthodox Cathedral of Saint Nicholas, which dates from 1894, serve the faithful of the city. By 2018, there were 22 parishes of Ukrainian Orthodox Church in Kamianske. 
The Roman Catholic Church of Saint Nicholas built by the city's Polish community at the end of the nineteenth century, has become one of the centers of Roman Catholicism in Eastern Ukraine. The Catholic Parish of Saint Nicholas also includes a monastery run by the Order of Friars Minor Capuchin. 
Kamianske is a city with a very difficult environmental conditions. The city is on the top 10 of the most air-polluted cities of Ukraine. There have been suggestions to assign the status of the ecological disaster city. Right-bank part of the city is mostly polluted, where the metallurgical, chemical industrial enterprises are located. 
This biographical article about a Japanese voice actor is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The AFC U-23 Asian Cup, previously the AFC U-22 Championship (in 2013) and AFC U-23 Championship (between 2016 and 2020), is an international football tournament held by the Asian Football Confederation (AFC). The first edition was initially set to be held in 2013 and its qualification matches in 2012, but the finals tournament was postponed to be played in January 2014 due to the 2013 EAFF East Asian Cup. 
The tournament is held every two years. The Olympic year tournaments, such in 2016 and 2020, are doubled as the Olympic's AFC qualifiers, from which the top 3 teams qualified to its football tournament. The 2016 edition took place in January 2016. The tournament was also renamed from the "AFC U-22 Championship" to the "AFC U-23 Championship". 
In addition, players would be ineligible for participating in the AFC U-17 Asian Cup if they participated in a higher age group competition (this tournament or the AFC U-20 Asian Cup), though in reality it is rarely enforced. 
Non-Chalcedonian Christianity comprises the branches of Christianity that do not accept theological resolutions of the Council of Chalcedon, the Fourth Ecumenical Council, held in 451. Non-Chalcedonian denominations reject the Christological Definition of Chalcedon, for varying reasons. Non-Chalcedonian Christianity thus stands in contrast to Chalcedonian Christianity. 
The most substantial non-Chalcedonian tradition is known as Oriental Orthodoxy. Within this tradition are a number of ancient Christian churches including the Coptic Orthodox Church of Alexandria, the Syriac Orthodox Church (sometimes referred to as "Jacobite"), the Armenian Apostolic Church, the Ethiopian Orthodox Tewahedo Church, the Eritrean Orthodox Tewahedo Church and the Malankara Orthodox Syrian Church. 
The Christology of the Church of the East (i.e., Nestorian Christianity) may be called "non-Ephesine" for not accepting the Council of Ephesus, but did finally gather to ratify the Council of Chalcedon at the Synod of Mar Aba I in 544. 
In India and to a lesser degree in Persia, the schism that occurred was between the Oriental Orthodox and the Assyrian Church of the East. Even today in Kerala, there is a continuing presence of both the Assyrian Church of the East and the Syriac Orthodox Church along with an independent Oriental Orthodox Church called the Malankara Orthodox Syrian Church. 
In the 18th century and onwards, Nontrinitarian and Unitarian Christians are necessarily non-Chalcedonian having their own separate traditions, different nontrinitarian theologies, and polities. The largest such groups are The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (Latter-day Saint movement), Jehovah's Witnesses and the Iglesia ni Cristo. 
Dittemore was born in Indianapolis to Mary E. Cress Dittemore and John W. Dittemore. He attended Ohio Military Institute and Phillips Academy Andover. After graduating he became president of the Federal Packing Company and vice-president of the Van Camp Packing Company. 
On April 29, 1919, about six weeks after his dismissal, Dittemore sued the church to be reinstated; and although he was not successful, litigation went on for some time. After failing twice in court, he set up his own organization which he later called an "opposition movement, opposed to the Cause of Christian Science, [and] to Mrs. Eddy and her teachings." 
In 1932, Dittemore wrote his own biography of Eddy and history of the church, Mary Baker Eddy: The Truth and the Tradition, with Ernest Sutherland Bates, a teacher of English and philosophy at Oberlin College; a collaborate suggested by Allen Johnson, Professor of American History at Yale University. 
On March 23, 1937, shortly before his death, Dittemore wrote a letter to the Board of Directors of the Mother Church expressing repentance for his actions: 
As the result of experience over a period of years and a great deal of serious study devoted to the science of government, I have come to the humble conclusion that I made a great mistake in allowing personal differences of opinion and the feelings that developed therefrom, to influence me to the extent which they evidently did after Mrs. Eddy passed on. 
We were all greatly affected by her demise and held divergent views regarding the policies to be pursued when she was no longer here to direct us. And while I acted upon convictions which I regarded as right at the time, I have since been led to see, and am anxious to go on record as admitting it, that I was wrong in letting personal opinion and matters of policy induce me to depart from Principle. 
I recognize and revere her as having restored to humanity primitive Christian healing and acknowledge The First Church of Christ, Scientist, in Boston, Mass., as the first church in history to stand for the spiritual and the scientific significance of the life of Christ. 
I am happy to forward you this letter to use as you may see fit and to sincerely announce as my fervent desire that the Cause which you represent may continue to grow and prosper under your direction.
Dittemore married Edith L. Bingham in 1898, who later divorced him. He was survived by his one daughter, Louise, and a grandson. 
Brookland is a city in Craighead County, Arkansas, United States. The population was 1,642 at the 2010 census. It is included in the Jonesboro, Arkansas Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 1,332 people, 499 households, and 384 families residing in the town.  The population density was 1,220.1 inhabitants per square mile (471.8/km2).  There were 537 housing units at an average density of 491.9 per square mile (190.2/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 97.52% White, 0.68% Black or African American, 0.38% Native American, 0.68% from other races, and 0.75% from two or more races.  1.05% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race. 
There were 499 households, out of which 43.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 59.3% were married couples living together, 14.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 23.0% were non-families. 19.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.0% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.67 and the average family size was 3.07. 
In the town the population was spread out, with 29.7% under the age of 18, 9.2% from 18 to 24, 31.8% from 25 to 44, 17.6% from 45 to 64, and 11.6% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 31 years. For every 100 females, there were 95.0 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 87.2 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $33,125, and the median income for a family was $37,500. Males had a median income of $27,471 versus $18,864 for females. The per capita income for the town was $13,744.  About 7.0% of families and 11.1% of the population were below the poverty line, including 17.4% of those under age 18 and 18.7% of those age 65 or over. 
Ambositra is the capital of the Amoron'i Mania region, and of Ambositra District. It is the centre of Madagascar's' wood-carving industry due to the presence of the Zafimaniry tribe, a subgroup of the Betsileo tribe. There are many shops selling wooden boxes, chessboards and figurines. 
The Diocese of Ambositra is seated in the town (Cathedral of the Immaculate Heart of Mary), led by Bishop Fidelis Rakotonarivo. 
On this matter he called for a "gesunden Volksegoismus" (a healthy Volk-egoism), which quickly became a buzzword for his opponent Robert Blum and was also developed into the "national egoism" advocated by the Polish nationalist Roman Dmowski. Jordan was also on the Marinerat in the Reichshandelsministerium (Reich trade ministry) and worked on building a national fleet. 
After his retirement, he went on many lecture tours, popularising the Nibelungenlied among other things - one of these took him to the US in 1871. On his eightieth birthday his birthplace of Insterburg made him an honorary citizen. 
His literary works are rooted in 19th-century historicism and profoundly influenced by Ludwig Klages and his school friend Theodor Lessing. His plays, poems and novels are dominated by philosophical and scientific ideas. His main work was his Nibelungen-Epos, written in Stabreim (alliterative verse) - in it, he used the Old Norse saga of the same name and the Lay of Hildebrand as his main sources but subjected the action to a time-related psychological interpretation. 
Gangs in the United States include several types of groups, including national street gangs, local street gangs, prison gangs, motorcycle clubs, and ethnic and organized crime gangs. Approximately 1.4 million people were part of gangs as of 2011, and more than 33,000 gangs were active in the United States. 
Many American gangs began, and still exist, in urban areas. In many cases, national street gangs originated in major cities such as New York City (Bronx), Detroit and Chicago but they later grew in other American cities like Albuquerque and Washington, D.C. 
The earliest American street gangs emerged at the end of the American Revolutionary War in the early 1780s. However, these early street gangs had questionable legitimacy, and more serious gangs did not form until at least the early 1800s. The earliest of these serious gangs formed in northeastern American cities, particularly in New York. 
By the 1990s, Northeastern gangs (white, black, and Latino) had come into conflict as a result of urban renewal and ethnic migration. The Northeast had more than 17,000 gang members and more than 600 gangs in 2008, and Pennsylvania saw heavy growth of gang activity. During the 2000s, the most active gangs in the region were federations of the Crips, the Latin Kings, MS-13 (Mara Salvatrucha), Neta, and the Bloods. 
In 2009, David Kennedy, director of the Center for Crime Prevention and Control at John Jay College of Criminal Justice of the City University of New York, said that a lot of violence in inner cities in the United States is mislabeled as "gang violence" when in fact it involves small, informal cliques of people. 
As gang members and factions continued to grow, the introduction of cheap crack cocaine to American cities would prove fatal. Crack money now could be used to purchase unprecedented amounts of weaponry, and as newly armed gang members began to fight over 'turf', or the territory in which gangs would run their lucrative drug-trades, violence soared, as the FBI's national data of gang-related homicides show: from 288 in 1985 up to 1,362 in 1993. 
The targeted killing of the 9-year-old Tyshawn Lee, the son of a Chicago gang member who was lured into an alley and shot in 2015 marked a new low in gang violence, associated with the splintering of gangs into less organized factions often motivated by personal vendettas. 
As of 2011,[update] the National Gang Intelligence Center found that American gangs were found to be responsible for "an average of 48% of violent crime in most jurisdictions and up to 90% in several others". Major urban areas and their suburban surroundings experience the majority of gang activity, particularly gang-related violent crime. 
Gangs are known to engage in traditionally gang-related gambling, drug trafficking, and arms trafficking, white collar crime such as counterfeiting, identity theft, and fraud, and non-traditional activity of human trafficking and prostitution. 
Gangs can be categorized based on their ethnic affiliation, their structure, or their membership. Among the gang types defined by the National Gang Intelligence Center are the national street gang, the prison gang, the motorcycle gang, and the local street gang. 
American prison gangs, like most street gangs, are formed for protection against other gangs. The goal of many street gang members is to gain the respect and protection that comes from being in a prison gang. Prison gangs use street gangs members as their power base for which they recruit new members. For many members, reaching prison gang status shows the ultimate commitment to the gang. 
Some prison gangs are transplanted from the street, and in some occasions, prison gangs "outgrow" the penitentiary and engage in criminal activities on the outside. Many prison gangs are racially oriented. Gang umbrella organizations like the Folk Nation and People Nation have originated in prisons. 
There has been a long running racial tension between black and Hispanic prison gangs, as well as significant prison riots in which gangs have targeted each other.[citation needed] 
In 1999, Hispanic Americans accounted for 47% of all U.S. gang members, African Americans for 34%, non-Hispanic whites for 13%, and Asians for 6%. 
Law enforcement agencies reported in 2011 that gangs affiliated with ethnicity and non-traditional gangs had expanded in the years prior. 
The largest Dominican gang, Trinitarios, is the fastest-growing Caribbean gang. Although a prison gang, the Trinitarios have members operating as a street gang, and it is known for violent crime and drug trafficking in the New York and New Jersey area. 
Among other ethnic-based gangs are Asian gangs, which operate similar to Asian organized crime groups with a hierarchical structure and little concern for control of territory. Asian gangs often victimize Asian populations, and law enforcement faces difficulty investigating Asian gangs due to language barriers and distrust among the Asian population. Asian gangs engage in a variety of crime, including violent crime, drug and human trafficking, and white collar crime. 
Middle-Eastern gangs operate in some cities, such as the Kurdish Pride Gang (KPG), a street gang that formed in 2000 in Nashville. The gang was involved with drug dealing, home burglaries (including two involving rapes), assault and attempted murder. Two members are serving long prison sentences for the attempted murder of a police officer. 
Although female gang membership is less common than male membership, women and girls can become fully-fledged members of mixed-gender or exclusively female gangs. These gangs operate as functioning units, coed gangs, or female auxiliaries to pre-existing male gangs.  National gang statistics show that 2% of all gangs are female-only, and the National Gang Center reports that around 10% of all gang members are females. 
Gang members in uniform use their military knowledge, skills, and weapons to commit and facilitate various crimes. 
In the final, three contestants, Shante "Princess" Warren, Elizabeth Saab, and Chris Cortez, were allowed to bring back former teammates to help design a window display. Hilfiger chose Cortez as the winner. 
This article relating to reality television in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Katherine Mary Taylor (born 1962) is a French-born Canadian critic and novelist, a cultural journalist at The Globe and Mail newspaper. She is author of three novels, Mme Proust and the Kosher Kitchen, A Man in Uniform and Serial Monogamy. 
Taylor's second novel, A Man in Uniform, is a fictional detective story set in Paris at the end of the 19th century and based on the actual Dreyfus Affair. It was published in August, 2010 by Doubleday Canada  and by Crown Publishing in the United States in January, 2011. 
Zumbenti Festival is an annual festival celebrated by the chiefs and people of Kaleo in the Nadowli district in the Upper West Region of Ghana. It is usually celebrated in the month of April. Others also claim it is celebrated in May. 
During the festival, visitors are welcomed to share food and drinks. The people put on traditional clothes and there is durbar of chiefs. There is also dancing and drumming. 
This festival is celebrated to give thanks to their ancestral gods, cleansing of the land of evil spirits and pacification of gods and re-uniting of families. It is also considered the favorable time to contract marriages. 
Michael Svoboda (born 15 October 1998) is an Austrian professional footballer who plays as a defender for Serie A club Venezia. 
This biographical article related to association football in Austria, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ching Oi is one of the 25 constituencies in the Wong Tai Sin District in Hong Kong. The constituency returns one district councillor to the Wong Tai Sin District Council, with an election every four years. 
The Cornish Nationalist Party (CNP; Cornish: An Parti Kenethlegek Kernow) is a political party, founded by Dr James Whetter, who campaigned for independence for Cornwall. It was formed by people who left Cornwall's main nationalist party Mebyon Kernow on 28 May 1975, but it is no longer for independence. 
The Policy Statement and Programme of the CNP were published in 1975 and included the following points: 
The CNP polled 227 (0.4) votes in Truro during the 1979 UK General Election, 364 (0.67) in North Cornwall in the 1983 UK General Election, and 1,892 (1.0) at the European Parliament elections in the Cornwall and Plymouth constituency in 1984. The candidate on all three occasions was the founder and first leader of the CNP, Dr James Whetter. 
The CNP was for some time seen as more of a pressure group, as it did not put up candidates for any elections, although its visibility and influence within Cornwall is negligible. As of 2012[update], it is now registered on the UK political parties register, and so Mebyon Kernow is no longer the only registered political party based in Cornwall. In April 2009, a news story reported that the CNP had re-formed following a conference in Bodmin; however, it did not contest any elections that year. 
Dr Whetter was the founder and editor of the CNP quarterly journal, The Cornish Banner (An Baner Kernewek), within the actions of the Roseland Institute. Since his death in 2018 the CNP has been led by Androw Hawke. 
A newspaper article and a revamp of the party website in October 2014 state that the party is now to contest elections once more. 
John Le Bretton, vice-chairman of the party, said: "The CNP supports the retention of Cornwall Council as a Cornwall-wide authority running Cornish affairs and we call for the British government in Westminster to devolve powers to the council so that decisions affecting Cornwall can be made in Cornwall". 
The CNP has one parish councillor, CNP leader Androw Hawke who was elected to Polperro Community Council for the second time on 4 May 2017. 
The reformed party was registered with the Electoral Commission in 2014, but ceased to be registered in 2017. The CNP now operates as more of a pressure group standing candidates as Independents in local elections in Cornwall. 
Pupils who want to start at the school, regularly need quite high grades, as it is a rather attractive place to study, given its lines of study, several good teachers and its central location, close to the city centre. 
The 1936 Major League Baseball season was contested from April 14 to October 6, 1936. The New York Giants and New York Yankees were the regular season champions of the National League and American League, respectively. The Yankees then defeated the Giants in the World Series, four games to two. 
The Boston Braves changed their nickname to "Bees" this season; they would revert to the Braves in 1941. 
The New York Yankees set a Major League record for the most runs batted in during a season, with 995. 
This article relating to a Major League Baseball season is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ray Mason was an Australian rugby league footballer who played in the 1950s for South Sydney as a halfback. He played for the club during their golden era in the 1950s, when the club won 5 premierships with Mason being a member in 3 of those premiership victories. 
Mason coached the third grade South Sydney side from 1958 to 1965, and guided them to a premiership in 1963.  He was made a life member of the club in 1965, and served as a committee member.  Mason later became director of the South Sydney leagues club for seven years. 
Malta is a European Parliament constituency for elections in the European Union covering the member state of Malta. It is currently represented by six Members of the European Parliament. The electoral system used is single transferable vote. 
The 2004 European election was the sixth election to the European Parliament. As Malta had only joined the European Union earlier that month, it was the first European election held in that state. The election took place on 13 June 2004. 
The 2009 European election was the seventh election to the European Parliament and the second for Malta. 
The 2014 European election was the eighth election to the European Parliament and the third for Malta. 
The 2019 European election was the ninth election to the European Parliament and the fourth for Malta. 
ETV Bal Bharat is a children's pay television channel owned by the Hyderabad-based ETV Network airing animated programming. The channel was launched on 27 April 2021. Bal Bharat is the network's first television channel dedicated to children, and is the only one to include audio tracks in multiple languages, including eleven Indian ones and even English. 
The following table lists the names of Breton communities which have concluded town twinning agreements with communities in Ireland: 
According to the 2011 census, there were 18,543 Bulgarians in Serbia. They are primarily located in two municipalities near Serbia's border with Bulgaria: in Bosilegrad there are 5,839 Bulgarians i.e. 71.9% of population while in Dimitrovgrad (Tsaribrod) there are 5,413 Bulgarians or 53.5% of population. 
The dominant religion among ethnic Bulgarians in Serbia is Orthodoxy. Islam never arrived in areas like Bosilegrad because of the mountainous terrain and most inhabitants dwelled in high mountain villages where they were hard to reach. They use both Serbian and Bulgarian churches due to the low number of  Bulgarian clergymen present in the region. There is a church in every village around Bosilegrad, and the oldest ones date to the 11th century. 
The Hebrew people harvested salt by pouring sea water into pits and letting the water evaporate until only salt was left. They used the mineral for seasoning and as a preservative. In addition, salt was used to disinfect wounds.[citation needed] In 2 Chronicles 13:5 King Abijah referred to God's covenant promise to David that he will not lack a man to seat on Israel's throne as a salt covenant, a covenant that can never be broken. 
The fate of Lot's wife, being turned to a pillar of salt, is found in Genesis 19:26. This is the reason for the naming of the pillar on Mount Sodom, which is often called "Lot's Wife". 
Leviticus 2:13 and Ezekiel 43:24 illustrate the requirement of salt as part of ancient Hebrew religious sacrifices. Leviticus 2:13 reads: "And every offering of your grain offering you shall season with salt; you shall not allow the salt of the covenant of your God to be lacking from your grain offering. With all your offerings you shall offer salt." 
Salt was cast on the burnt offering (Ezekiel 43:24) and was part of the incense (Exodus 30:35). Part of the temple offering included salt (Ezra 6:9). 
Salt was widely and variably used as a symbol and sacred sign in ancient Israel Numbers 18:19 and 2 Chronicles 13:5 illustrate salt as a covenant of friendship. In cultures throughout the region, the eating of salt is a sign of friendship. Salt land is a metaphorical name for a desolate no man's land, as attested in Psalms 107:34, Job 39:6, and Jeremiah 17:6. The land of defeated cities was salted to consecrate them to a god and curse their re-population, as illustrated in Judges 9:45. 
Newborn babies were rubbed with salt. A reference to this practice is in Ezekiel 16:4: "As for your nativity, on the day you were born your navel cord was not cut, nor were you washed in water to cleanse you; you were not rubbed with salt nor wrapped in swaddling cloths." 
Batman: The Animated Series is a side-scrolling action game by Konami released for the Game Boy in 1993 based on the TV series of the same title. A Super NES version was also planned, but the game was ultimately released under the title The Adventures of Batman & Robin due to the show undergoing a title change between seasons. 
The game is an action-adventure platformer. The player can switch between Batman or Robin to gain access to character-specific abilities. Batman uses a grappling hook to scale heights, Robin walks across ceilings, and both characters can perform wall jumps. 
Budesonide/glycopyrronium bromide/formoterol, sold under the brand name Breztri Aerosphere among others, is an inhalable fixed-dose combination medication for the treatment of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). It contains budesonide, glycopyrronium bromide, and formoterol fumarate dihydrate. It is inhaled. 
The most common side effects include oral candidiasis (a fungal infection of the mouth), upper respiratory tract infection, pneumonia, back pain, muscle spasms, influenza, urinary tract infection, cough, sinusitis and diarrhea. 
The combination was approved for medical use in the United States in July 2020, and in the European Union in December 2020. 
Budesonide/glycopyrronium bromide/formoterol is indicated for the maintenance treatment of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) in adults. 
On 11 November 2021, the CHMP adopted a positive opinion, recommending the granting of a marketing authorization for the medicinal product Riltrava Aerosphere (formoterol fumarate dihydrate/glycopyrronium bromide/budesonide), intended for maintenance treatment of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) in adults whose disease is not adequately controlled. 
This drug article relating to the respiratory system is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
De Ruyter was born on 24 March 1607 in Vlissingen, in the Spanish Netherlands, the son of a seaman who eventually became a brewery drayman, Adriaen Michielszoon, and Aagje Jansdochter. Little is known about de Ruyter's early life, but he was sent to sea as a boatswain's apprentice at the age of 11, the usual age for Zeeland boys to begin seafaring. 
In 1622, during the Eighty Years' War against Spain, he fought as a musketeer in the new Dutch army under Maurice of Nassau against the Spaniards during the relief of Bergen-op-Zoom. That same year he rejoined the Dutch merchant fleet and steadily worked his way up through the posts of boatswain and chief mate before becoming a merchant ship's master at the age of thirty. Although having had little formal education, he spoke tolerable French and fluent English. 
After the fleet was disbanded, de Ruyter returned to merchant service, which he undertook either as master of a Lampsins ship, or after buying his own ship, the Salamander.[citation needed] 
Between 1642 and 1651, he made a number of profitable trading sailings to Morocco, Brazil and the West Indies, and by 1651, he had saved enough money to retire. In 1650, de Ruyter's second wife, who in 1649 had given him a second son,  Engel, unexpectedly died. On 8 January 1652, he married a widow, Anna van Gelder, and bought a house in Flushing for his proposed retirement, which lasted less than a year. 
A planned Dutch attack on the English anchorage at Harwich led by De Ruyter had to be abandoned after the battle of Landguard Fort, at the close of the war. The Peace of Breda brought the war to an end. 
Between 1667 and 1671, de Ruyter was forbidden by de Witt to sail, so as not to endanger his life. In 1669, a failed attempt on his life was made by a Tromp supporter, who tried to stab him with a bread knife in the entrance hall of his house. 
The new rank of lieutenant-admiral general was created especially for de Ruyter in February 1673, when the new stadtholder of Holland and Zeeland, William III of Orange, became admiral-general. Although successive Princes of Orange, when stadtholder, generally commanded the Dutch army in person as its captain-general, they never took command of the Dutch fleet as admiral-general. 
By the end of 1673, English popular opposition to the war and to the French alliance, the changes in government policy and the likelihood that parliament would not continue to provide war funding inclined Charles II towards peace with Holland and ending his alliance with France. After relatively brief negotiations, the Treaty of Westminster ending the war was ratified in March 1674. 
The English withdrawal did not end naval engagements in the Franco-Dutch War. As Louis XIV did not wish to send his main fleet against the more powerful Dutch, de Ruyter was first instructed to use his fleet in support in a 'descent' on the French Channel and Biscay coasts, in which the appearance of the fleet would create a threat of landings or an invasion, aiming to divert French forces from the Spanish Netherlands and the Rhine. 
During the night, the wind strengthened again, and Duquesne was joined by eight ships from Messina, but the next day the Spanish squadron was sighted and Duquesne did not wish to fight an action against superior numbers in the Straits of Messina, so he took his convoy right around Sicily, bringing it into Messina without further fighting. The combined Dutch-Spanish fleet sailed to Palermo for repairs, and there were no further fleet actions for several months. 
He is honoured by a statue in his birthplace, Vlissingen, which stands looking over the sea. Multiple towns in the Netherlands have a street named after him. Respect also extended far beyond the borders of the republic. The town of Debrecen erected a statue of him for his role in persuading the Spanish viceroy of Naples to free 26 Protestant Hungarian ministers from slavery in the Spanish galleys during his service in Sicily. 
In 1954, the Netherlands issued two postage stamps to honor Admiral de Ruyter. An eponymous biopic about his life was released in 2015.[citation needed] 
The town of DeRuyter, New York, United States, and a village of the same name within the town are both named after the admiral. 
Zeresenay Berhane Mehari (born 1974), is an Ethiopian filmmaker. He is notable as the director of critically acclaimed films Difret and Sweetness in the Belly. 
Apart from cinema, he is the co-founder and Head of Original Content for Kana Television, the number-one rated free-to-air, private satellite entertainment TV channel in Ethiopia. 
He was born in Addis Abeba, Ethiopia in a family with seven siblings. He later moved to USA whereas his brother and sister moved to The Netherlands, and another brother is in Sweden. 
He started to work as a production assistant for two episodes: All About Eve and The Seven Year Itch in 2000 television serial Backstory. Then he was the production assistant for episode M*A*S*H: Comedy Under Fire in 2001 serial History vs. Hollywood. Later in 2006, he was the producer of shortLeila directed by Hanelle M. Culpepper. Later in the year, he made his first short film Coda. 
In 2019, he made second feature, Sweetness in the Belly, a sophomore film starring Dakota Fanning and Yahya Abdul-Mateen II. It had its premier in the Discovery section of the Toronto Film Festival. The film was an adaptation of the book of the same name written by Camilla Gibb. 
The Bad Beginning is the first novel of the children's novel series A Series of Unfortunate Events by Lemony Snicket. The novel tells the story of three children, Violet, Klaus, and Sunny Baudelaire, who become orphans following a fire and are sent to live with Count Olaf, who attempts to steal their inheritance. 
The book was published on September 30, 1999, by Scholastic Inc. and illustrated by Brett Helquist. An audiobook was released in 2003 with narration by Tim Curry, several special editions of the book have been made and the book has been translated into many different languages. There is a movie based on the series starring Jim Carrey and a Netflix TV mini-series starring Neil Patrick Harris. 
For the next few days, Olaf keeps the Baudelaires busy by forcing them to clean his house. The Baudelaires disagree but do not dare to object. 
One day, the Baudelaires are set the task of making dinner for Olaf and his theatre troupe. They make puttanesca, but when Olaf arrives, he demands roast beef. The children remind him that he never asked them to make roast beef, and Olaf becomes angry, lifting Sunny into the air and striking Klaus across the face after Klaus tells everyone Count Olaf has given them only one bed and a pile of rocks for the three of them to sleep on and to play with. 
In the last picture of The Bad Beginning, a snake is curled around a lamppost, foreshadowing the snakes in  The Reptile Room. 
In 2012, School Library Journal named The Bad Beginning the 48th best children's novel. Kirkus Reviews noted the uncomfortably macabre tone of the novel, warning that because "the Baudelaire children are truly sympathetic characters", the novel is "not for the squeamish". Catherine Pelosi of Kids' Book Review responded positively to The Bad Beginning, describing it as "exciting, humorous and appropriately dark". 
Two audiobook versions of this novel were released. The first version was released in September 2003. It was read by Tim Curry and featured Daniel Handler, under the pseudonym Lemony Snicket, who read a portion, A Conversation Between the Author and Leonard S. Marcus, which won an "Earphones Award" on AudioFile, which described the audiobook as "fabulously funny" and complimented the conversation involving Handler. 
The book was adapted into the first two episodes of the first season of the television series adaptation produced by Netflix.[citation needed] 
Elements of The Bad Beginning were featured in the 2004 film adaptation of the first three books in the series, Lemony Snicket's A Series of Unfortunate Events.[citation needed] 
The name of Akiva's wife is not known, as it was never recorded wherever she is mentioned in the Talmud. Various names have been attributed to her throughout the years, today she is most popularly known as Rachel, following the medieval Avot of Rabbi Natan. The tomb of Rachel in Tiberias is a pilgrimage site for men and women. 
In rabbinic literature, women are exempt from Torah study. The Talmud states that women gain the merit of Torah study by encouraging their husbands and sons to go learn: 
Rav said to Rabbi Hiyyah: Whereby do women gain this merit [of Torah study]? By taking their sons go to the synagogue to learn and waiting for  their husbands to  return from the beit midrash where they had been studying Torah  (Berakhot 17a).
Rachel is considered a prime example of a wife who encourages her husband to pursue Torah study and is willing to make personal sacrifices to achieve that goal. 
The story of Rachel's marriage to Akiva and their subsequent lives appears in three classical sources. They are: 
The Aramaic word for "sheep" is rachel, which may be hinting at both the mother's and daughter's names. 
Boyarin has proposed that Rachel is the logical name for Akiva's wife, as she said before she went out to greet him after his 24-year absence, "The righteous man knows the soul of his animal". Akiva was a "shepherd" and Rachel was his "sheep". 
According to Avot of Rabbi Natan, Rachel was Akiva's second wife. His first wife had died, leaving a son who accompanied him when he first began learning to read. 
When Rachel's father found out that she was engaged to an uneducated man, he was furious. He threw her out of his house and swore she would not receive anything from him. 
Twenty-four years later Akiva returned home, accompanied by 24,000 disciples. Rachel's neighbors told her to put on nice clothing to greet him, but she went out in her ragged clothes and fell at his feet. Akiva's disciples were appalled and wanted to push her aside, but Akiva said, "Leave her. What is mine and what is yours is hers". Meaning: "My Torah and your Torah came to us only in her merit". 
Rachel and Akiva had two daughters and one son. One of their daughters was married to Ben Azzai, a 2nd-century Tanna. 
Rachel's date of death is unknown. Her Yom Hillula (annual commemoration of death) has been arbitrarily set on the third day of Passover. 
Rachel's tomb has become a shrine for both men and women pilgrims. Levine notes that Rachel is "[t]he emblem of saintly womanhood for traditional Judaism", as her "martyrdom consisted of waiting for him in poverty and chastity for twenty-four years while he was off studying in the Yeshiva". Smith speculates that the themes of "self-sacrifice" and "silent suffering" in Rachel's life bring "solace" to female pilgrims who can better connect with a female saint than a male one. 
In 2008 a "Jerusalem of Gold" postage stamp was issued in Israel depicting Rachel wearing the diadem and reprinting the words of Akiva from the Talmud, promising to buy it for her. 
The roots of ufology include the "mystery airships" of the late 1890s, the "foo fighters" reported by Allied airmen during World War II, the "ghost fliers" of Europe and North America during the 1930s, the "ghost rockets" of Scandinavia (mostly Sweden) in 1946, and the Kenneth Arnold "flying saucer" sighting of 1947. Media attention to the Arnold sighting helped publicize the concept of flying saucers. 
In addition to UFO sightings, certain supposedly related phenomena are of interest to some ufologists, including crop circles, cattle mutilations, and alien abductions and implants. Some ufologists have also promoted UFO conspiracy theories, including the Roswell Incident of 1947, the Majestic 12 documents, and UFO disclosure advocates. 
Skeptic Robert Sheaffer has accused ufology of having a "credulity explosion," writing that, "the kind of stories generating excitement and attention in any given year would have been rejected by mainstream ufologists a few years earlier for being too outlandish." The physicist James E. McDonald also identified "cultism" and "extreme...subgroups" as negatively impacting ufology. 
A large number of private organizations dedicated to the study, discussion, and publicity of ufology and other UFO-related topics exist throughout the world, including the United States, the United Kingdom, Australia, and Switzerland. Along with such "pro-UFO" groups are skeptic organizations that emphasize the pseudoscientific nature of ufology. 
During the annual World UFO Day (July 2), ufologists and associated organizations raise public awareness of ufology, in an effort to "tell the truth about earthly visits from outer space aliens." The day's events include group gatherings to search for and observe UFOs. 
Peter Flint Taylor (born 7 March 1944) was Archdeacon of Harlow in the Diocese of Chelmsford, serving from 1996 until 2009. 
This article about a Church of England archdeacon in the Province of Canterbury is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sakaman is a town in the Accra Metropolitan district, a district of the Greater Accra Region of Ghana. 
On 19 May 2003 a 19 year-old Hamas militant strapped explosives to the back of his bicycle in the Gaza Strip and rode it alongside an Israeli Army vehicle, detonating it, killing himself and injuring 3 Israeli soldiers. 
On 28 June 2001, a parcel bomb planted by the ETA on a bicycle exploded in Madrid, injuring at least 10 people. 
Ciales barrio-pueblo is a barrio and the administrative center (seat) of Ciales, a municipality of Puerto Rico. Its population in 2010 was 1,009. 
As was customary in Spain, in Puerto Rico, the municipality has a barrio called pueblo which contains a central plaza, the municipal buildings (city hall), and a Catholic church. Fiestas patronales (patron saint festivals) are held in the central plaza every year. 
Barriada La Aldea, Barriada La Cuerda, Barriada Otero, Barriada Santo Domingo, Barriada Verdum, Calle Morovis, Calle Nueva, Comunidad Cuba, Comunidad Los Milagros, Residencial Colinas de Jaguas, and Sector Las Guabas. 
Azzedine Bouzerar (born 7 July 1953) is an Algerian handball player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1980 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Algerian team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Gothenburg, but moved to Norway in 1968, and was married to Kirsti Sparboe from 1972 to 1978. He is known for his cooperation with the Dizzie Tunes, and with Grethe Kausland. He won a Spellemannprisen award in 1973, and represented Norway in the Eurovision Song Contest 1972. In 2004 he won the Herman Wildenvey Poetry Award. 
This Nelson County, Virginia state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is a list of cricketers who played first-class matches for Hazara cricket team in Pakistan. Hazara played nine first-class matches in the Patron's Trophy during the 1983/84, 1984/85 and 1985/1986 seasons. 
Miss India Earth was  declared in a private ceremony where Miss India Earth Air 2016 Shaan Suhas Kumar was declared as Miss India for Miss Earth 2017 
Nyungwe (Cinyungwe or Nhungue) is a Bantu language of Mozambique. It is used as a trade language throughout Tete Province. 
Nyungwe is spoken by more than 439,000 people in Mozambique along the Zambezi River, principally in Tete Province. 
While Portuguese is the only official language of Mozambique, Nyungwe is one of the recognized national languages. 
Many vocabulary words collected by David Livingstone in Tete in the 1850s, and Courtois in the 1890s are similar to the words in common use by Nyungwe-speaking people today. 
In preparations for the campaign, the People's Liberation Army halted the advance of First Field Army toward Taiyuan. The attack on Hohhot were also held back as the Third Field Army was being deployed from Jining District toward Beiping. 
After the fall of Tianjin to the Communist forces, the Nationalist garrison in Beiping was effectively isolated. Fu Zuoyi came to the decision to negotiate a peace settlement on 21 January. In the following week, 260,000 Nationalist troops began to exit the city in anticipation for the immediate surrender. On 31 January, the PLA's Fourth Field Army entered Beiping to take over the city which marked the conclusion of the campaign.[citation needed] 
The music was composed by Kuralarasan. There are 6 songs in this movie. Idhu Namma Aalu is a debut film for TR Kulalarasan as a music director, singer and lyricist. 
In May 2012, Pearl Jam announced they were playing three festival dates in the US, including a headling slot at Jay-Z's Made in America Music Festival. In June 2012, the band announced they would be playing at the Adams Centre in Missoula, Montana. This was scheduled to be the band's only non-festival show in the United States in 2012. 
At the Made in America Festival, Pearl Jam were joined onstage by Jay Z to perform the song "99 Problems". For their appearance at Made In America, the band earned $2 million. Some of the footage of Pearl Jam's set featured in the 2013 documentary film Made in America, directed by Ron Howard. 
In the 1930s it was taken over by the neighbouring Fresh Wharf, which built a ten-storey warehouse next to Adelaide House in 1953. Only 20 years later the warehouse was demolished and the area was redeveloped into office blocks. Adelaide House still stands but the area once occupied by London Bridge Wharf is now publicly accessible as part of the Thames Path. 
A pioneer of nephrology in China, Qian was the first clinical physician to perform hemodialysis and peritoneal dialysis in the country. He participated in the development of China's first indigenously designed dialyzer and created its first hemodialysis registration system in Shanghai. 
Qian was the first to propose and demonstrate a Kt/V value of at least 1.7 as the target for peritoneal dialysis, which has since been adopted worldwide. He published hundreds of research papers and received the State Science and Technology Progress Award (Second Class) as well as many other awards. 
KDLC (97.7 FM, "Rock 97.7") is a classic rock radio station licensed to Dulac, Louisiana. It serves the Houma, Louisiana area and is owned by Coast Radio Group. 
On June 1, 2017, KDLC changed their format from adult contemporary (branded as "Sunny 97.7") to classic rock, branded as "Rock 97.7". 
The Nokondi Cup is a league competition where eight teams in the Eastern Highlands region of Papua New Guinea play rugby league. The league was thought up by The Papua New Guinea Rugby Football League (PNGRFL) in late 2006/early 2007 after other regions of Papua New Guinea created local leagues. The season runs from March to November with the first being in 2007. There were also similar competitions for 'A' teams, and under 16 teams. 
Yeh Hai Aashiqui Siyappa Ishq Ka is an Indian television show that aired on channel Bindass every Saturday at 7 PM from 20 June 2014 to 2014-end. It is the second season of the show Yeh Hai Aashiqui which aired on the channel Bindass from 25 August 2013 to 7 August 2016. The show mainly consists of episodes relating to "unconventional love stories". 
 Two college students Krish (Krishika) and Nick spend a weekend together at a bungalow (farmhouse). Nick discovers the romantic side of no nonsense Krish and wants to be friends with her but Krish shuns away from anything to do with friendship because of an ugly past. This one weekend changed the way she looked at life and is willing to give herself a chance only to realize that the crazy feeling she is going through is love. 
 Pankhu & Adi are childhood friend. Pankhu meets her friend Shweta who asks her about Adi where Pankhu introduces both of them. Pankhu signals Adi to have good time with Shweta but gradually Pankhu going through feelings of jealousy and realize that she has always been in love with him. 
Amen is the third studio album by Malian artist Salif Keita, released in 1991 by Mango Records. The album reached No. 1 on the Billboard World Albums chart. 
If you drop a child you can catch it, but if a word is out you cannot catch it anymore. One has to learn to speak, if you do not believe ask a lawyer. One has to learn to speak, if you do not believe this ask a griot. 
Nyanafi means nostalgia, and the song is about the importance of life. If you think you will buy a car, if the death comes you will forget it. If you think you will buy an airplane, if the death comes you will forget it. If you see a young boy in his death clothes you will know that life is nothing. If you see a young girl in her death clothes you will know that life is nothing. If you are complaining, and you remember that image of the young boy, it will calm you down. 
FFTir is France's representative for the international shooting organizations International Shooting Sport Federation, International Practical Shooting Confederation, World Benchrest Shooting Federation, International Metallic Silhouette Shooting Union, Muzzle Loaders Associations International Committee, International Crossbow Shooting Union and the European Shooting Confederation. 
Warcraft: The Sunwell Trilogy is a collection of three volumes of OEL manga, written by Richard Knaak, illustrated by Kim Jae-hwan, and published by Tokyopop. The series is based on Blizzard Entertainment's Warcraft universe and follows the adventures of Kalec, a blue dragon who takes the form of a human to investigate a mysterious power, and Anveena, a beautiful young maiden with an enchanting secret. 
The series opens with the history of World of Warcraft. A short introduction into the shaping of the universe up to the events leading to the rise of Arthas as the Lich King. 
During the unsteady stalemate between the living and undead, a young blue dragon flies over what remains of southern Lordaeron. Kalecgos, the blue dragon, is shot down by Harkyn Grymstone, a dragon hunter driven by hatred towards the dragon who killed his family. Before Harkyn and his party find the wounded dragon, Kalec transforms into a human and is saved by Anveena, a young maiden who saw the event. 
But the hunter's tracking skills and magical items easily led them to the farm of Anveena's parents. Kalec and Anveena try to escape through a tunnel but are spotted by one of Harkyn's henchmen. Kalec returns to his true form and takes to the skies in an attempt to flee together with Anveena, but is hit again and crashes into a lake. The hunter pursue the dragon but the magical artifact steers them North instead of towards the lake. 
Anveena finds Kalec again on the shore in human form. After resting they return to Anveena's home. When they see smoke coming from the house they rush over to help but find they are much too late. They suddenly find themselves under attack by undead abominations and ghouls led by Dar'khan, and elven mage and undead commander. Dar'khan surprises them and binds their magics with special neck collars. 
Dar'khan tells of his betrayal of his fellow High Elves and his search for the Sunwell. Before Dar'khan can harm them, Kalec and Anveena are saved by Tyrygosa, another blue dragon. Tyri had come to protect her future mate. 
In the next book in the series, it tells of the story of the group's adventures in the Alterac Mountains. 
In 1926 the novel was adapted into the American silent film Prince of Tempters directed by Lothar Mendes and starring Lois Moran, Ben Lyon, Lya De Putti. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Lobotos is a genus of bird in the cuckooshrike family Campephagidae.  It is sometimes included in the genus Campephaga.  It contains the following two species: 
Type 030 submarine was a mini submarine developed by the People's Liberation Army Navy (PLAN) in the mid 1960s, and only a single unit was built. However, before the first unit could be completed, the program was cancelled in the early 1970s, and the unfinished hull was scrapped. 
Vexillum unifasciatum is a species of small sea snail, marine gastropod mollusk in the family Costellariidae, the ribbed miters. 
Her SOE file revealed that from 1923 to 1924 she had lived with her family in Wiesbaden, Germany. The family must have moved to France in 1926 as she went to school at the Lycee de Jeunes Filles, St Germain, France, before moving to England in 1930 as Byck attended the Lycee Francais in Kensington, London, SW7, where she took the Baccalaureate in 1935 and then proceeded to the University of Lille. 
Byck worked as a secretary from 1936 to 1938 in London before becoming an Assistant Stage Manager at the Gate Theatre in 1937. At the outbreak of war, she joined the Red Cross as a voluntary worker and the WVS. She moved to Torquay in 1941 where she worked as National Registration Clerk and was also an ARP Warden.[citation needed] 
 Byck was graded 'average' as a General Agent by her SOE instructors, but gained a high intelligence rating (eight out of nine), and high grades for Morse and Mechanical Aptitude. She was described by her instructors on her SOE file as: 
She was buried in Romorantin and for many years her grave was tended by the local people. The townsfold of Romorantin commemorated the Anniversary of her death as a heroine of the Resistance. Later, her grave was moved to the Pornic War Cemetery. 
For many years, no image of Pease was known, until a 2021 paper revealed that two cartes-de-visite (one shown above) had been discovered in the Bishop Museum Archives, Honolulu. 
Kapitein Rob ("Captain Rob") was a Dutch adventure comic strip, created  and drawn by Pieter Kuhn and written by journalist Evert Werkman. The series ran from December 11, 1945 until January 21, 1966. Together with Marten Toonder's Tom Poes and Hans G. Kresse's Eric de Noorman it is considered to be the among the Big Three in the history of Dutch comics. 
In Het Geheim van de Bosplaat Rob discovers a secret bunker on the isle of Terschelling, where nazi's plan their evil schemes. 
The stories were published in the Dutch newspaper Het Parool. Like all Dutch comics in the 1940s and 1950s Kapitein Rob was a text comic, where the text was written below the images. 
The series ran from December 11, 1945  until January 21, 1966. The script of the first story was written by Wijnanda Aberson. Evert Werkman took over from the second story on. The series was only interrupted twice. From April 4, 1955 until September 1, 1956 and from November 8, 1958 until August 25, 1959. After Kuhn died of a heart attack in 1966 the series were terminated. In total 73 stories were published. The final one was left unfinished. 
In 2001 the entire series were republished completely by Rijperman Communications. On May 15, 2014 the entire collection of Kuhn's drawings, including Kapitein Rob, was donated to the archives of the city Groningen. 
In 1996 Kapitein Rob was adapted into a musical. The musical was organized by Gerard Knap. Hans Mobach composed the music, Rudolf Geel wrote the song lyrics. Ruud Bos wrote the dialogues. Erik van Muiswinkel was choreographer. The play premiered in the presence of Dutch politician Annemarie Jorritsma, who was Minister of Transport, Public Works and Water Management at the time. 
In 2007 Simon de Waal directed a live-action film adaptation, Kapitein Rob en het Geheim van Professor Lupardi. De Waal and Hans Pos wrote the story, while Screenpartners and Shooting Star Film Company produced the picture. 
Ramsay's later works were on Scottish topics, including a discussion of John Calvin's attitude to art as it relates to Scotland and works on Scottish patriotism and song. 
Christine Chin (born 1974), better known by her stage name Sasha, is a Jamaican musician, deejay and dancehall recording artist, presently recording gospel music under the name Sista Sasha. 
Born in Kingston, Jamaica, she was raised in Queens NY. Her first big hit was Dat Sexy Body . In 1998, she wrote "Dat Sexy Body", composed on a variation of the "Bookshelf" riddim, which was later remixed with famous reggaeton artist Ivy Queen. Her biggest hit is "I'm Still in Love with You" with fellow dancehall musician Sean Paul. 
In the 2000s she started a hair salon business. She became a Christian in 2008 and changed her stage name, and stated that she would no longer perform the songs that made her famous. 
Sasha has also had a string of hits in Jamaica, including "Runaway With Me", "Hot Girls", "Natural High", "Wine Gal Wine", and We Got The Love (Feat. Turbulence). Sasha was also working on an album for VP Records titled "Sexy Body Sasha" which was supposed to be released in 2006 but Sasha left the label and the album got shelved. The songs from the album will soon be released as a mixtape under the same title. 
Bandung High Tech Valley (BHTV) is an initiative to foster technology-based business and industries in Bandung region. It aims to be the Silicon Valley of Indonesia. 
The BHTV initiative was originated from Ministry of Industry and Trade of Indonesia as a mean to increase electronics export. It was started in 1986, but was forgotten when Indonesia faced economy crisis in 1997. It was then restarted by some people in Institut Teknologi Bandung. 
The main focus of current BHTV initiative is to help small tech companies to start in Bandung. Another activity is to attract multinational companies to invest in research and development in the region. Talks have been initiated with some big and small companies. 
On February 10, 2006, BHTV Foundation has been legally founded by four ITB faculty members to further oversee the development of BHTV. 
He was born on 26 January 1832, the son of lawyer Thomas Jex-Blake and the brother of Sophia Jex-Blake, and was educated at Rugby and University College, Oxford. He began a career as a school master at Marlborough and was then Assistant Master at Rugby. From 1868 to 1874 he was  Principal of Cheltenham College and from 1874 to 1887 was Headmaster of Rugby then Rector of Alvechurch. 
He had married Henrietta Cordery in 1857: they had two sons and nine daughters. One son was Arthur John Jex-Blake, a successful doctor and the daughters included educationalists Katharine Jex-Blake and Henrietta Jex-Blake. 
Mental health informatics is a branch of health or clinical informatics focused on the use of information technology (IT) and information to improve mental health. Like health informatics, mental health informatics is a multidisciplinary field that promotes care delivery, research and education  as well as the technology and methodologies required to implement it. 
Telehealth, telemedicine and telepsychiatry are new care delivery methods made possible by information technology.  Specifically, there is a body of research investigating the use of mobile devices to deliver treatment suggestions or treatment reminders in the context of mental health. 
Collection of enormous amounts of structured data on mental health patients introduces the possibility of improved mental health care, mental health policy, and overall perception of mental health.  This analysis would be performed on a macro-scale, the study of the incidence of mental health in a public health and epidemiological context. 
Shi Tianze was married to two Jurchen women, a Han Chinese woman, and a Korean woman, and his son Shi Gang was born to one of his Jurchen wives. His Jurchen wive's surnames were Mo-nien and Na-ho, his Korean wife's surname was Li, and his Han Chinese wife's surname was Shi. 
Shi Tianze defected to the Mongol Empire's forces upon their invasion of the Jin dynasty. Shi, Zhang Rou (Chang Jou) zh, and Yan Shi (Yen Shih) zh and other high ranking Chinese who served in the Jin dynasty and defected to the Mongols helped build the structure for the administration of the new state. 
This biographical article related to the military of China is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in Idlib Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1st Squadron, 1st Cavalry Regiment and the 3rd Battalion, 16th Artillery were based at Hawk Hill in 1968. 
SP4 Donald Sloat of the 1st Infantry Regiment operating out of the base would be posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor for his actions on 17 January 1970. 
This biographical article relating to Italian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Syria Mosque was a 3,700-seat  performance venue located in the Oakland neighborhood of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. Constructed in 1911 and dedicated on October 26, 1916, the building was originally built as a "mystical" shrine for the Ancient Arabic Order of the Nobles of the Mystic Shrine (the Shriners) and designed by Huehl, Schmidt & Holmes architectural firm of Chicago.  It was recognized as one of the best examples of "exotic revival architecture". 
Located at 4400 Bigelow Boulevard, it held numerous events over the years, mainly highlighted by concerts of the Pittsburgh Symphony Orchestra and numerous internationally recognized music performers, as well as political rallies and speeches. Despite community efforts to have Syria Mosque designated a historic landmark, the building was demolished August 27, 1991. 
The Medinah Temple in Chicago (constructed one year after this building by the same firm) is a similar building still in existence (though now converted to retail space). 
Despite community efforts to have the building designated a historic landmark, the Syria Mosque was torn down on August 27, 1991. The site serves as a parking lot for the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center. Plans were announced that University of Pittsburgh would acquire it from the medical center in 2016. 
He is the author of (A Hundred Greats of Islamic Nation Who Changed the Course of History), (101 Barbosa's mystery) and (101 Aryos's secret) and the (Mohammed's school book). 
One of his most important popular poems (we are heroes, we don't bend our heads) that strangers for the Islamic art's team sang, and (Taqadamo) poem that praises the revolters on Bashar's government in Syria. He participated also in Sawaed Al Ekhaa program. 
Bird fancier's lung (BFL) is a type of hypersensitivity pneumonitis. It can cause shortness of breath, fever, dry cough, chest pain, anorexia and weight loss, fatigue, and progressive pulmonary fibrosis (the most serious complication). It is triggered by exposure to avian proteins present in the dry dust of droppings or feathers of a variety of birds. The lungs become inflamed, with granuloma formation. It mostly affects people who work with birds or own many birds. 
BFL is diagnosed based on symptoms, and how these get worse on exposure to avian proteins. Radiology can show damage to the lungs, which has a characteristic "ground glass" appearance. Bronchoscopy shows chronic inflammation, with biopsies showing lymphocytosis and granulomatous tissue. BFL may be treated with steroids such as prednisone to reduce inflammation, and removal of exposure to avian proteins. If pulmonary fibrosis has not occurred, treatments tend to be very effective. 
Initial symptoms of BFL include shortness of breath (dyspnea), and dry cough. These may be worse after sudden exertion or when exposed to temperature change, which can resemble asthma, hyperventilation syndrome or pulmonary embolism. Chest pain (such as a tight chest), chills, crackly chest, and fever may also occur. 
Pulmonary fibrosis can get worse over time. This can eventually lead to respiratory failure, which can be fatal. Diffuse alveolar damage (DAD) can occur with acute respiratory failure.  
BFL is caused by an immune response to inhaled allergens from birds. This may be the dry dust of droppings, or feathers. These antigens usually come from pigeons, but may also come from parakeets, cockatiels, budgerigars, parrots, turtle doves, turkeys, chickens, and other birds. Antigens can also be from feathers in bedding. People who work with birds or own many birds are at risk. Bird hobbyists and pet store workers may also be at risk. 
BFL causes inflammation of the alveoli in the lungs. Avian proteins include mucins and antibodies, which stimulate a significant immune response from the body. The lungs become inflamed, with granuloma formation. It can take many years of exposure to cause BFL, with an average of 1.6 years to cause acute disease, and 16 years to cause chronic disease. 
A definitive diagnosis can be difficult without invasive testing. Extensive exposure to birds, combined with reduced diffusing capacity, are strongly suggestive of BFL. Symptoms worsen upon skin exposure to avian proteins in 85% of patients. Symptoms tend to occur or worsen within 4 - 8 hours after exposure to avian protein. Symptoms almost always worsen upon lung exposure to avian protein, and such tests are often performed in hospital in case symptoms become hard to manage. 
Biochemical results tend to be difficult to pinpoint to BFL, but can support a diagnosis. BFL causes high concentrations of antibodies targeted against avian proteins, although this may also be found in people exposed to avian protein without the disease. These can be detected in a blood test. An inverted CD4+/CD8+ ratio is associated with lymphocytosis. 
X-ray or CT scans usually show physical changes to the lung structure (a "ground glass" appearance or a "mosaic" pattern) as the disease progresses. Mediastinal lymphadenopathy and bronchiectasis may also be seen. Precise distribution and types of tissue damage differ among similar diseases, as does response to treatment with prednisone. Up to 12% of x-rays may show no damage, whilst only 2% of CT scans show no damage. 
Bronchoalveolar lavage typically shows prominent lymphocytosis. This mainly consists of cytotoxic T cells, with an elevated concentration of mast cells. Standard bronchoscopy usually shows chronic inflammation of lung tissue, and granulomas with poorly-defined margins. 
Lung biopsy usually reveals non-necrotizing granulomatous inflammation. It also shows "foamy" macrophages and crystals of oxalic acid. Hyperplasia tends to occur in type 1 pneumocytes and not in type 2 pneumocytes. 
In extreme cases, patients may be advised to evacuate their homes permanently and to get rid of all possessions that have been exposed to avian proteins if they cannot be cleaned thoroughly inside and out. (This includes books, beds, and upholstered furniture.) The patient should not attempt to clean any contaminated items. Anyone who comes in contact with items that have been near birds should change clothes and wash their hair before coming in contact with the patient. 
Corticosteroids, such as prednisone, often suppresses symptoms temporarily, especially in the early stages of the disease. However, corticosteroids tend not to have a long-term effect if avian protein is not also removed from the environment. Dosage is chosen specific to each patient. By reducing inflammation, corticosteroids might also delay fibrosis in the lungs. 
Unless fibrosis has progressed beyond recovery, symptoms should improve, sometimes dramatically, in the absence of such allergens. Depending on the extent of fibrosis at the time of their diagnosis and how well they follow recommended treatment protocols (especially avoidance of allergens), many BFL patients make a full recovery. However, symptoms may recur quickly upon re-exposure to birds or related allergens. 
The frequency of BFL is hard to determine. It may be between 0.5% and 7.5% of bird-owners in the United Kingdom. 
The National Bank is a Norwegian rock/pop band, whose debut album was released in Norway in 2004 and featured the hit song "Tolerate". 
Although closely connected to the band Jaga Jazzist, their music is completely different. The National Bank explore musical landscapes in more pop/rock oriented manners, with a focus on vocal-oriented orchestrated pop music suitable for the big stage. Their first single, Tolerate (2004), later released on the album The National Bank (2004), became an instant hit in Norway, and upon release was proclaimed by many Norwegian music critics to be the best Norwegian song of the year. 
The National Bank is the eponymous debut studio album released by the Norwegian band The National Bank. 
Eldorado is a village in Preble County, Ohio, United States. The population was 509 at the 2010 census. It is part of the Dayton Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 509 people, 196 households, and 141 families living in the village. The population density was 2,213.0 inhabitants per square mile (854.4/km2). There were 223 housing units at an average density of 969.6 per square mile (374.4/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 99.0% White, 0.6% Asian, 0.2% from other races, and 0.2% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.2% of the population. 
There were 196 households, of which 35.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 55.1% were married couples living together, 9.7% had a female householder with no husband present, 7.1% had a male householder with no wife present, and 28.1% were non-families. 20.9% of all households were made up of individuals, and 8.1% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.60 and the average family size was 3.06. 
The median age in the village was 39.2 years. 27.1% of residents were under the age of 18; 6.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 26.9% were from 25 to 44; 27.6% were from 45 to 64; and 12% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the village was 49.5% male and 50.5% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 543 people, 212 households, and 156 families living in the village. The population density was 2,375.8 people per square mile (911.5/km2). There were 225 housing units at an average density of 984.4 per square mile (377.7/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 99.63% White, and 0.37% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.18% of the population. 
There were 212 households, out of which 38.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 61.3% were married couples living together, 7.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 26.4% were non-families. 24.1% of all households were made up of individuals, and 12.3% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.56 and the average family size was 2.99. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 28.2% under the age of 18, 7.0% from 18 to 24, 31.5% from 25 to 44, 23.8% from 45 to 64, and 9.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 35 years. For every 100 females there were 93.9 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 89.3 males. 
The median income for a household in the village was $42,396, and the median income for a family was $45,694. Males had a median income of $32,813 versus $23,750 for females. The per capita income for the village was $17,259. About 0.6% of families and 2.3% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.4% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
The National Trail Local School District serves students from Eldorado and surrounding Monroe Township. Eldorado also has a public library, a branch of the Preble County District Library. 
Dancer in Nowhere is an album by Miho Hazama and her chamber orchestra m_unit, released in November 2018. 
Gretchen Magbanua Abaniel (born November 4, 1985) is a Filipino professional boxer. She held the WIBA mini-flyweight title from 2009 to 2011 and the WIBF mini-flyweight title from 2015 to 2016. She has also challenged for multiple major world titles across three weight classes; the WBA, IBF and WBO female mini-flyweight titles between 2008 and 2017; the WBA female atomweight title in 2013; and the WBO female light-flyweight title in 2018. 
Abaniel's father thought she should learn martial arts like karate and she later grew interested in boxing, joining the national team to start her amateur career. Abaniel is a Seventh-day Adventist. 
Abaniel, a resident of Puerto Princesa, has been supported by her town's mayor, Edward Hagedorn, throughout her career, even when becoming part of the Philippine national team in 2003 due to inadequate support from the Philippine Sports Commission. As an amateur boxer competing for her country, Abaniel won a bronze medal at the 2005 Women's World Amateur Boxing Championships in Russia. She has also won titles in tournaments held in Taiwan. 
Abaniel won her first world title match against Thailand's Nongbua Lookpraiaree after a tenth-round unanimous decision allowed her to capture the vacant Women's International Boxing Association World minimumweight title. She lost her title to Samson Tor Buamas in Sukhothai, Thailand on February 19, 2011. 
WIBA Women's International Boxing Association Minimumweight title (2009, 2014, 2016)WBC International female minimumweight title (2007) 
Other Titles:WIBA Minimumweight Intercontinental TitleWomen's International Boxing Federation World Minimumweight titleGlobal Boxing Union Female World Minimumweight title 
She was a contestant on the television program The Amazing Race Philippines 2, being a part of an athleticism focused duo with Luz McClitton. She was also a guest on a morning news-talk program called GMK  conceptualized by Daniel Razon. 
The white-crowned robin-chat (Cossypha albicapilla) is a species of bird in the family Muscicapidae. It is found in Benin, Burkina Faso, Cameroon, Central African Republic, Ivory Coast, Ethiopia, Gambia, Ghana, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Mali, Niger, Nigeria, Senegal, Sierra Leone, South Sudan, and Togo. Its natural habitats are dry savanna and subtropical or tropical moist shrubland. 
A saguaro boot is the hard shell of callus tissue, heavily impregnated with lignin, that a  saguaro cactus (Carnegiea gigantea) creates to protect the wound created by a bird's nesting house . The bird pecks through the cactus skin, then excavates downward to hollow out a space for its nest. When the saguaro dies, its soft flesh rots, but its woody infrastructure lasts much longer. So does the hollowed-out callus whose roughly boot-like shape gives it the name of "saguaro boot." 
Native Americans of the Seri group used saguaro boots to store or carry water.  It is now illegal to collect saguaro boots from the wild in Arizona. 
Some desert moth caterpillars also make tunnels inside saguaro cactus. The resulting dried callus that forms around their tunnels has a flattened disk structure where the caterpillar exits instead of the larger hole seen on a saguaro boot. 
The Academy enrolls about 120 new students every year, including 20 international students. It is located in three adjacent buildings in downtown Sofia, which are: a Training Drama Theatre (since 1957), a Training Puppet Theatre (since 1966), a cinema and video hall and an educational audiovisual centre, as well as an academic information centre that stores 60,000 volumes of Bulgarian and international literature. NATFA has a student dormitory in Studentski grad. 
In its first class, 22 students were admitted in acting and 9 were admitted in directing, and two years later there were 16 new students in theater studies. Initially, the duration of all courses was four years, but it was later extended to five for directors and theater critics. The school's first seventeen teachers were prominent experts in theater art and theater critics. Over the years, the number of teachers increased and the curriculum improved. 
In 1955, the Institute received a new building, specially built for it at 108A Rakovski Street. With its three stages and a larger number of audiences, it offered better opportunities for the learning process. The Training Drama Theater, one of the Institute's main units, was inaugurated in 1957. The amphitheater hall has 430 seats. 
On August 1, 1995, the university received its current name: Krastyo Sarafov National Academy for Theater and Film Arts. 
The bristles of camel-hair brushes are traditionally made of squirrel hair and this is still the most common material.  They can also be made from goat, ox or pony or a blend of any of these.  They are never made from camel hair, either in whole or in part. 
Camel-hair brushes are a soft brush.  They are a considerably cheaper alternative to the expensive kolinsky sable-hair brush (a red sable), considered the best brush for watercolour painting.  However, they are inferior in that they lack the springiness and natural point of red sable. 
Cheaper camel-hair brushes, such as those supplied to schools, are usually mass-produced from pony hair cut from the mane.  Pony is used because the long mane hairs can be cut up by machine to make many brushes simultaneously.  However, the cut ends are not so good at coming to a point as the natural tips. 
Camel-hair brushes can be used for watercolour painting but are not the best choice.  They are poor where good points are required, and do not hold their shape well when in contact with water.  They are, however, good for large flat brushes when broad areas are being painted. 
Camel-hair brushes are used in signwriting.  They are problematic with watercolours as already stated.  They also do not perform well with heavy paints, especially the formerly widely used white lead based paints.  The weight of the paint tends to make the brush collapse. 
Woodworking has many uses for camel-hair brushes.  As with watercolouring, fine work is better done with a sable brush but camel-hair can be used for applying finishes.  Camel hair is also less effective at working into corners or to a line because of the poorer point (or edge) on the tip. 
The brushes barbers use to remove the loose hairs from the back of the customer's neck can be camel hair.  They are also the preferred brushes for surgeons, dentists, and jewellers.  Their soft bristles make them ideal for cleaning dust from delicate equipment or materials, such as film or stills cameras. 
The discography of Skunk Anansie, an English rock band, consists of six studio albums and twenty-four singles, including one re-issue. The band's members include Skin (Deborah Dyer), Cass (Richard Lewis), Ace (Martin Kent) and Mark Richardson. The group formed in 1994 and disbanded in 2001; they re-united in 2009. Skunk Anansie are named after the West African folk tales of Anansi the Spider-man, with "Skunk" added to "make the name nastier". 
In July 2019, Skunk Anansie released the single "What You Do For Love". A video for the song was also released. 
Material Issue was an American power pop trio from Chicago, Illinois. The band's trademark is pop songs with themes of love and heartbreak. A number of their song titles used girls' first names. 
Material Issue was formed in 1985, led by frontman Jim Ellison, who played guitar, sang lead vocals, and wrote most of the band's songs. Ellison met bassist Ted Ansani while both were attending Columbia College Chicago in 1986. Drummer Mike Zelenko was found through an ad in the Illinois Entertainer later that year. 
The band's follow up album, 1992's Destination Universe, was also produced by Jeff Murphy at Short Order Recorder, and included the single "What Girls Want" in addition to ballads such as "Next Big Thing" and "Everything". Material Issue continued to tour heavily across the country in support of both albums. The new album was not as well received by critics, nor did it sell as well as their first. 
1994's Freak City Soundtrack featured the single "Kim The Waitress", a cover of a 1980s single by The Green Pajamas, and written by Jeff Kelly. Freak City Soundtrack sold fewer than 50,000 copies and Material Issue, feeling left behind by their label, parted ways with Mercury in early 1995. 
The legacy of Material Issue as the consummate 1990s power pop band lives on in the International Pop Overthrow festival that plays in Los Angeles, New York City and Chicago each year.  The IPO festival (renamed IPO from Poptopia in the late 90s to honor Material Issue) is the largest showcase of power pop music in the United States and brings in power pop bands from all over the world to showcase what is new in the world of power pop music. 
Mike Zelenko continues to play drums and has also played with several current Material Issue projects.  He has drummed for Green, the Darlings  and most recently Zelenko has been playing with a new power pop band from Chicago called The Ladies and Gentlemen. 
In 2002, the song "Everything", from the Destination Universe album, was covered by the band Stereo Fuse and received moderate airplay on alternative radio. 
The Tragically Hip song "Escape Is At Hand For The Travellin' Man", from the album Phantom Power, is a tribute to Ellison. 
Australian power pop band the Pyramidiacs also released a tribute song to Ellison, entitled "Jim", on their 1997 album Teeter Totter. 
Original drummer Danny Thompson is currently playing for punk rock legends, Face to Face, and metal band the Uprising. Both bands are from southern California. The original bassist, Lance Tawzer, went on to form The Lupins (RCA Records) and wrote a song for the movie Dumb and Dumber; he married Q101 (WKQX) DJ Samantha James and they have two children. 
In 2018, it was announced via Facebook that a feature-length documentary was in production with the band as the subject. The film entered post-production in August 2019. It is set to come out within the first half of 2021. The documentary will feature people like Rick Nielsen, Jeff Kwatinetz, Matt Pinfield, Steve Albini, Mike Chapman, and the original members of the band. 
He was abbot of the Vatopedi monastery on Mount Athos before being appointed by Patriarch Symeon I of Constantinople as Metropolitan bishop of Serres, which he governed under the religious name of Manasses. 
During his reign arose some pieces of gossip about him, not specified by the sources, which led to his deposition in early 1497. 
After his resignation he remained actively involved with ecclesiastic issues, even plotting against his successor Nephon II, until he was forced to retire in the Vatopedi monastery, where he died at an unknown date. 
Live at the Oakland Coliseum is a two-disc posthumous live album by the Jimi Hendrix Experience. It documents the group's performance at the Oakland Coliseum in Oakland, California, on April 27, 1969. The Experience broke up two months later, making the album one of the last full-length concert recordings of the trio to be officially issued. 
Dagger Records released Live at the Oakland Coliseum on February 27, 1998.  It was the first release on the label, which was set up by the Hendrix estate for recordings that "don't meet the technical recording criteria and sonic high standards" for standard releases. 
The Experience's performance at the Coliseum was not professionally recorded, however, a monophonic sound recording was made by fan Ken Koga. The set list for the concert was one typical of the 1969 tour, featuring staples "Fire", "Purple Haze" and "Spanish Castle Magic". 
Other songs include the improvised "Hey Joe", blues numbers "Red House" and "Hear My Train A Comin'", the extended "Foxey Lady" and the finale of the night, an eighteen-minute jam on "Voodoo Child (Slight Return)", with Jefferson Airplane's Jack Casady on bass. 
Athletes from the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia competed at the 1976 Winter Olympics in Innsbruck, Austria. 
Winners (in bold) entered the Medal Round. Other teams played a consolation round for 7th-12th places. 
Sree Raam is an Indian actor who appears in Tamil language films. He made a breakthrough appearing as a child actor, winning a National Film Award for his performance in Pandiraj's Pasanga (2009). He has since appeared in the leading and supporting roles in films, and won acclaim for his portrayal in Goli Soda (2014). 
He has worked in various films like Kattradhu Thamizh in 2007, Pasanga as Jeeva Nithyanandham in 2009, Theeradha Vilaiyattu Pillai as Young Kartik in 2010, Venghai as Young Selvam in 2011, Markandeyan in 2011, Vandhaan Vendraan as Young Ramana in 2011, Goli Soda as Saettu in 2014, Vajram as Madurai in 2015, Kamara Kattu as Ravi in 2015, Papanasam as Cheramadurai in 2015, Paisa in 2016 and Sagaa. 
Sree Raam made a breakthrough appearing as a child actor, winning the National Film Award for Best Child Artist for his performance in Pandiraj's Pasanga (2009). He then appeared in several films in smaller roles, portraying the younger version of the lead actor. 
In 2014, he played one of the lead roles in Vijay Milton's Goli Soda and the success of the film, led him to be featured in films of a similar genre including Vajram (2015) and Kamara Kattu (2015). His performance in Goli Soda also saw him recommended and subsequently signed up for a role in Papanasam (2015) starring Kamal Haasan. 
Daniel Auteuil was born on 24 January 1950 in Algiers, French Algeria, the son of opera singers. He grew up in Avignon and Nancy, France. He began his acting career in musical comedy and made his film debut in 1972. 
In 2013, Auteuil was selected as a member of the main competition jury at the 2013 Cannes Film Festival. 
Barras railway station was situated on the South Durham & Lancashire Union Railway between Barnard Castle and Kirkby Stephen East. 
The station served the villages of Barras, Brough and North Stainmore. The line was opened on 26 March 1861 when a mineral train was run, the line opened to passengers on 8 August 1861 following an opening ceremony the day before, but Barras station is noted in the published timetable as having no trains stopping, it first appeared to be open for passengers from February 1862. 
The station was closed by British Railways North Eastern Region on 22 January 1962.  Freight facilities had been withdrawn on 1 December 1952 and from that date it had been operated as an unstaffed halt for passengers only. 
The main station buildings and a small goods yard and siding were constructed on the north side of the line, serving eastbound trains. There was a waiting shelter for passengers which was located on the westbound platform. 
The British Railways North Eastern Region published passenger timetable for October 1950 showed that four trains called at the station in each direction on weekdays en route from Darlington to Kirkby Stephen. 
Local freight trains also served the Barras goods yard and through freight trains from the northeast via Stainmore and Tebay to Barrow-in-Furness also passed through the station. 
Heavy snow falls frequently interrupted operations on the Stainmore line. In February 1955 an eastbound steam locomotive and its goods train became stuck for four days in deep snow just north of the station. Its recovery was recorded in an official film Snowdrift at Bleath Gill. 
Kelly was born in West Haverstraw, New York in 1911. He graduated from Bound Brook High School in 1929 and attended Muhlenberg College where he was a member of Alpha Tau Omega. He was a member of the Middlebrook Players, a thespian company. He married Louise Harriet Wild, daughter of John Wild in May 1937. 
Kelly received the designation of Outstanding Irishman of 1958 by the Patrick's Guard of Honor of New Jersey, a body of which he was president in 1975. 
After college he worked at the Public Service Electric and Gas Company. In the 1940s he served as a city councilman in Middlesex, New Jersey and worked as a purchasing agent for Interchemical Corporation. 
Kelly served as Mayor of East Orange, New Jersey, from 1958 to 1970. Kelly was the first democratic mayor of East Orange since 1911 and defeated William M. McConnell in an upset. In 1968, Kelly served as president of the New Jersey Council of Mayors. Kelly was defeated in 1969 by William S. Hart, the first elected black mayor of a major New Jersey community. 
The league saw a major restructuring of the usual four divisions of eight teams. Division 1 was split into Group 1A and Group 1B with each group consisting of six teams. The top two teams in each group qualified for the knock-out stage. 
Offaly came into the season as defending champions of the 1990-91 season. Galway, Down, Laois and Offaly all entered Division 1 as part of the restructuring. 
On 12 May 1992, Limerick won the title after a 0-14 to 0-13 win over Tipperary in the final. It was their 10th league title overall. 
Division 2 remained as a single division consisting of eight teams. The first-placed team at the end of the group stage were deemed champions and secured promotion to Division 1. 
On 12 April 1992, Antrim secured the title and promotion after a 3-8 to 0-11 win over Meath in round 7 of the group stage. 
Division 3 was split into Group 3A and Group 3B with each group consisting of six teams. The first-placed team in each group contested a play-off to decide promotion. 
After playing for Rayo's B-team Willy joined Real Betis, representing the latter's C and B-teams. On 5 August 2011, he signed for CF Villanovense in the third division, after impressing on a trial basis. 
Hajji Ali Mohammad is a politician representing Logar Province in the Wolesi Jirga, the lower house of Afghanistan's national legislature. According to a report prepared by the Program for Culture and Conflict Studies at the Naval Postgraduate School, Ali Mohammed sat on the Communications Committee.  They reported he might be politically affiliated with Yunus Qanuni, the speaker of the House, in addition to being a member of the Hezbi Islami. 
Pajhwok Afghan News reported on February 25, 2012, that Ali Mohammad's son Khalid had been kidnapped. The identity or affiliation of the kidnappers was unknown. 
Delpodio was born in Turin, Italy. In amateur golf, he won several national championships before turning professional in 2006. 
Delpodio played on the Alps Tour from 2007 to 2010. He won three tournaments and the Order of Merit in 2010. This earned him a spot on the Challenge Tour for 2011. 
This biographical article relating to Italian golf is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jakara Anthony (born 8 July 1998) is an Australian freestyle skier. She competed in the 2018 Winter Olympics finishing 4th the best ever result for an Australian female mogul skier. At the 2019 World Ski Championships she finished 2nd. 
This biographical article relating to freestyle skiing in Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The portrait of a man in red chalk (c. 1510) in the Royal Library of Turin is widely, though not universally, accepted as a self-portrait of Leonardo da Vinci. It is thought that Leonardo da Vinci drew this self-portrait at about the age of 60. The portrait has been extensively reproduced and has become an iconic representation of Leonardo as a polymath or "Renaissance Man". Despite this, some historians and scholars disagree as to the true identity of the sitter. 
In the early 21st century, the presumed self-portrait of Leonardo was used to help identify the subject of a drawing by Giovanni Ambrogio Figino, believed to depict an elderly Leonardo with his right arm assuaged by cloth. This may correspond with accounts of Leonardo's right hand being paralytic late in life and the burial position of his presumed remains, which scientists hope to DNA test to determine if they are Leonardo's. 
Vir Vikram Dev replaced his uncle Krishna Raj Dev as the king of Nandapur in 1637. The kingdom of Nandapur was then resisting as a tributary of the Qutb Shahi dynasty of Hyderabad. However, the growing tensions between Nandapur and Hyderabad forced the Qutb Shahi Sultans to take stringent steps in order to maintain control over the territory of Kalinga. They constantly interfered into the politics of Nandapur that vexed the courtiers and the subjects. 
The fort was then known as Jaypur Garh and it served as a robust bastion for the next eleven descendants of Vir Vikram Dev. However, the British invaded Jeypore in 1777 assisted by the army of Vizianagaram and destroyed the fort in the absence of Vikram Dev I who was preparing for the battle in the fort of Rayagada. 
People belonging to different caste, creed and religion have been living in Purunagada and most of them have been staying here for generations. Tribal Parajas form an integral part of this part of the town and were earlier known for their hunting skills, clean houses, robust physique, unique traditions and hard work. With exposure to the urban way of life, their dependence on the forests has been declining and has eroded their culture and heritage. 
The Neelakantheswara Temple is the oldest temple in Purunagoda and Jeypore. The NKT road owes its name to this temple, which has become synonymous with Purunagoda. The temple also has a Jagannath temple and a very rare Radha Krishna temple within the premises. The Neelakantheswara Temple was discovered by a woodcutter who accidentally hit on the Shiva Linga. The mark could still be seen today. 
One of the few temples found dedicated to Goddess Ganga. It is here that the ritualistic Ghanta Paraba - a festival similar to Bonalu where a representation of each goddess of a particular locality is taken in a clay pot to other parts to be worshiped - begins at Purunagoda. The procession begins only after a flower drops from the Goddess' head. Though debilitated and deserted for most part of the year, this temple and the festival is the essence of Purunagoda's tradition. 
After graduating from Oxford, Jeffery moved into consultancy, in which he is currently employed by Boston Consulting Group.  He also turns out regularly for Grayswood Cricket Club in the I'anson Cricket League. 
On 25 January 2010, Carrizalez resigned as both Defense Minister and Vice President for personal reasons. 
On 25 February 2019, the Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC) of the United States Department of the Treasury placed sanctions in effect against Carrizales and governors of 3 other Venezuelan states for alleged involvement in corruption and in blocking the delivery of humanitarian aid. 
This biographical article related to the military of Venezuela is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Littledean Hall (grid reference SO672130) is a country house in the village of Littledean, Gloucestershire, England. It is has been described as one of the most haunted houses in England and is thought to be the oldest house in the United Kingdom which is still occupied. Saxon and Celtic remains have been uncovered in the cellars. Part of the house is designated an SSSI as it is a proven breeding roost for the Greater Horseshoe Bat (Rhinolophus ferrumequinum). 
Originally a Saxon hall, then a church, it was then converted to a Norman hall, complete with a crypt and undercroft. Testing has shown that these remains date back to the 5th century. However, when records began of the house in 1080, it had evolved into a substantial medieval manor house which was eventually replaced with a Jacobean house in 1612. 
The hall has seven bedrooms, a coach house, a dining room, sitting and drawing rooms, a stable, living room and cellar. The sweet chestnuts (Castanea sativa) which line the driveway are at least 500 years old and the remains of a Roman road have been found underneath the drive itself. 
In 2007 the building suffered damage after lightning struck nearby and in 2008 the owners of the hall were ordered to rebuild a section of wall they had knocked down. The wall was deemed to be a Grade II listed building alongside the main hall. 
There are at least three distinct tales which have been said to have led to hauntings at Littledean Hall. The first being the deaths of Colonel Congreve and Colonel Wigmore, who both died when the Kings garrison met with roundheads in the dining room. It is reported that visitors can still see the bloodstains where they fell. 
In 1741 Charles Pyrke, former occupant of the house, was accused of raping the sister of his servant. The servant promptly murdered Pyrke before being put to death himself. The servant's ghost is thought by some to haunt the hall to this day and it has been reported to be carrying a candle. Two other Pyrke brothers are said to wander the halls, having killed each other in a duel in 1740. 
Dean Hall Coach House & Cellar (grid reference SO672130) is a 0.02-hectare (0.049-acre) biological Site of Special Scientific Interest in Gloucestershire, notified in 1988. The site is listed in the 'Forest of Dean Local Plan Review' as a Key Wildlife Site (KWS). 
The hall (coach house and cellar) is currently home to Greater horseshoe bats which makes it a Site of Special Scientific Interest which is closely monitored by Natural England. It is a significant breeding roost and its use has been recorded since 1986.  Local reports indicated that bats may have used the building for over 75 years. 
The deciduous woodlands and sheltered valleys of the Forest of Dean and the Wye Valley provide a good feeding area, and the underground systems provide roosting and breeding sites. A ring of iron-ore bearing Carboniferous Limestone in the Forest of Dean has created a series of ancient and more recent mines which provide hibernation sites. The citations for the series of sites provide common information. 
Wye Valley and Forest of Dean Bat Sites/ Safleoedd Ystlumod Dyffryn Gwy a Fforest y Ddena are recognised as a Special Area of Conservation (SAC) under the EU Habitats Directive. 
  The 1887 Liverpool Exchange by-election was held on 26 January 1887 after the death of the incumbent Liberal MP David Duncan.  It was retained by the Liberal candidate Ralph Neville, with a narrow majority of 7 votes. 
This by-elections to the Parliament of the United Kingdom in England-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Voluntary Target is a 1984 compilation LP album by guitarist Leo Kottke.  It includes all of Balance and Burnt Lips. 
Tens of thousands of Polish proverbs exist; many have origins in the Middle Ages. The oldest known Polish proverb dates to 1407. A number of scholarly studies of Polish proverbs exist; and Polish proverbs have been collected in numerous dictionaries and similar works from the 17th century onward. 
Ridabu is a village and borough in Hamar municipality, Norway. Prior to 1992 it was a part of the rural municipality Vang. 
The album includes remakes of El Hadj M'Hamed El Anka's "El-H'mam" and Rabah Driassa and Blaoui Houari's "H'mama". 
In the UK the Universal Music France album was licensed unchanged to Wrasse Records with the French album track listing and an extra DVD of music clips. The Wrasse Records release (Wrasse 127X) included the original French booklet with Arabic sung texts in French romanization and studio notes in French, but with a CD backing tray insert in English. 
Lost in America is a 1985 American satirical road comedy film directed by Albert Brooks and co-written by Brooks with Monica Johnson. The film stars Brooks alongside Julie Hagerty as a married couple who decide to quit their jobs and travel across America. 
David and Linda Howard are typical 1980s yuppies in Los Angeles, California, dissatisfied with their bourgeois lifestyle. He works in an advertising agency and she for a department store, but after failing to receive a expected promotion and instead being asked to transfer to the firm's New York office, David angrily insults his boss and is fired. David coaxes his wife to quit her job as well and seek a new adventure. 
The Howards decide to sell their house, liquidate their assets, drop out of society, "like in Easy Rider", and travel the country in a Winnebago recreational vehicle. They leave LA with US$100,000 but their plans change drastically when Linda loses all their savings playing roulette at the Desert Inn Casino in Las Vegas, where David desperately and unsuccessfully persuades a casino manager to give the money back as a publicity gimmick. 
Only a few days after beginning their pursuit of the dream of dropping out of society, David and Linda are living in a trailer park, nearly broke, and working dead-end jobs where they are accountable to brats. They decide that it is better to return to their old lifestyle as soon as possible. They point the Winnebago toward New York, where David begs for his old job back. An end card reveals he is rehired with a substantial pay cut but better dental care. 
Brooks originally did not want to direct himself and had wanted Bill Murray for the part of David Howard. 
Lost In America received mostly positive reviews from critics and holds a 97% rating on review aggregator Rotten Tomatoes, based on thirty-six reviews. The site's consensus states: "A satire of the American fantasy of leaving it all behind, Lost in America features some of Albert Brooks' best, most consistent writing and cultural jabs." The film was a commercial success, though not a blockbuster. The film's script won the National Society of Film Critics award for Best Screenplay. 
The film is #80 on Bravo's 100 Funniest Movies,[citation needed] and was listed at #84 on American Film Institute's AFI's 100 Years...100 Laughs in 2000. 
Warner Home Video initially released the film on Betamax, VHS, and Laserdisc in 1985 and reissued it twice on video, in 1991 and 1997. The film made its DVD debut on April 3, 2001, and was made available for streaming on Netflix on July 1, 2016. Criterion released the Blu-ray on July 25, 2017. 
Born in Greensburg, St. Helena Parish, Louisiana, Newton attended private schools in Bastrop, Louisiana, and the Louisiana State University, then at Alexandria, Louisiana. He taught school while he studied law. He was admitted to the bar in 1870 and commenced practice in Bastrop.  
He served as a member of the Louisiana State Senate from 1879 to 1883. He declined a judgeship in 1885. 
He resumed the practice of law in Bastrop, for several years, and then moved to Monroe, Ouachita Parish, Louisiana, where he continued the practice of law until his death on May 26, 1910. He was interred in the New Cemetery, Bastrop. 
Born and raised in St Albans, Ted had started his working life as a straw hat finisher, enlisting into the ranks of the Bedfordshire Regiment late in 1903 as Private 7602. Service in India until 1908 followed, at which time Ted returned to England when the battalion finished its tour of foreign service that year. His term in the regulars complete, Ted became a Reservist and spent time employed by the Deep Well Boring Works, for the St. Albans council and the Post Office Telephones Dept. 
Following almost two weeks of fierce fighting for control of 'Murder Hill', Ted and his battalion were due for relief once darkness arrived on 1 May 1915, but at 6.30 p.m. that evening, a German gas attack was launched against the defenders of the hill. On the right, the 1st Battalion, Devonshire Regiment lost over 300 men in just moments, leaving the 1st Battalion, Bedfordshire Regiment on their left flank exposed. 
As is often the case with the earlier war deaths from around Ypres, Ted's grave was lost in the fighting that continued to rage in the salient for a further 42 months and he is remembered on the Ypres (Menin Gate) Memorial to the missing. 
The London Gazette (edition dated 29 June 1915) published the citation which accompanied the posthumous award of Edward Warner's Victoria Cross, reading: 
For most conspicuous bravery near ' Hill 60 ' on 1st May, 1915. After Trench 46 had been vacated by our troops, consequent on a gas attack, Private Warner entered it single-handed in order to prevent the enemy taking possession. Reinforcements were sent to Private Warner, but could not reach him owing to the gas. He then came back and brought up more men, by which time he was completely exhausted, but the trench was held until the enemy's attack ceased.  
His Victoria Cross, along with his 1914 Star, Victory and British War Medals are displayed at the Bedfordshire and Hertfordshire Regimental Museum, Wardown Park, Luton, Bedfordshire, England. 
Captured at sea, Wase was imprisoned at Gravesend, but escaped, and served in the Spanish army against the French. He was taken prisoner, but was released, and returned to England and became tutor to William, the eldest son of Philip Herbert, 5th Earl of Pembroke. 
In 1655 Wase proceeded M.A. and was appointed headmaster of the royal free school in Dedham, Essex. From 1662 to 1668 he was headmaster of Tonbridge School, where the register states that he was B.D., and educated at the school Thomas Herbert, younger brother of William Herbert. In 1671 he became superior beadle at law and printer to the university of Oxford. He died on 29 August 1690, in Oxford. 
In 1647 Nicholas Gray, the Head Master of Eton, published Wase's Greek version of Hugo Grotius's Baptizatorum Puerorum Institutio (other editions 1650, 1665, 1668, and 1682). 
In 1654 Wase dedicated to his pupil William Herbert a translation of the Cynegeticon of Faliscus Gratius. Edmund Waller addressed a copy of verses to Wase on this performance. 
In 1668, Wase published the first complete English-language edition of Phaedrus's Fables. In 1678, he produced a survey of free schools throughout all of England; in many cases, his survey is the only surviving record of those schools' existence. Considerations concerning Free Schools in England (Oxford, 1678) urged an increase in the number of schools, and the claims of scholars on the wealthy. 
Thomas Hearne, in his preface to John Leland's Itinerary, refers to Wase as an "eminent philologer". His manuscripts were preserved in the library of Corpus Christi College, Oxford. A small oval portrait is mentioned by James Granger. 
One day, Tara and Shirley go to an antique shop owned by Anthony Pereira, who has feelings for the latter. Shirley wants to have her toys repaired, and Tara suggests that they approach her grandfather who can repair them. Shirley invites Anthony to her house that night for a date, and he readily accepts. Meanwhile, Tara gets Tipu to assist her grandfather in repairing the toys, which helps the duo bond well. He finds Tipu to be a very keen assistant and agrees to let him stay with them. 
The film was made by frame-by-frame painted animation in computer and took 18 months with 60 artists. 
Blech was born to a Jewish family in Aachen, Rhenish Prussia.  After attending the Hochschule in Berlin where he studied piano with Ernst Rudorff and composition from Woldemar Bargiel, he studied privately with Engelbert Humperdinck. 
Blech made recordings of operatic and orchestral music for the Deutsche Grammophon, HMV, Ultraphon/Telefunken, Decca, and Elite record labels. 
Blech also composed orchestral works, choral works, chamber works, and songs (famous his Kinderlieder) 
Born in Croatia (at the time part of Yugoslavia), Perovic emigrated to Ballarat in Australia with his family in 1958, at the age of four. Despite starting his career as a wingman, Perovic played mostly as a defender and was a centre half-back when he first represented Victoria in 1978. After 77 games with St Kilda during the 1970s he moved to Carlton in a trade involving Alex Jesaulenko. He was a member of Carlton premiership teams in 1981 and 1982, playing in the back pocket. 
Perovic often polled well in the Brownlow Medal, finishing as St Kilda's top vote-getter in the 1978 award and twice for Carlton, which included an eighth placing in 1983. 
On 17 September 1984, Val famously drank 37 375ml VB cans in 2 hours in front of Carlton teammates at the Cricket Club Hotel in Clarendon St South Melbourne. 
He was appointed player/manager of Galway United in 1988 when they were in the relegation zone. Despite helping save the club from relegation his contract was unilaterally terminated by United in May 1989. 
McDonagh qualified to play for Ireland through his father Michael who was from the parish of Midfield Co. Mayo.[citation needed] 
In February 2018 the 'Future Dorset' plan was approved by the Secretary of State for Housing, Communities and Local Government Sajid Javid, which meant that Bournemouth, Christchurch and Poole borough councils were merged into one unitary authority in April 2019. 
Hexadactilia trilobata is a moth of the family Pterophoridae described by Thomas Bainbrigge Fletcher in 1910. It is found in Australia in Queensland and New Guinea. 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The following is an overview of 1923 in film, including significant events, a list of films released and notable births and deaths. 
On 14 December 2009, Neon Highwire digitally released their debut EP titled Luminescence to mostly positive reviews. The release was self recorded and mastered at The Exchange studio by Simon Davey. It was physically released on 20 January 2010. 
The band made the track "Fantasy Land (Christmas In The TerrorZone)" available for a free download on the sites SoundCloud and Last.fm on 24 December 2009, which contains a spoken word sample of Rutger Hauer taken from the film Blade Runner. A Hail! Perestroika remix of the track was released as part of a series of advent calendar gifts from the music blog Never Enough Notes in 2010. 
In May 2010, Neon Highwire released the download only single "Bear At The Bus Stop", with an accompanying promotional video.  Later in the year on 10 December 2010, the song "Neon Blink", originally from the Luminescence EP, was released as a digital single on Blue Dove Records with a number of remixes of the track as b-sides from artists such as Fresh:Mesh, Sizeable Moth Hat and Christian Paduraru. 
On 26 January 2011, the band released a song titled "Kim Jong Il Looking At Things" in homage to the website of the same name.  The song was adopted as the "National Anthem" for the website and subsequently featured in the B3ta newsletter. 
During 2011, a number of Neon Highwire remixes appeared on the Digital House Moments, Sunset 2 Sunrise Volume 9 and Electro House Essentials Volume 7 compilation releases from Blue Dove Records. 
On 24 January 2014, the Synth City Records Compilation Volume 1 was released featuring the exclusive track "Gyrophant" from Neon Highwire. 
On 29 January 2016, the band released one last EP titled Bookreader to coincide with their break up. 
The battalion is notable in that it was the only battalion, of any kind, in the history of the United States Army to have entered combat as both an officially designated amphibious and airborne unit (though the Glider Infantry Regiments of the 11th Airborne Division conducted amphibious assaults in World War II).[citation needed] 
The 37th Engineer Battalion was first activated on 16 January 1918, as 1st Battalion, 37th Engineer Regiment, whose primary function was electrical and mechanical engineering. During World War I, the battalion participated in the Battle of Saint-Mihiel and the Meuse-Argonne Offensive as a member of the American Expeditionary Force. Following the war, the 37th Engineer Regiment was inactivated in March 1919. 
The Battalion lost First Sergeant Christopher C. Rafferty in support of (Operation Enduring Freedom). He was fatally injured while coordinating a response to a mortar strike July, 21st 2006 in Sharana, Afghanistan. The Battalion held a ceremony on Rafferty Field named in his honor after their redeployment back to Ft. Bragg. 
The colors of the 37th Engineer Battalion were inactivated again effective 16 September 2010 when the unit was reflagged as the 307th. 
The 37th Engineer Battalion was officially reactivated as part of the 2d Brigade Combat Team, 82d Airborne Division on 16 October 2013. This was accomplished by inactivating and reorganizing the Special Troops Battalion ("Green Falcons")[permanent dead link], 2d BCT. A ceremony was held on 15 November 2013 at Fort Bragg, NC, to case the colors of the STB and to uncase the colors and activate the 37th Engineer Battalion ("Eagle Battalion"). 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Anne Bouverot (born 21 March 1966) is a French business executive. She is currently Chairperson of the Board of Technicolor, provider of visual effects and animation services for moving images and supplier of set-top boxes and gateways. In August 2015, she was appointed chair and CEO of the French electronic security company Morpho after spending four years as director general and board member of the GSM Association (GSMA). 
While she was with GSMA, Bouverot promoted initiatives for attracting more women to work in the mobile and ICT sectors, launching the Connected Women programme which hosts events around the world. She has also been instrumental in organizing the GSMA's Mobile World Congress in Barcelona. Held each year, the event attracts prominent speakers from the mobile and related fields. 
Massachusetts House of Representatives' 18th Middlesex district in the United States is one of 160 legislative districts included in the lower house of the Massachusetts General Court. It covers part of the city of Lowell in Middlesex County. Democrat Rady Mom of Lowell has represented the district since 2015. 
The current district geographic boundary overlaps with that of the Massachusetts Senate's 1st Middlesex district. 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a forward born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a railroad station in Punjab, Pakistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Canadian Chamber of Commerce and local chambers and boards of trade across Canada collaborate with BDC on organizing Small Business Week events. Over the years, other Crown corporations and large companies have also participated as sponsors. Each year, hundreds of activities across Canada attract thousands of business people to Small Business Week. Small Business Week has been a registered trademark of the Business Development Bank of Canada since 1986. 
Each year Small Business Week has a theme reflecting the challenges entrepreneurs face at the time. Here is a list of themes over the past few years:  
A national events calendar is maintained by BDC to publicize local events and inform entrepreneurs about what's happening in their area. 
Piranhas is a historic municipality near the western limit of the State of Alagoas, in the Northeast Region of Brazil. 
It was also known as Porto de Piranhas, because fishermen caught piranhas (a carnivorous predator fish) there. 
Shondel Nichole Archer (born 9 December 1990) is an American-born Guyanese retired footballer who played as a forward. She has been a member of the Guyana women's national team. 
Archer attended the Woodbridge High School in Lake Ridge, Virginia. After graduating there, she joined the University of Richmond in Richmond, Virginia. She played for the Northern Virginia Majestics. 
Archer qualified to play for Guyana through her parents. She capped for the Lady Jags' at senior level during the 2010 CONCACAF Women's World Cup Qualifying qualification. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Guyana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
At that time, the zoo displayed mainly Hungarian species and some rare species of monkeys, parrots, camels, and kangaroos, among others. Franz Joseph and Queen Elizabeth donated a giraffe and other animals to the zoo. The first lion house opened in 1876 with lions and tigers. An elephant, a hippopotamus, and a rhinoceros joined later on. 
However, the initial enthusiasm waned and popularity of the zoo decreased. The new animals were expensive and the expenses of the company founded by the patriots exceeded the revenues. The management hired entertainers and comedians and the corporation was transformed into an animal and plant naturalizing company. 
The development was interrupted by the First World War. The zoo was almost entirely destroyed in the Second World War. At the siege of Budapest, the zoo was bombed and most buildings and animals were destroyed. After the siege, the remaining animals were eaten by the starving people of Budapest. From 2,000 specimens only 15 survived. 
In 1945, the zoo re-opened with a few dozen animals. The damage was restored slowly. In the 1950s and 1960s, there was a major modernization. Between 1956 and 1967, the Director General of the zoo was Dr. Csaba Anghi. Under his guidance, the zoo became once again one of the most modern zoos of Europe. 
The newest attraction of the zoo is The Magical Hill, found in the Great Rock. It presents the diversity of flora and fauna, the evolving of the diversity and the relationship between humankind and nature. It features more than 100 species, interactive games, and illustrative models. 
America Tropicana is the new name of the Palm-house. It presents the flora and fauna of the tropical climate American continent. 
The Savannah Zone displays giraffes, gazelles, white rhinoceros, and many species of birds. The building also displays small mammals and insects. 
Australia Zone is found next to the Great Lake. It displays unique birds, reptiles, and amphibians of Australia. The showrooms of the northern part of the house presents animals active at night in reversed lighting scheme. The Hillhouse is also a part of the Australia Zone. It displays cassowaries, kangaroos, and wombats. 
The building named after the first director of the zoo represents the wildlife of South-East Asian flora and fauna. 
Special highlights of the fair include Brand Name Gallery, an attractive setting for fashionable timepieces by top brands, and Pageant of Eternity, designed to highlight the beauty and craftsmanship of watches at the high end of the spectrum.  
Carposina irrorata is a moth of the family Carposinidae. It was first described by Lord Walsingham in 1907. It is endemic to the Hawaiian island of Lanai. 
West Sabine High School is a public high school located in Pineland, Texas (USA) and classified as a 2A school by the UIL. It is part of the West Sabine Independent School District located in western Sabine County. West Sabine High School was formed in 1961 by the consolidation of Bronson and Pineland High Schools. In 2015, the school was rated "Met Standard" by the Texas Education Agency. 
Darwin S. Karr (1875-1945)  was an American stage and silent film actor. He appeared in over 140 films up to 1922. He began appearing in films by the Vitagraph company. He was married to Florence Bindley. 
Blackburn Park Road F.C. was a football team formed in 1875. They played in Blackburn, Lancashire, near to the railway station. 
This article about an English association football club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Greg Schwager is a retired American soccer defender who played professionally in the United States, Germany and Denmark. 
This biographical article related to an American soccer defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He is the general editor of The Complete Works of Andrew Fuller, a project that publishes "a modern critical edition of the entire corpus of Andrew Fuller's published and unpublished works." Though Haykin was trained as a Patristic scholar, he also developed himself in the area of 18th-century British evangelicalism, particularly the English Particular Baptist history and spirituality. 
Haykin is a prolific writer having authored numerous books, over 250 articles and over 150 book reviews. He is also an accomplished editor with numerous editorial credits. 
In 2018 Haykin was elected as a Fellow of the Royal Historical Society in recognition of his contributions to historical scholarship. 
Haykin was born in England of Irish and Kurdish parents. He grew up in Birmingham, England and Coventry, England, before moving to Canada with his family when he was twelve. 
Haykin was converted to Christ in 1974. He attended Wycliffe College at the University of Toronto from 1974 to 1982, earning a doctorate in patristics, supervised by John P. Egan, S.J. 
Haykin served as principal and professor of church history and biblical spirituality at Toronto Baptist Seminary in Toronto, Ontario, Canada, from 2003 to 2007. Previously, he was a professor at Heritage Theological Seminary from 1993 to 1999 and at Central Baptist Seminary from 1982 to 1993. He was the editorial director of Joshua Press from 1999 to 2002. He was appointed to the faculty of the Southern Baptist Theological Seminary in 2007. 
Russell D. Moore, dean of the School of Theology and senior vice president for academic administration at Southern Seminary was quoted as saying: 
Its logo is a seal with a thick green outer rim reading the club name and the foundation date on the bottom, inside is a large football (soccer ball) and a smaller one with Pico do Fogo in the middle and "Cutelinho" on the bottom. 
Its uniform colors is a yellow t-shirt with light (French) green shorts for home games and a white-green striped t-shirt with white sleeves with green rims at the end and green socks for away/alternate games.  White socks are used for both. 
From September 2014 to early April 2017, green-white striped T-shirt for home games and a white T-shirt with yellow sleeves for away games.  Black Shorts and green socks are used for both home and away matches. 
On 28 July 1419 Conrad crowned Sigismund of Luxembourg as King of Bohemia. Conrad took the side of the Hussites during the Hussite Wars, despite remaining a Catholic prelate, and was deposed as archbishop by the Roman Curia. 
Conrad was the probable original owner of a richly illuminated manuscript Bible, now known as the Antwerp Bible from its survival in the Museum Plantin-Moretus, Antwerp. 
Liu Kai (947-1000) was born at Daming in modern southernmost Hebei. He was known to be a highly accomplished scholar as well as a ruthless commander. Jiang Shaoyu (fl. 1115-1145) accused him of cannibalism and eating the minced livers of human beings, but this is likely a literary expression meant to evoke imagery of savageness rather than something to be taken literally. 
She also finished second once and third twice in the quadriennial World Team Olympiad, women flight. As of September 2011 she held historic rank 24 among European Grand Masters, Women category. (Female players commonly have rankings and may be grand masters in the open category too.) 
Born in London, Brunner attended the Henrietta Barnett School in Hampstead Garden Suburb, London, where she learned and practised her bridge playing skills during her sixth form years. 
Following this, she went to Manchester University where she read Italian and French, but her increasing involvement in bridge meant that she left without getting her degree to work in the travel industry for Thomas Cook for seventeen years. At university, she met and played with John Holland, who would also become an international player. He soon became her partner in life as well as in bridge, and they married in 2008. 
Brunner was a World Bridge Federation Life Master and an English Bridge Union (EBU) Premier Grand Master. 
Her Venice Cup win in 1985 was achieved as partner to Gill Scott-Jones on the Great Britain team. However the pair did not play enough boards to qualify for the title of World Champions. In 1980 she and Pat Davies were part of the Great Britain team that finished third in the World Team Olympiad, but the pair did not play enough boards to qualify for bronze medals.[citation needed] 
In 1988 the Great Britain team finished second and Brunner, as partner to Sandra Landy, did earn the silver medal. In 2004, she was part of the England team in the Olympiad which finished third, and received a bronze medal partnering Rhona Goldenfield. 
In mixed and women's events she won gold and bronze medals in the Common Market Championships and gold, silver and bronze in the European Championships. Partnering John Holland, she was part of three England teams which won the Camrose Trophy. Brunner was also in winning teams in the Lady Milne competition, the equivalent of the Camrose Trophy for women teams, on seven occasions.[citation needed] 
She turned professional in 1995, when she launched her Mobile School of Bridge. Brunner taught beginning and intermediate players until 2006. She did private teaching, as well as offering her services as a professional partner. As well as writing articles for bridge magazines, she wrote two books. 
Toledo was born in Ixtepec, Oaxaca, Mexico in 1970, and lives and works in Mexico City. Toledo is the daughter of Mexican artist Francisco Toledo. Her siblings include artist Dr. Lakra and poet Natalia Toledo. 
She began as a photographer, and later incorporated drawing, painting, video, sound and sculpture into her work. From January to March 2009, she was an artist in residence at Gasworks, a contemporary art organisation in South London, UK. She has been on the artists council of and is a co-founder of SOMA, an educational art space in Mexico City which hosts international artists, curators, critics, and art historians in residential programs. 
Laureana is inspired by the imperceptible or transient moments of the everyday, speculating on how such phenomena can gain new forms of visual presentation. Her work often involves systematic and repetitive interventions into different media (texts, books, photographs, painitngs, etc.) to re-code their existing narratives.
In 2019, Toledo exhibited an installation at Museo Jumex in Mexico City. She selected books, records and films from Mick Jones's, of The Clash, private collection. 
Board of Secondary Education, Rajasthan  (abbreviated BSER) is a board of education for school level education in the Indian state Rajasthan. RBSE is a state agency of the Government of Rajasthan and has its headquarters in Ajmer. Board is responsible for promotion and development of secondary education in Rajasthan state. BSER was set up in the year 1957 and constituted under the Rajasthan Secondary Education Act 1957. Results of examinations conducted by BSER can be accessed via website. 
Hyperaminoacidemia refers to the condition of having an excess of amino acids in the bloodstream. There is evidence that hyperaminoacidemia increases protein synthesis and anabolism. 
This article about an endocrine, nutritional, or metabolic disease is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Uki Goshi, also known as floating hip, is a type of hip throw. To execute the throw, the person throwing (known as tori) pulls the person being thrown, (known as uke) up and forward putting them off balance. Tori places uke round his/her back while turning so that the side of his/her hip is in close contact with uke and pulling uke's arm around. Tori then twists uke around using tori's back and hip as a pivot point. 
Tori's leading leg barely blocks uke's leading leg and tori is initially slightly sideways to uke rather than completely giving his back. It relies on a high level of skill but can be used more easily against heavier people than O Goshi. 
Uki goshi was developed by Jigoro Kano in the nineteenth century while he was studying Jujutsu in Japan.  Kano went on to create Judo and in 1895 he included Uki goshi in the first standard syllabus of Judo throws called the gokyo no waza. 
Christine Battersby FRSA (born 3 March 1946) is a British philosopher and Reader Emerita in Philosophy at the University of Warwick. She was the visiting Fleishhacker Chair of Philosophy at the University of San Francisco during April 2013. Battersby is a Fellow of the Royal Society of Arts. She is known for her research on feminist aesthetics. 
The Supreme Intelligence is a fictional character appearing in American comic books published by Marvel Comics. The Supreme Intelligence is an artificial intelligence that rules the alien race known as the Kree. 
The Supreme Intelligence made its film debut in Captain Marvel (2019), set in the Marvel Cinematic Universe, portrayed by Annette Bening. 
The Supreme Intelligence, also known as The Supremor, first appears in Fantastic Four #65 (Aug 1967) and was created by Stan Lee and Jack Kirby. It was introduced as a supercomputer that consists of the greatest minds of the Kree people for the last million years and it figures as their leader. The Kree build the Supremor, after the Skrulls built their own superweapon, the Cosmic Cube. Its main purpose is to further the development of the Kree at any cost. 
The Supreme Intelligence was initially a supporting character in first run of Captain Marvel featuring the original Mar-Vell. 
It made appearances as a supporting character and antagonist in the third volume of Silver Surfer and the first run of Ms. Marvel. 
It returned as the main antagonist for the 19-part crossover event called Operation: Galactic Storm, also known as the Kree/Shi'ar War. Which features the Kree, Shi'ar, Avengers and Quasar, in which the Avengers intervened in an intergalactic war between the alien Kree and Shi'ar empires. The event introduced the Starforce team, who was created by The Supremor. 
The Supreme Intelligence next appeared in the crossover storyline Annihilation and Annihilation: Conquest, it was supplanted by House Fiyero and who drove his greatest supporter Ronan into exile. Only the Kree were hit by the Annihilation Wave. Ronan lead a coup against the merchant house, slaughtering them and taking control of the empire. The Supremor was lobotomized however and put out of it misery. 
During the Infinity, the Kree were attacked by the Builders. The Supremor surrendered and refused to rebel even after the Builder in charge of Hala was destroyed by the Avengers. This resulted in Ronan and his accusers to attack it. The Kree alongside the Avengers defeated the Builders. Supremor accepted Ronan and his Accusers back into the fold without any known punishment. 
The last appearance the Supreme Intelligence made, was during The Black Vortex storyline. The Kree find an ancient weapon of mass power on their homeworld Hala, which attracts various groups to the homeworld. During the event, Mr. Knife of the Spartax blows up the planet along with the Supreme Intelligence. 
Eventually, the Supreme Intelligence developed a mind of its own and refused to create the Cosmic Cube knowing the dangers that could be wrought by an evolved Cosmic Cube, which was what had destroyed massive parts of the Skrull Empire. 
Despite this, it was allowed to continue to exist to serve the Kree with its wisdom. Its influence eventually grew to the point where it replaced the Kree government as Ruler of the Kree Empire, although it has occasionally been subsequently deposed for periods of time. Most of the Kree are fanatically devoted to it, and its worship is an organized religion. 
During the "Operation: Galactic Storm" storyline, the Supremor secretly arranged to have a "Nega-Bomb" (a device producing a special kind of radiation gathered from the Negative Zone) detonated in the Kree Galaxy, hoping its energies would reactivate the Kree's genetic potential. But in the process, billions of Kree were killed. This led a group of Avengers to decide to execute it for genocide, against the wishes of the rest of the team. 
Supremor reached the Kree Empire and had a new housing constructed for it, as it soon managed to obtain the Forever Crystal, a very powerful mystical artifact, from Kang the Conqueror, and used it to advance the Kree's evolution, creating a supposedly new race, the Ruul. Through them, it manipulated the Intergalactic Council into turning against the Earth, but its plans were stopped by the Avengers. 
During the "Infinity" storyline, the Supreme Intelligence and Ronan the Accuser appeared as members of the Galactic Council. While initially helpful with the Galactic Council's efforts to halt the march of the Builders, the Intelligence commanded its people to surrender once the Kree homeworld was taken by the Builders. After Ronan and his Accuser Corps fractured away to continue the battle, the Supreme Intelligence gave them blanket amnesty upon the success of the campaign. 
The Inhuman Royal Family's expedition led by Noh-Varr later arrived on Hala. Noh-Varr planted the a seed from We-Plex Supreme Intelligence System from Earth-200080 into the Supreme Intelligence's remains. This resulted in the resurrection of the Plex Intelligence as it absorbs the material from the other Supreme Intelligence. 
During the "Infinity Countdown" storyline, this new form of the Supreme Intelligence was renamed the Extreme Intelligence. It planned to have the Infinity Gems acquired so that it can resurrect the Kree empire. 
Supremor is also capable of manipulating energy and matter, as well as create up to three remote controlled android servitors as surrogate bodies, that act as its eyes and ears when away from itself. These androids, called Supremor also, possess some degree of independence when created, but are totally loyal to Supremor. 
It projects images of itself across space, Cyberspace and even into the Astral Plane, in the form of a huge, amorphous, greenish, humanoid face, with tentacle-like "hair", to communicate with its agents scattered across the cosmos. It has even assumed the form of an orange dragon with a green-skinned octopus as its head, called the Multitude. 
Its power was enhanced when it merged with an inert Cosmic Cube, which now serves as its true housing, kept in a separate room from the organic computer facade it created to fool would-be assassins. Upon assuming its new housing, Supremor was now able to control reality within a limited distance of itself, as well as able to open up portals between dimensions, most notably the Astral Plane and the dimension of Death. 
The Supreme Intelligence did show an ability to dominate Earth technology remotely and to teleport itself and the ship short distances.[citation needed] It was also shown to control insectlike creatures that inhabited the ship.[citation needed] All these powers were achieved via transmission of a signal called "The Omni-Wave." 
Mayer has published numerous works on electoral politics. With Pascal Perrineau (fr), she co-directed a large group that studied the National Front. Her research focuses on electoral sociology, in particular that of the National Front and the French far right. She also studies associative activism, racism and anti-Semitism. 
Mayer also participates in the Racism and Xenophobia European Network, and in the Group Focused Enmity comparative survey led by Wilhelm Heitmeyer. In February 2016, she was appointed member of the scientific council of the Inter-Ministerial Delegation to Combat Racism and Anti-Semitism, chaired by Dominique Schnapper. 
HighNote Records is a jazz record company and label founded by Joe Fields with his son, Barney Fields, in 1997. 
Joe Fields worked for Prestige Records in the 1960s, and in the 1970s founded Muse Records. After he sold Muse, he started the Highnote and Savant labels with his son, Barney. Many of the artists on Highnote previously recorded for Muse. 
The catalogue includes Cindy Blackman, Larry Coryell, Joey DeFrancesco, Charles Earland, Russell Gunn, Etta Jones, Sheila Jordan, Houston Person, and Jimmy Ponder. 
Daron Malakian and Scars on Broadway (previously known as just Scars on Broadway) is an American rock band founded by Daron Malakian of the metal band System of a Down. The band's self-titled debut album was released in July 2008. 
In late 2008, the band entered a hiatus, with Malakian citing a lack of enthusiasm and "his heart not being into touring" as the primary reasons for the band's cessation. Despite reforming with various line-up changes in 2010 and 2012 and announcing a second album, the band ceased any further announcements by 2013. In April 2018, Malakian announced that the band would be releasing their second album titled Dictator in July 2018. 
After Malakian and Dolmayan experimented with different musicians, for a period of nine months in 2007 the band took form and forged its sound in intense rehearsals and recording sessions under Malakian's direction at his home studio and Sunset Sound; with musicians Danny Shamoun on keyboards, Dominic Cifarelli on bass, and Franky Perez on guitar and backing vocals. The band begun recording their debut album in September 2007. 
The band's website featured a countdown timer, counting down to 15:00 PST on March 28, 2008. Additionally, above the timer, in quotation marks was the phrase "They say it's all about to end." When the countdown ended, the song "They Say" was made available on the site and their Myspace account. 
Scars on Broadway played their first live show April 11, 2008 at the Whisky a Go Go in Los Angeles. They also played with Metallica at KFMA Day 2008 in Tucson, Arizona. On January 22, 2008, Scars on Broadway were announced to be performing at the Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival on April 26, 2008. They also performed at the sixteenth annual KROQ Weenie Roast. 
On May 2, 2008, the band announced that their debut album, Scars on Broadway, would be released on July 28, 2008. A week later, the band was signed to Interscope Records. The first single would be the aforementioned "They Say", which would receive radio airplay, and be made available on Guitar Hero 5 and as a downloadable track on Rock Band. The music video for the track was released on June 27. 
In July, the band announced a headlining tour set for October 2008. Scars on Broadway was released on July 28, 2008, to generally favorable reviews and debuted at No. 17 on the Billboard charts. A second single, "World Long Gone", was released on September 8, and featured a music video directed by filmmaker Joel Schumacher. 
On April 10, 2010, the band announced their return show. On May 2, Scars on Broadway played a sold out show at The Troubadour in West Hollywood. The band performed all of the songs off their first album (except for "Kill Each Other / Live Forever"), as well as a new song "Talkin' Shit". They also played a cover song "Forever My Queen" by the band Pentagram. System of a Down bassist Shavo Odadjian accompanied and played 3rd guitar for "Cute Machines" and "They Say". 
On July 29, 2010, a new song titled "Fucking" was released on SoundCloud, using a special feature where users had to share the song on social media to unlock the download. On August 20, 2010, Scars on Broadway played a sold out show at the Avalon in Hollywood. The first 500 people in line at the concert received a free copy of the single on vinyl. A music video for "Fucking" was later released in March 2011, using footage from the concert. 
Despite plans for an untitled album to be out early 2013 mentioned at live shows, no new information regarding the album was given until 2018. 
EU Member State(Eurozone Member State)(Schengen Area Member State)NATO Member StateCouncil of Europe Member StateOECD Member State 
Through NJPW's working relationship with the American Ring of Honor (ROH) and the British Revolution Pro Wrestling (RPW) promotions, he has also won the ROH World Television Championship once and is a two-time RPW British Heavyweight Champion. 
"Ishii is the ultimate example of a guy who was destined to just be a decent worker on the undercard, who garnered a cult following in Tokyo, which spread to the rest of the country and resulted in him getting a push." 
In 2016, Ishii starred in the music video for "Darling" by May's, the same artist that produced his ring theme song, "Stone Pitbull". 
Chung joined Sun Source when he was 15 years old. In 2015, Chung joined Hong Kong Premier League club Dreams Metro Gallery. On 30 January 2016, Chung scored his first goal in his football career against Hong Kong Pegasus, which the match wins 3:0. 
On 12 July 2016, Chung was introduced as a Hong Kong Pegasus player during the club's season opening training session. 
On 11 November 2018, Chung made his debut for the national team and scored an important goal to help Hong Kong defeat Chinese Taipei 2-1. The performance was appreciated by the coaches and fans. 
This biographical article related to Hong Kong association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is located in the Madlener House in Chicago's Gold Coast neighborhood. As of 2018, the Graham Foundation has awarded over 4,400 grants. 
In July 2020, The Graham Foundation for Advanced Studies in the Fine Arts reported a total of 52 awards worth $320,800. Grants will fund important projects tackling and shaping the future of architecture and the developed environment. 
The Graham Foundation aims to foster dialogue and expand the audience around architecture and its impacts on society and culture. To that end, the organization hosts galleries, an outdoor collection of architectural fragments, an archive of grantee publications, and a ballroom for lectures and events open to the public. Notable architects including Rem Koolhaas, Denise Scott Brown, Robert Venturi, Buckminster Fuller, and Louis Kahn have lectured and held exhibitions there. 
The Graham Foundation Bookshop, also located in the Madlener house, houses grant-funded titles, international periodicals, and rare publications on architecture, urbanism, and related fields. 
Beloit is a city in Rock County, Wisconsin, United States. As of the 2010 census, the city had a population of 36,966 people. 
Beloit was originally named New Albany (after Albany, Vermont) in 1837 by its founder, Caleb Blodgett. The name was changed to Beloit in 1838. The name was coined to be reminiscent of Detroit. 
Beloit lays claim to such inventions as the speedometer, Korn Kurls, and John Francis Appleby's twine binder. Korn Kurls, which resemble Cheetos, was the original puffed cheese snack. 
Beloit's 1889 Water Tower Place began demolition in 1935, which was halted because of the cost. A historic pump station is nearby. 
The Fairbanks Flats were built in 1917 to house the rush of African Americans moving to the area from the Southern United States. 
Pearsons Hall of Science was designed by the architectural firm Burnham and Root for Beloit College as a science center. 
The Castle at 501 Prospect was built as First Presbyterian Church in 1902. It now operates as a Performing Arts Center and Music School. 
Downtown Beloit is the city's historic economic, cultural and social center. North of the confluence of the Rock River and Turtle Creek, the downtown is anchored by a core of historic buildings and the Ironworks office and industrial campus. Beloit's riverfront park system, mainly Riverside Park, extends north of downtown along the east bank toward the Town of Beloit. 
The city is adjacent to the Town of Beloit, Town of Turtle, and the Illinois municipality of South Beloit. 
Most of Beloit's development is occurring on the east side, adjacent to Interstates 39/90 and Interstate 43, where the city annexed rural land for Beloit Gateway Industrial Park, as well as in the newly revitalized downtown along the Rock River. 
There were 13,781 households, of which 36.5% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 39.6% were married couples living together, 18.3% had a female householder with no husband present, 6.4% had a male householder with no wife present, and 35.7% were non-families. 29.4% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.57 and the average family size was 3.16. 
The median age in the city was 33.1 years. 27.1% of residents were under the age of 18; 12.1% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 25.7% were from 25 to 44; 23.1% were from 45 to 64; 12% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 47.9% male and 52.1% female. 
Beloit is represented by Janis Ringhand and Stephen Nass in the Wisconsin State Senate, Amy Loudenbeck and Mark Spreitzer in the Wisconsin State Assembly, Mark Pocan in the United States House of Representatives, and Ron Johnson and Tammy Baldwin in the United States Senate. 
Beloit has a council-manager system of government, with seven council members, each elected for two-year terms. Four members are elected in even years and three in odd years. City council elections are held annually in April. The city council establishes policies for the city and appoints a city manager to implement those policies. The current city manager, Lori S. Curtis Luther, was appointed on June 1, 2015. 
Industries with headquarters in Beloit include ABC Supply Company, Bio-Systems International, Broaster Company, Fairbanks-Morse Defense, Hendricks Holding Company, Murmac Paint Manufacturing, PlayMonster, and Regal Beloit. 
Downtown Beloit is a dense cluster of mostly small shops and boutiques. The area has been recognized for increased investment and renewal since the 1990s. Upscale downtown condominiums and hotels were introduced after 2000 with the construction of the Hotel Hilton Apartments (2001), the Beloit Inn (now the Ironworks Hotel, 2003), Heritage View (2005), and the Phoenix Project (2013). 
From the 1990s to 2011, downtown Beloit received direct public and private investment totaling more than $75 million. In 2011, Beloit was a Great American Main Street Award winner. In 2012, Beloit was listed #17 on Travel and Leisure's list of America's Greatest Mainstreets. 
The School District of Beloit serves more than 6,800 students in six primary schools, four intermediate schools, and one high school, with alternative programming and charter schools. Beloit Memorial High School is the city's public high school. The Roy Chapman Andrews Academy, a project-based charter school, is part of the School District of Beloit and serves grades 6 through 12. 
Beloit College, a private liberal arts college with undergraduate enrollment around 1,300, is in the city, with the main campus adjacent to downtown. The campus has a number of prehistoric Native American mounds. 
Beloit is also home to Concordia University's Beloit location, Beloit Center. The center offers courses designed for working adults interested in getting their associate's, bachelor's, and graduate degrees. 
Beloit's main newspaper is The Beloit Daily News, a daily (published Monday through Friday) paper owned by Adams Publishing Group, LLC, and serving the Wisconsin/Illinois stateline area. The Janesville Gazette, also owned by Adams Publishing Group, also serves Beloit. 
Beloit is a part of the Madison television market, but due to its proximity to Rockford, stations from Rockford also serve the city and report on stories and information (weather, school closings, etc.) relating to Beloit. 
Radio stations serving Beloit include WBCR (90.3 FM), a variety-formatted station owned by The Board of Trustees of Beloit College, '90s hits station WBEL (1380 AM), classic country station WGEZ (1490 AM), Janesville-based stations WCLO (1230 AM) and WJVL (99.9 FM), and Fort Atkinson-based WSJY (107.3 FM). 
Beloit is home to a professional minor league baseball team, the Beloit Snappers, who play in the Midwest League and are the High A affiliate of the Miami Marlins. The Snappers play their games at ABC Supply Stadium. Until August 3, 2021, they played at Harry C. Pohlman Field. 
The Beloit Transit System is the primary provider of mass transportation. Four regular routes provide service from Monday through Saturday. In collaboration with the Janesville Transit System, BTS operates an express route between the two cities. 
Beloit Airport is a small public-use GA airport within the city. It offers hangars for storing aircraft, gliders, and sky diving. 
Southern Wisconsin Regional Airport is a public airport north of Beloit in Rock County. Formerly known as Rock County Airport, it is owned and operated by the Rock County government. The airport has no scheduled commercial passenger service. 
Dane County Regional Airport and Rockford International Airport are the closest airports to Beloit that offer scheduled airline service. 
In 1934, Fieger was blacklisted by the Nazi Party, though he continued to produce architectural work anonymously. 
Following World War II Fieger participated in the rebuilding of Dessau and was involved in Hubert Hoffmann's efforts to reopen the Bauhaus. 
In a short period of time, the company produced four classics of the period: Plunder of Peach and Plum (dir. Ying Yunwei), Children of Troubled Times (dir. Xu Xingzhi), Cityscape (dir. Yuan Muzhi), and Spirit of Freedom (dir. Situ Huimin) (also known as The Goddess of Freedom). 
The word Vellalar may come from the root Vellam for flood, which gave rise to various rights of land; and it is because of the acquisition of land rights that the Vellalar got their name. 
The Vellalars have a long cultural history that goes back to over two millennia in southern India, where once they were the ruling and land-owning community. 
According to the anthropologist Kathleen Gough, "the Vellalars were the dominant secular aristocratic caste under the Chola kings, providing the courtiers, most of the army officers, the lower ranks of the kingdom's bureaucracy, and the upper layer of the peasantry". 
The Vellalars who were land owners and tillers of the soil and held offices pertaining to land, were ranked as Sat-Sudra in the 1901 census; with the Government of Madras recognising that the 4-fold division (four varnas) did not describe the South Indian, or Dravidian, society adequately. Following the arrival of Dutch missionaries in the early 18th century, some Vellalar converted to Christianity. 
The Vellalars of Sri Lanka have been chronicled in the Yalpana Vaipava Malai and other historical texts of the Jaffna kingdom. They form half of the Sri Lankan Tamil population and are the major husbandmen, involved in tillage and cattle cultivation. Local Sri Lankan literature, such as the Kailiyai Malai, an account on Kalinga Magha, narrates the migration of Vellala Nattar chiefs from the Coromandel Coast to Sri Lanka. 
Their dominance rose under Dutch rule and they formed one of the colonial political elites of the island. 
Mac Ruth is an American sound mixer. He has worked on numerous films, including Underworld (2003), The Cave (2005), Eragon (2006), Hansel & Gretel: Witch Hunters (2013). Hercules (2014), The Martian (2015), Spy (2015), among others. 
He was nominated at the 88th Academy Awards in the category of Best Sound Mixing for The Martian. His nomination was shared with Paul Massey and Mark Taylor. 
He was also nominated at the 89th Academy Awards and the 90th Academy Awards for his work on 13 Hours: The Secret Soldiers of Benghazi and Blade Runner 2049, respectively. 
This biographical article related to cinema of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dulwich Library opened on 24 November 1897. It is an example of a Passmore Edwards library  and is located at No. 368 Lordship Lane in East Dulwich, southeast London, England. 
The Library is managed by Southwark Council. The library has been listed Grade II on the National Heritage List for England since March 2016. 
The library was designed by Charles Barry Jr. in his capacity as architect and surveyor to Dulwich College, who donated the site on which the library stands. It was built as a memorial to the Elizabethan actor Edward Alleyn, the founder of Dulwich College and Alleyn's School. The foundation stone of the library was laid by the prominent actor Henry Irving on 24 September 1896, and the library was subsequently opened by the Lord Chancellor, Lord Halsbury, on 24 November 1897. 
The library was opened on 24 November 1897 after the site was donated by Dulwich College. The library opened with a stock of 10,152 books. 
The 2011 Extremaduran regional election was held on Sunday, 22 May 2011, to elect the 8th Assembly of the autonomous community of Extremadura. All 65 seats in the Assembly were up for election. The election was held simultaneously with regional elections in twelve other autonomous communities and local elections all throughout Spain. 
For the first time since the first democratic election in 1983 in the region, the People's Party (PP) was able to win a regional election, obtaining its best historical result, with 46.1% of the share and 32 seats. The Spanish Socialist Workers' Party (PSOE), which had formed the government of the Extremaduran region since 1983, achieving an absolute majority of seats at every election except in 1995, was ousted from power in the worst result obtained by the party until that time. 
The Assembly of Extremadura was the devolved, unicameral legislature of the autonomous community of Extremadura, having legislative power in regional matters as defined by the Spanish Constitution and the Extremaduran Statute of Autonomy, as well as the ability to vote confidence in or withdraw it from a regional president. 
The president had the prerogative to dissolve the Assembly of Extremadura and call a snap election, provided that no motion of no confidence was in process and that dissolution did not occur before one year had elapsed since the previous one. In the event of an investiture process failing to elect a regional president within a two-month period from the first ballot, the Assembly was to be automatically dissolved and a fresh election called. 
Allen W. Wilder (born 1843) was a state legislator, teacher, and lawyer in Texas. He was born into slavery in North Carolina. He was possibly the first African American in Texas to become a lawyer. 
He served one term representing Washington County, Texas in the Texas House of Representatives after winning office in the 1872 election. His election to the House in 1876 was overturned. 
Bruceanol B is a cytotoxic quassinoid isolated from Brucea antidysenterica with potential antitumor and antileukemic properties. 
mir-395 is a non-coding RNA called a microRNA that was identified in both Arabidopsis thaliana and Oryza sativa computationally and was later experimentally verified. mir-395 is thought to target mRNAs coding for ATP sulphurylases. The mature sequence is excised from the 3' arm of the hairpin. 
miR-395 is upregulated in Arabidopsis during sulphate-limited conditions, when the mature miRNA then regulates sulphur transporters and ATP sulphurylases. 
Greece was not one of the ten founding members of the Council of Europe, but it was the first state to join, doing so three months later, on 9 August 1949. In 1953, the Hellenic Parliament unanimously ratified the Council of Europe's human rights treaty, the European Convention on Human Rights, and its first protocol. Greece filed the first interstate case before the European Commission of Human Rights, Greece v. United Kingdom, in 1956, alleging human rights violations in British Cyprus. 
The Constitution of Greece forbids proselytism, a blanket ban which  European Court of Human Rights has ruled to be incompatible with Article 9 in multiple influential cases, including Larissis and others v. Greece and Kokkinakis v. Greece. In both cases, the Court found that, while banning proselytism may be justified under certain circumstances, a blanket ban violates freedom of religion. 
Greece also participates in the Council of Europe bodies European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI), the European Committee for the Prevention of Torture (CPT), and the Group of States against Corruption (GRECO). 
In 2020, Greece assumed the presidency of the Council of Europe from May to November. That year, the Greek government nominated the European Court of Human Rights for the Nobel Peace Prize. 
Jack Lewis (born 1902, date of death unknown) was an Irish equestrian. He competed in two events at the 1948 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Irish equestrianism is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football forward born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aparallactus jacksonii, or Jackson's centipede-eater, is a species of venomous rear-fanged snake in the family Atractaspididae. 
The specific epithet, jacksonii, is honor of English explorer and ornithologist Frederick John Jackson, who presented the type specimen to the British Museum (Natural History). 
A. jacksonii is found in Ethiopia, north Tanzania, south Sudan, Kenya, Somalia, Uganda. Type locality = "Foot of Mt. Kilimanjaro". 
Jackson's centipede-eater is pale reddish brown dorsally, with a black vertebral line. Ventrally it is uniformly yellowish. The upper surface of the head and the nape of the neck are black. The nuchal blotch is edged with yellow, extending to the sides of the neck. There is a pair of yellow spots behind the parietal shields. The sides of the head are yellow, with the shields bordering the eye black. 
Rogers TV (stylized as Rogers tv) is a group of English-language community channels owned by Rogers Communications. Many of these channels share common programs. Rogers TV broadcasts in the Canadian provinces of New Brunswick, Newfoundland and Labrador and Ontario. Rogers TV is available only in communities served by Rogers' cable and telecom division, and is not carried by other television service providers. Its French counterpart is TV Rogers. 
Rogers TV serves over 2.3 million cable subscribers. Programming on the channels is produced with the assistance of volunteers and community partners and associations, who assist, with the production and content of these programs. 
Historically Rogers TV channels have been run as local public-access television channels; whereas some stations are still run as community access, most stations are run as community stations where production is done in-house with community involvement, or produced by local production studios that provide their shows to be aired by Rogers TV.  
The present form of Rogers TV dates to 2000, when Rogers and Shaw Communications agreed to swap cable systems servicing British Columbia and Alberta by Rogers as well as Ontario, New Brunswick and Nova Scotia served by Shaw. 
In 2017 Rogers TV stations in the Greater Toronto Area closed as part of budget reallocations; this came in response to new CRTC regulations, allowing companies that co-own broadcast stations and cable providers in a metropolitan market to divert the mandatory funding for community channels to support local news operations for their broadcast stations. 
Some programs feature local journalists from radio, print and TV media. The programs are occasionally derivative of mainstream commercial fare with emphasis on the communities the stations are in. 
Rogers also owns a stake in Cable 14, a community channel in Hamilton, Ontario co-owned with Cogeco and Source Cable. 
One Night is an album by folk singer/guitarist Greg Brown. It was re-released on CD by Red House Records. 
It was during this concert at the Minneapolis folk club Coffeehouse Extempore that Red House Records founder Bob Feldman heard and met Greg Brown. He later reissued Brown's first two albums. The CD reissue of One Night adds five songs from the same show. 
The women's 100 metre backstroke event at the 1980 Summer Olympics was held on 22 and 23 July at the Swimming Pool at the Olimpiysky Sports Complex. 
In 1932, McCarran unseated incumbent Republican Tasker Oddie to become the state's first U.S. Senator born in Nevada; he was reelected three times and served from 1933 until his death. In his Senate career, McCarran served as chairman of the committees on the District of Columbia, Judiciary, and Joint Foreign Economic Cooperation. 
He attended Nevada State University (now University of Nevada, Reno) but withdrew to work on the family sheep ranch after his father suffered an injury. Instead of returning to college, McCarran studied law with attorney William Woodburn.  
Some sources incorrectly state that McCarran received a bachelor's degree in 1901 and a master's degree in 1915. In fact, he never received a bachelor's degree, and he was awarded an honorary Master of Arts from Nevada State University in 1915. He also received an honorary LL.D. from Georgetown University in 1943 and an honorary LL.D. from the University of Nevada in 1945. 
McCarran ran for the Nevada Assembly in 1902 as a free silver Democrat with encouragement from his political science professor Anne Henrietta Martin. He was elected and served one term from 1903 to 1905. In 1904, he was an unsuccessful candidate for the Nevada State Senate. 
He was admitted to the bar in 1905. In 1906, he was elected district attorney of Nye County. He served one term, 1907 to 1909, after which he moved to Reno to continue practicing law. 
In 1912, McCarran was elected to the Supreme Court of Nevada, succeeding John G. Sweeney. He served as an Associate Justice from January 1913 to January 1917. 
In January 1917, he succeeded Frank Herbert Norcross as Chief Justice. He was an unsuccessful candidate for reelection in 1918 and left office in January 1919. 
Both during his time on the court and afterwards, McCarran continued to play a central role in Nevada's state government, as well as its legal and criminal justice systems. From 1913 to 1918, he served on the state Board of Library Commissioners. In addition, he served as chairman of the Nevada State University Board of Visitors. 
During his time on the Court from 1913 to 1919, McCarran served on the state Board of Pardons. He was a member of the Board of Parole Commissioners from 1913 to 1918, and he served on the Board of Bar Examiners from 1919 until 1932. 
McCarran was president of the Nevada Bar Association from 1920 to 1921 and was a vice president of the American Bar Association from 1922 to 1923. 
In 1926, McCarran was again a candidate for the U.S. Senate. He lost the Democratic nomination to Raymond T. Baker, who was defeated by Republican incumbent Tasker Oddie in the general election. 
In 1932, McCarran won the Democratic nomination and defeated Oddie in the general election. He was reelected in 1938, 1944, and 1950. He served from March 4, 1933 until his death in 1954. 
During his career as a Senator, McCarran served as chairman of the Senate Committees on the District of Columbia (77th and 78th Congresses) and Judiciary (78th, 79th, 81st, and 82nd Congresses). He also served as co-chairman of the Joint Committee on Foreign Economic Cooperation (81st United States Congress). 
Although both were Democrats, McCarran came into increasing opposition with President Franklin D. Roosevelt over patronage decisions, the Second New Deal, and foreign policy. 
McCarran supported the war effort after the United States entered the conflict following the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor. 
When Felix Frankfurter, who was in Austria, was the first Jewish Supreme Court nominee to be considered by the Judiciary Committee, McCarran "used the occasion to launch a nasty, sneering attack on the nominee, filled with innuendo about Frankfurter's foreign origins and alleged radical associations." 
McCarran sponsored numerous laws concerning the early commercial aviation industry, including the Civil Aeronautics Act of 1938 and the Federal Airport Act of 1945. He was an early advocate of separating the United States Army Air Forces from the Army as the Air Force and began sponsoring the necessary legislation in 1933. 
In 1945, McCarran co-sponsored the McCarran-Ferguson Act, which exempted the insurance industry from most federal regulations, including antitrust rules.  Instead, this act required states to regulate insurance, including mandatory licensing requirements. 
McCarran also co-sponsored the 1946 Administrative Procedures Act, which required federal agencies to keep the public informed of their organizational structure, procedures and rules, allowed for public participation in the rule making process, and established uniform standards for the conduct of formal rule making. 
Biographer Michael Ybarra's book demonstrates that "arguably no American wrecked as many lives as did the great Red hunter from Nevada." 
Some of the immigration provisions of the act were later superseded by the 1965 Immigration Act, but the power of the government to deny visas for ideological reasons remained on the books another 25 years after that. 
McCarran used his legislative skill to prevent immigration by Holocaust survivors, opposing admission of Jews and potential communists. 
McCarran died in Hawthorne, Nevada on September 28, 1954, collapsing of a heart attack following a speech he gave at a political rally. McCarran was buried at Mountain View Cemetery in Reno. 
Harold L. Ickes described McCarran as "easy-going, old-shoe 'Pat'" in a column criticizing McCarran as a tool of the oil companies. American journalist John Gunther was also critical of McCarran's alleged corporate ties, writing that he resembled gold "in that he is soft, heavy, and not a good conductor." 
McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas is named after Senator McCarran. Many Nevada politicians have supported removing his name from the airport due to his antisemitism. Senator Harry Reid said he was "one of the most prejudiced people who has ever served in the Senate." On February 16, 2021, the Clark County Commissioners voted unanimously to officially change McCarran International airport to Harry Reid International Airport, after former Sen. Harry Reid. 
A statue of McCarran is included in the National Statuary Hall Collection at the United States Capitol.  Each state is allowed to display likenesses of two individuals; Nevada's are those of McCarran and Sarah Winnemucca. 
In 2017, Nevada's three Democratic members of the U.S. House of Representatives wrote to Governor Brian Sandoval and state legislative leaders and stated their view that review of McCarran's career might warrant removal of his statue from the National Statuary Hall Collection. 
While he fought for workers' rights and helped shape the country's aviation industry, McCarran left a legacy of racism, xenophobia and anti-Semitism, said the letter sent Tuesday by Reps. Dina Titus, Ruben Kihuen and Jacky Rosen.
In January, 2017, a poll of Nevada legislators indicated support for removing McCarran's statue from the collection.  A bill introduced in the Nevada State Senate, SB 174, which called for the removal of the statue and renaming of McCarran International Airport for former U.S. Senator Harry Reid, failed to be passed before the end of the 2017 legislative session on June 1, 2017. 
Pope John II (Latin: Ioannes II; died 8 May 535), born Mercurius, was the bishop of Rome from 2 January 533 to his death. As a priest at St. Clement's Basilica, he endowed that church with gifts and commissioned stone carvings for it. 
Mercurius was elected pope on 2 January 533, apparently the first pope to adopt a new name upon elevation to the papacy. 
The notoriously adulterous behavior of Bishop Contumeliosus of Riez caused John to order the bishops of Gaul to confine him in a monastery. Until a new bishop could be appointed, he bade the clergy of Riez to obey the Bishop of Arles. 
In 535, 217 bishops assembled in a council at Carthage submitted to John II a decision about whether bishops who had lapsed into Arianism should, on repentance, keep their rank or be admitted only to lay communion. The question of re-admittance to the lapsed troubled north Africa for centuries (see Novatianism and Donatism). The answer to their question was given by Agapetus I, as John II died on 8 May 535. He was buried in St Peter's Basilica. 
Tsaveyo is the Giant Ogre kachina, one of the Hopi spirit beings. There are numerous Hopi stories and legends about him. These date from the time of the Hopi migrations. 
  A. Stephen describes him as he appeared in a Hopi ritual trotting through the plaza looking for victims. He wore a skin mask with bits of cedar bark strung over the top, and he had a war axe and a sabre which he carried like a staff. 
Modern versions may show him with an array of turkey feathers as a headdress.  The slight difference in dress and weapons may be linked to the differences in appearance that have evolved in the isolated settlements on the three Hopi mesas.  Chaveyo may appear in the Powamu, or Bean Dance, and his symbolism is a close likeness to that of other Natackas and Soyokos, members of the Ogre family. 
A teaching story told by a First Mesa story teller introduces the evil Chaveyo as the reason for the destruction of Awatovi, a Hopi village. The story follows the traditional form of Hopi oral literature where when the people of the village behave improperly their chief seeks help to end their evil ways. 
Hopi Oral history includes the story where Chaveyo headed the Hopi warriors in the Pueblo Rebellion at the Hopi village of Oraibi in killing the Franciscan priest and destroying the church and mission. 
His first World Cup victory was a Super-G in Lech in December 1993, where he won with a bib number of 51, after weather conditions improved after the early starters had completed their runs. This is the highest start number for a male Super-G winner until now. 
This article about the Municipality of Mislinja in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The William Ward Jr. House is a historic house at 137 Powder Hill Road in Middlefield, Connecticut.  Built in 1742,  it is the oldest surviving house in Middlefield.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1988. 
The property was first granted to William Ward in the 17th century, when the area was part of Middletown.  His great-grandson, also named William, built this house in 1742.  It is the oldest surviving house in Middlefield, and is architecturally distinctive for the use of cantilevered girts to support the rear leanto roof.  The house remained in the hands of the Wards and associated families until 1935. 
Kathleen Bradley is an American former model, former singer, actress and host. She is primarily known as a "Barker's Beauty" on the CBS daytime game show The Price Is Right from 1990 until 2000. She is noted as the first permanent African-American model on the show. 
Born to Albert and Winifred Bradley in Girard, Ohio, Bradley was the only girl of four brothers. She won the "Miss Black California" award in 1971. In the 1970s, she was part of two short-lived disco groups, The Love Machine and Destination. She played the role of Mrs. Parker in the 1995 movie Friday. 
Bradley has been married twice. Her first marriage was to actor Bill Overton from 1980 to 1984. She has been married to mechanical engineer Terrence Redd since 1988. She has two children; a daughter, Cheyenne Overton, from her marriage with Overton; and their son Terrence Redd II. Her stepdaughter Dior is from Redd's marriage to actress Bern Nadette Stanis. 
The 1805 New Hampshire gubernatorial election took place on March 12, 1805. Incumbent Federalist Governor John Taylor Gilman was defeated for re-election by Democratic-Republican candidate, former Governor and U.S. Senator John Langdon in a re-match of the previous year's election. 
Buloqboshi is a raion (district) of Andijan Region in Uzbekistan. The capital lies at Buloqboshi. The population is 110,000 people. 
Since SBY Regional Airport is the only commercial airport with daily scheduled flights in the area, it also serves Delaware, the Eastern Shore of Virginia, and the Eastern Shore of Maryland, which include the other towns of Ocean City, Cambridge, and Easton. American Eagle operates approximately two round trip flights per day to Charlotte Douglas International Airport, and two round trip flights per day to Philadelphia International Airport. 
In 1940, Wicomico County and the City of Salisbury begun to construct the airport with the Works Progress Administration. It originally encompassed 695 acres and cost $1.5 million. Officially opened on November 11, 1943, Salisbury was originally leased to the U.S. Navy as a training base during World War II up through 1945. 
On April 21, 2016, Donald Trump's private Boeing 757 landed for his rally at Stephen Decatur High School. His 757-200 and the Air Force's C-32 variant of the 757-200 are the largest aircraft to land at the airport.[citation needed] 
Since 2019, the airport has been served by a full-service restaurant - part of the regionally popular Rosenfeld's Jewish Deli chain. 
Bayland Aviation is the fixed-base operator at Salisbury. Jet fuel and Avgas are handled and supplied by Bayland. They also offer public flight training using a group of small Cessna and Piper aircraft. Charter flights can be scheduled through Bayland to multiple destinations throughout the East Coast. 
The airport is the operational headquarters for American Eagle carrier Piedmont Airlines. In 2012, Piedmont established a passenger record of 150,086 passengers. 
Piedmont previously served Salisbury with flights to Washington D.C. and Baltimore. The service to Washington was on and off until 2008; the Baltimore service stopped in late 2009. 
Allegiant Air began twice a week service to Orlando-Sanford International Airport in February 2012, using its McDonnell Douglas MD-80 jets, but ended the route less than a year later on January 5, 2013, due to the route's relatively small number of passengers. 
According to 2015 statistics from the General Statistics Office of Vietnam, the province has a population of 1,072,600. Urbanization in the province is above the country's average (50.52%). 
The government is also planning to increase investments in the development of terminals and road infrastructure to increase connectivity, efficiency, and port capacity. 
Within the province, the connectivity between ports or industrial zones with the national roadway systems is supported by numerous regional highways, port roads, and industrial zone roads. 
As of August 2018, there are 15 industrial parks in BRVT, including nine which are operational with an average occupancy rate of 47 percent. There are currently 339 projects in local industrial parks, including 162 foreign and 177 domestic projects. 
A total of 464 athletes will compete at the volleyball competitions at the 2015 European Games; 336 in indoor volleyball and 128 in beach volleyball. Most of the qualification places will be based on the CEV Rankings as of 1 January 2015. 
Graham's sister, Isabel LeBourdais, was a journalist whose 1966 book The Trial of Steven Truscott played a key role in disputing the evidence that led to Steven Truscott's controversial murder conviction, and her brother John Erichsen-Brown was a diplomat with the Canadian Department of External Affairs. 
Graham died in 1965 of an undiagnosed brain tumour, aged 52. Her illness and death resulted in the cancellation of a planned sequel to Dear Enemies. 
Both Swiss Sonata and Earth and High Heaven were reissued by Cormorant Books in 2004. Graham is the subject of a biography, Gwethalyn Graham: a Liberated Woman in a Conventional Age, by Barbara Meadowcroft (Toronto: Women's Press, 2008). 
Walter "Hawk" Newsome is an American activist and law school graduate who co-founded Black Lives Matter of Greater New York with Chivona Newsome. 
In November 2021, Newsome threatened "riots", "fire", and "bloodshed" in the streets if New York City mayor-elect Eric Adams decides to reverse the abolition of the New York City Police Department's (NYPD) controversial anti-crime units. 
Newsome has filed two ongoing civil lawsuits against the NYPD, alleging that he was assaulted by police officers and falsely arrested during two separate protests in 2017 and 2018. A video posted by the New York Daily News shows a police officer punching Newsome before several police officers tackled him to the ground. Newsome was holding a sign that read: "Blue Klux Klan". 
In 2021, Newsome called for an "independent investigation" into the BLM Global Network's finances after it was reported that Black Lives Matter co-founder Patrisse Cullors purchased four homes for $3.2 million. 
Newsome lives in The Bronx in New York City. He regularly attends Baptist service and smokes cigars. Newsome often wears a bulletproof vest and drives a rotation of rented vehicles for security and safety purposes. 
This biographical article about a United States activist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
ffolkes was the son of Sir Martin ffolkes, 1st Baronet. He was educated at Harrow School and was admitted at Jesus College, Cambridge on 6 April 1805. He was awarded B.A. in 1810 and  M.A. in 1813. He succeeded to the baronetcy on the death of his father on 11 December 1821. 
He died at the age of 73. He had married Charlotte Philippa Browne, daughter of Dominick Geoffrey Browne, of Castle MacGarrett, Co. Mayo and sister of Dominick, first Lord Oranmore on 21 April 1818. His son Martin was killed by lightning, and he was succeeded in the baronetcy by his grandson William. 
This article about a member of the Christian clergy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Farlaine the Goblin is an anonymous American comic book series. The series is notable for being published in a horizontal format(11" x 7 1/8"). 
The series is 7 volumes long, each volume varying in length between 30-50 pages and telling the story of Farlaine's adventures in a single land. 
Farlaine the Goblin is a tree goblin shaman on a quest to find a forest of his own. He has spent years wandering the Oddlands Of Wug in search of a forest and is down to the final 10 lands left to explore. 
He planned the campus of  BHU  and its construction was also done under his supervision. He helped a lot of Madan Mohan Malaviya in collecting donations . 
Before becoming a professional footballer, Leyfield worked as a joiner. He served in the Royal Artillery during the Second World War. After leaving football, Leyfield ran pubs in Saltney and Guilden Sutton. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a forward born in the 1910s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
While New York Sleeps is a 1920 American crime drama film produced by Fox Film Corporation and directed by Charles Brabin, who was the husband of actress Theda Bara. The film tells three distinct episodic stories using the same actors, Estelle Taylor and Marc McDermott. Long thought to be a lost film like many other Fox Film productions from this period, a copy of this movie is now in the collection of the UCLA Film and Television Archive. 
According to author Aubrey Solomon, this film was Fox's biggest moneymaker for the year 1920 with a profit of $192,000. While this would seem to conflict with the enormous success of Fox's Over the Hill to the Poorhouse (1920), the latter film did not achieve its largest rentals until it went into full release in 1921. 
Scott William Lowe (born October 4, 1963) is Chair of the Cancer Biology and Genetics Program in the Sloan Kettering Institute at Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center. He is recognized for his research on the tumor suppressor gene, p53, which is mutated in nearly half of cancers. 
Anokhino is located 38 km southeast of Gryazovets (the district's administrative centre) by road. Panovo is the nearest rural locality. 
This is a list of international presidential trips made by George W. Bush, the 43rd president of the United States. George W. Bush made 48 international trips to 73 countries (in addition to visiting the West Bank) during his presidency, which began on January 20, 2001 and ended on January 20, 2009. 
Murray Arnold Dron (born 23 January 1975) is a British journalist and television presenter working for ITN on London Tonight and ITV News. 
Dron was born in Perth, Scotland, but grew up in Jersey from a young age. He was educated at Elizabeth College, Guernsey and graduated from Edge Hill University with a degree in Media. 
Murray began his career in the Channel Islands as presenter of Channel Television's nightly regional news programme Channel Report alongside Kristina Moore. He also presented the weekly sports show Report Sport. 
From 2007 Dron was a freelance sports reporter for ITV News, covering a wide range of events, including Formula One, Premier League football, the cricket and rugby World Cups and the Tour de France. 
He was a launch presenter on Setanta Sports News, co-hosting Lunchtime Live alongside Charlotte Jackson until the channel ceased broadcasting in June 2009. 
William S. Gilliland Log Cabin and Cemetery is a historic home and family cemetery located in Charleston, West Virginia.  It was the home and graveyard of one of Charleston's oldest families, the Gillilands.  They built the log cabins and lived there until selling it to the Neale family in 1868. 
It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1984 as part of the South Hills Multiple Resource Area. 
This article about a property in Kanawha County, West Virginia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"The Happy Organ" is the name of an instrumental composition made famous by Dave "Baby" Cortez in 1959. Cortez co-composed it with noted celebrity photographer James J. Kriegsmann and frequent collaborator Kurt Wood. A significant portion of the tune bears a strong resemblance to the traditional "Shortnin' Bread" tune.  The record topped the Billboard Hot 100 on 11 May 1959 and also reached #5 on Billboard's R&B chart. 
Meggie Foster (born in Bampton) is a British comedy actress. During the COVID-19 lockdowns, Foster made short comedy lipsyncing videos on TikTok mocking celebrities and politicians. 
This article about a British comedian or humourist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Krishanu's essays and articles on art have been published by The Courtauld Gallery, British Council, and a-n Magazine. He has curated collaborative exhibitions for English Heritage and Iniva, and co-curated exhibitions at the RIBA and Whitechapel Gallery. He is a visiting lecturer at Chelsea College of Arts and teaches at Camden Arts Centre and The Courtauld Institute of Art. 
Ernest "Imshi" Mason was born in Darlington, and was educated at Blackpool Grammar School. He was a gifted musician (he played the saxophone), and was also interested in engineering and mechanics. He rode motorcycles in dirt track racing at the age of 14. He played in professional dancebands including Archie Andre's (real name Andre Tripello) operating out of Brighton and on tour. He was briefly the co-owner of a Delarge, which he crashed. Foreseeing the coming war, he joined the RAF. 
Mason and Lieutenant Robert Talbot of the SAAF were detached to Sidi Barrani in order to  "freelance" over the Libyan Desert attacking targets of opportunity. It was during this period that Mason developed his preferred style of attack, embarking on long range missions to attack enemy air bases well behind the lines. 
In March 1941, Mason led a flight to Malta to reinforce the defensive fighter force. On 13 April, Mason attacked four Bf 109s. He was attacked in turn by Oberleutnant Klaus Mietusch of JG 26 and shot down for the German's eighth victory. Mason ditched his aircraft in the sea, suffering wounds to his hand in the combat and a broken nose in the ditching. 
During a patrol on 26 January, Mason encountered 3 Fiat G.50bis of 2o Gruppo CT near Derna and 7 Fiat CR.42s of 368a Squadriglia strafing Australian ground positions. Mason shot down two victims, Sottotenente Alfonso Nuti and Maresciallo Guido Papparato from 368a Squadriglia, who were both killed. 
In July 1941 Mason assumed command of No. 261 Squadron, reforming in Palestine. In August he led the unit in the occupation of Iran, and in January was posted back to the Western Desert to command No 94 Squadron flying P-40 Kittyhawks. 
On 15 February 1942, Mason led a ground attack mission against a Luftwaffe base at Martuba, Egypt. His flight was shot down by Otto Schulz from Jagdgeschwader 27 and he was killed. 
Mason was awarded the Distinguished Flying Cross.  The citation from the London Gazette on 11 February 1941 reads: 
She was made empress following Shirindari's death in 1299. Bulugan acted as regent for her ill husband and virtually ruled the empire. She made her son Prince Dashi the heir apparent in June 1305. To ensure the boy's succession, she removed all the potential rivals from the court. For example, Darmabala's son Ayurbarwada was sent to Henan as the prince of Huaining. But Dashi died in January 1306. 
The Foreign Language and Area Studies (FLAS) fellowships are federally funded academic scholarships designed to provide support and funding to graduate and undergraduate students studying the languages and cultures of specific foreign countries, in particular those in the strategic interest of the United States of America.   
As part of the program, fellows are required to take one language class and another academic class in their FLAS area. A language evaluation is given at the beginning and end of the program. Additionally, fellows are expected to write a summary of their FLAS achievements at the end of the fellowship period. 
This article relating to education in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hypocrisy Destroys Wacken is a live album released in 1999 by Swedish melodic death metal band Hypocrisy. The DVD version of the album was released in March 2001. 
Lindsley Avenue Church of Christ is a historic church at 3 Lindsley Avenue in Nashville, Tennessee. It was built in 1894 and added to the National Register in 1984. It is across the road from the Nashville Children's Theatre. 
The Church was founded by David Lipscomb. Dr. Ira North was formerly a minister and eventually moved to the Madison Church of Christ. Laws Rushing II was minister for nearly a decade. 
Gene Wright is the current minister of the Church. The congregation celebrates a homecoming service on the second Sunday of October every year. 
This article about a property in Davidson County, Tennessee on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a church or other Christian place of worship in Tennessee is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On January 1, 2011, Sakineh Ashtiani announced in a press conference that she intended to sue the two German journalist for illegally interviewing her son about her case. 
The two journalists were freed February 20, 2011 and their sentences commuted to fines of $50,000 each. after a visit by German Foreign Minister Guido Westerwelle to Tehran for a rare meeting with Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad. Westerwelle returned to Germany with the pair on his government plane. 
The tournament had two groups of four: an "Eastern" and a "Western" group. The groups were not played as a round-robin; rather, the winners of the first round matches played each other in the second round, and the first round losers also played each other in the second round. The two teams with two wins from the first two matches advanced to the final.  For the other teams, positions in the final round were determined by their position in their group, with the following rules: 
In other words, though the team placing first (two wins) in each group would be apparent, the determination of second, third (both teams: one win, one loss) and fourth place (two losses) was based on the above tiebreakers. 
The official song of the 2013 International Champions Cup "Exotic" was performed by the Indian Bollywood actress turned singer Priyanka Chopra, and was sung in both English and Hindi. 
Carole Pankau is a former Republican Illinois State Senator, representing the 23rd district from 2005 to 2013. Pankau previously served as State Representative from 1993 to 2005. 
Pankau earned a B.S. in accounting from the University of Illinois. She served as a member of the DuPage County Board from 1984 to 1992 and prior to that served on the school board for Keeneyville School District 20. She was active as a precinct committeeman in the Republican organization in Bloomingdale Township. In the 1992 general election, Pankau was elected to represent the 45th district. 
In the 1992 general election, Pankau was elected to represent the 45th district. During her tenure, she served on the Committees on Public Health (minority spokesperson); Appropriations III; Environment and Energy; Labor; Revenue. Pankau was a Republican candidate for DuPage County Chairman in 2010 but lost to Republican Daniel Cronin. Pankau lost Senate re-election in 2012 to Tom Cullerton. 
Pankau was born August 13, 1947 in Valparaiso, Indiana. She has been married to Anthony John Pankau, Jr. since 1966. They have four grown children: John, Jason, Shay and Aaron. She has been a resident of DuPage County for more than 30 years. Pankau was a former owner-manager of an auto-body/towing business for 17 years. 
Shortly after the declaration was issued, several chief ministers of the black homelands, including Cedric Phatudi (Lebowa), Lucas Mangope (Bophuthatswana) and Prof HWE Ntsanwisi (Gazankulu), met in Cape Town. The leaders announced to the press that they fully supported the declaration. 
In February 1974, Prime Minister of Swaziland Makhosini Dlamini praised the declaration as inspiration to South Africans "across the color line" and as an example of effectiveness in working for his people within the framework of the law. 
Days after the declaration, Die Vaderland, an ardent Nationalist Afrikaans newspaper, mocked Schwarz and Buthelezi calling them the "heroes of Mahlabatini". 
On 4 February 1974, Prime Minister B. J. Vorster of the National Party commented on the declaration during a speech to Parliament in which he announced a general election for 24 April 1974. Speaking of the Declaration, Vorster said: 
Despite considerable support from black leaders and the English speaking press, the declaration drew much criticism from the establishment of Harry Schwarz's United Party. Schwarz, who had recently deposed the more conservative Marais Styen from the leadership of the United Party in the Transvaal, was a controversial figure in the party for his outspoken views against apartheid and was known as the leader of the liberal 'Young Turks' within the party. 
The situation of South Africa in the world scene as well as internal community relations requires in our view an acceptance of certain fundamental concept for the economic social and constitutional development of our country. 
We respectfully record five principles on the basis of which we believe all our people can co-operate. 
2. Opportunity must be afforded to all our people for material and educational advancement. The economy must be available to serve the needs of all able and willing to contribute, and the wealth, labour and expertise of our country should be harnessed to provide job and entrepreneurial opportunity for all groups. 
3. Constitutions, blue prints and plans for the future should not be made by only some of the people for all others, they must be made with people. Consultation and dialogue lead to government by consent and with this in mind and as a first step a consultative council representative of all groups in South Africa should be constituted at the earliest opportunity. 
4. The federal concept appears to provide the best framework on which to seek a constitutional solution for a South Africa free from domination by any group over others and ensuring the security of all its people. 
(i) Safeguard the identity and culture of the various groups constituting the people of South Africa. 
 On the basis of these principles we declare our faith in a South Africa of equal opportunity, happiness, security and people for all its people.
Hallau is first mentioned in 1095 as Hallaugia superiori et inferiori.  In 1273 it was mentioned as Hallowe.  Until 1526 it was part of Oberhallau. 
The municipality is located in the Unterklettgau district.  It is an old market town that is now a winemaking village.  Hallau is located on the south foot of the Hallauerberg.  Until 1934 Hallau was known as Unterhallau. 
Hallau has a population (as of 2008[update]) of 2,014, of which 15.0% are foreign nationals.  Of the foreign population, (as of 2008[update]), 31.9% are from Germany, 9.3% are from Italy, 7.3% are from Serbia, 33.2% are from Macedonia, and 18.3% are from another country.  Over the last 10 years the population has decreased at a rate of -1.9%.  Most of the population (as of 2000[update]) speaks German (91.9%), with Albanian being second most common ( 3.3%) and Italian being third ( 1.7%). 
In the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SVP which received 52% of the vote.  The next two most popular parties were the SP (27.4%), and the FDP (20.6%) . 
As of 2000[update], 14.3% of the population belonged to the Roman Catholic Church and 67.9% belonged to the Swiss Reformed Church. 
The Bergkirche St. Moritz (mountain or hill church of St. Moritz) is listed as a Swiss heritage site of national significance.  The church was built in 1491.  Due to the number of old Alemanni graves and artifacts, the church was pilgrimage site until the Protestant Reformation.  In 1505/08 the church became independent of the parish church of Neunkirch and became the parish of Unterhallau.  The Church of St. Moritz became the new parish church. 
The blazon of the municipal coat of arms is Gules a Fleur de lis Argent between two Mullets Or in pale. 
Hallau has an unemployment rate of 0.96%.  As of 2005[update], there were 240 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 69 businesses involved in this sector.  277 people are employed in the secondary sector and there are 35 businesses in this sector.  286 people are employed in the tertiary sector, with 69 businesses in this sector. 
As of 2008[update], there are 5 restaurants, and 1 hotel with 14 beds.  The hospitality industry in Hallau employs 14 people. 
The film concerns the coincidental interactions between three groups of people in Taipei: a young woman and the tough petty criminal gang of native Taiwanese she hangs out with; a Mainlander doctor and his novelist wife; and a young photographer who observes the life of the city unfolding around him, in an echo of the protagonist of Michelangelo Antonioni's Blowup. 
Terrorizers is a part of the New Taiwan Cinema. "Famously characterized by Marxist scholar Fredric Jameson as the postmodern film, the film was likened by Yang himself to a puzzle where the pleasure lies in rearranging a multitude of relationships between characters, spaces, and genres." 
Lower Swedish Cabin is a historic Swedish-style log cabin on Creek Road in the Drexel Hill section of Upper Darby, Pennsylvania along Darby Creek. The cabin may be one of the oldest log cabins in the United States. 
This article about a property in Delaware County, Pennsylvania on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Each of the member parties is different, sometimes having differing views of Christian democracy itself. Some of the member parties are in government in their country, others are in the coalition government, and others are not in government. Currently, there are 30 member political parties in 21 different countries with a constituency representing 30% of all registered voters in Latin America and 10% of the entire population of the region. 
On July 25-31, 1949, a second meeting was held at the Catholic Club of Montevideo with the participation of representatives from Argentina, Brazil, Colombia, Chile, Peru, and Uruguay, which were joined by politicians from Ecuador and Bolivia. 
On July 29, 1961, the World Christian Democratic Union (now the Centrist Democratic International) was founded in Santiago, Chile. Since the founding of the Christian Democratic International, the Christian Democratic Organization of America has been a part of it and a regional organization. 
At the XVI Congress on October 8, 2000, in Santiago, Chile, the organization's current strategy was formulated, aimed at increasing the participation in its work of humanist and centrist parties, whose views are close to Christian democracy. 
At an extraordinary congress in Panama City (Panama) on May 7, 2011, the Charter was approved, which currently regulates the activities of the organization. 
The highest organ of the Christian Democratic Organization of America is the Congress, which elects the Council and the Steering Committee, as well as the Presidium, which, together with the Executive Secretariat, exercises the operational leadership of the organization. 
 Muggeridge drew a darker attitude from Kingsmill's sardonic wit. Kingsmill's parody of A. E. Housman's poetry has been recognised as definitive:
What still alive at twenty-two, A clean, upstanding chap like you? Sure, if your throat 'tis hard to slit, Slit your girl's, and swing for it.  Like enough, you won't be glad, When they come to hang you, lad: But bacon's not the only thing That's cured by hanging from a string.  So, when the spilt ink of the night Spreads o'er the blotting-pad of light, Lads whose job is still to do 
Gary Andrew Charles (born 13 April 1970) is an English former footballer who played at right-back. During his career he is best known for his appearances with Nottingham Forest, Derby County and Aston Villa and was capped twice for England. Charles was most recently the manager of Nuneaton Town. 
In October 2011, Charles joined Lincoln City as Assistant Manager alongside manager David Holdsworth, but has since become the Director of Football at the University of Nottingham. On 29 March 2018 it was announced that he had accepted the manager's position at National League North side Nuneaton Town. In June 2018, he was replaced as manager at Nuneaton by Nicky Eaden. 
After the end of his playing career, Charles struggled with alcoholism. He however overcame these difficulties and has attained his UEFA A Coaching licence.[citation needed] In 2018, Charles was reported as being a recovering alcoholic with a business providing care to people who are experiencing depression and alcohol and drug dependency. His son, Jaden, made his professional debut in May 2021. 
This is an alphabetical list of all Nav Canada certified and registered water and land airports, aerodromes and heliports in the Provinces and territories of Canada. Airports names in italics are part of the National Airports System. 
After a season with the farm club of Zenit Saint Petersburg Panov debuted for the first team in 1994. Panov spent a year in Vologda and another one with Shanghai Baosteel team in Shanghai. In 1997 Panov returned to Zenit and become a first team regular, earning a national team call a year later. 
Mr. St. Nick is a 2002 Christmas comedy-fantasy film starring Kelsey Grammer. It was produced by Hallmark Entertainment and shown on ABC in the United States. It was first broadcast as an episode of ABC's Wonderful World of Disney anthology on November 17, 2002. 
It was set mainly in Miami, Florida, United States, although it was filmed in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada. 
A patella fracture is a break of the kneecap. Symptoms include pain, swelling, and bruising to the front of the knee. A person may also be unable to walk. Complications may include injury to the tibia, femur, or knee ligaments. 
It typically results from a hard blow to the front of the knee or falling on the knee. Occasionally it may occur from a strong contraction of the thigh muscles. Diagnosis is based on symptoms and confirmed with X-rays. In children an MRI may be required. 
Treatment may be with or without surgery, depending on the type of fracture. Undisplaced fracture can usually be treated by casting. Even some displaced fractures can be treated with casting as long as a person can straighten their leg without help. Typically the leg is immobilized in a straight position for the first three weeks and then increasing degrees of bending are allowed. Other types of fractures generally require surgery. 
Patella fractures make up about 1% of all broken bones. Males are affected more often than females. Those of middle age are most often affected. Outcomes with treatment are generally good. 
Also known as a broken kneecap, a patella fracture usually follows a history of trauma and commonly presents with swelling, pain, bruising and inability to both bend and straighten the knee. The pain is worse when trying to stand and the person may be unable to walk. The pain can also be aggravated by prolonged periods of sitting. A painful defect may be felt in the knee and there may be a blood in the joint. 
Complications may include injury to the tibia, femur, or knee ligaments. In the longer term, the knee may not regain full movement, pain may persist and there is an increased likelihood of osteoarthritis of the knee. If there is an associated open wound as in an open fracture, complications also include risk of infection, inability of the broken bones to reunite and osteonecrosis. 
Some people have a normal bipartite patella or two-part patella which can appear as a fracture. The fragment is usually seen in the top outer corner of the patella and can be distinguished from a fracture by being present in both knees. 
Treatment may be with or without surgery, depending on the type of fracture and whether the overlying skin is intact or broken. 
Undisplaced fractures can usually be treated by casting. Even some displaced fractures can be treated with casting as long as the person can straighten their leg without help, thus confirming that the quadriceps mechanism of the leg is intact. In this case the leg is immobilized in a straight position for the first three weeks and then increasing degrees of bending are allowed as healing occurs. 
Most patella fractures are transverse or comminuted, hence the quadriceps mechanism is disrupted and they are treated by a combination of wires in a tension band construct. This unites the fractured bones, reconstructing the straightening mechanism of the leg. 
If the patella is broken in several places, that is  comminuted, then traditionally a patellectomy (removal of the whole patella) is performed in order to reconstruct the extensor mechanism and prevent the onset of an extension lag at the knee joint, resulting in instability. Some surgeons however would rather opt for internal fixation. A partial patellectomy is removal of only a portion of the patella, and may be carried out if at least 60% of the patella can be maintained. 
Open fractures of the patella require emergency treatment with irrigation, debridement and fixation. 
Irrespective of surgical or non-surgical resolution to the fracture, a physical therapist can advise on progressive weight-bearing exercises and help with strengthening muscles of the leg, improving range of motion of the knee and in reducing stiffness. 
Outcomes with treatment are generally good, unless there is involvement of the articular surface or the quadriceps mechanism. There is an increased risk of developing osteoarthritis in people who have broken their patella. 
There is limited evidence supporting the different surgical interventions for treating fractures of the patella in adults . There is also no evidence of trials that could evaluate the effects of surgical treatment compared with the conservative treatment or other different types of conservative interventions. 
Patella fractures make up about 1% of all broken bones. Males are affected more often than females. Those of middle age are most often affected. 6% to 9% of patellar fractures are of the open type. An ageing population and global increase in the number of TKAs has led to an increasing number of periprosthetic fractures of which a patella fracture is one type. 
The Rural Municipality of Montrose No. 315 (2016 population: 712) is a rural municipality (RM) in the Canadian province of Saskatchewan within Census Division No. 12 and SARM Division No. 5. 
The RM of Montrose No. 315 is governed by an elected municipal council and an appointed administrator that meets on the second Thursday of every month. The reeve of the RM is Murray Purcell while its administrator is Desiree Bouvier. The RM's office is located in Delisle. 
Pemphixina is a monotypic genus of brachiopods belonging to the family Hemithirididae. The only species is Pemphixina pyxidata. 
The seventh season of Weeds premiered on June 27, 2011, on the television cable network Showtime, and consisted of 13 episodes. As the season picks up, Nancy has spent three years in prison and now lives in a strictly monitored halfway house in New York City, where the family meet after they have spent three years in Denmark. 
Tonye Patano and Andy Milder return as recurring characters, as Heylia James and Dean Hodes respectively. 
Sir John Brownlow, 1st Baronet (1590-24 Nov.1679) of Belton, near Grantham in Lincolnshire, was twice Sheriff of Lincolnshire and on 26 July 1641 was created a baronet  "of Belton in the County of Lincoln". He died without progeny when his baronetcy became extinct. His monument survives in Belton Church, showing half statues of himself and his wife finely sculpted in white marble. 
He inherited the manor of Belton, Lincolnshire which his father had purchased, and was selected High Sheriff of Lincolnshire in 1640 and 1665.   
He married Alice Poultney (1606-27 June 1676), second daughter and co-heiress of Sir John Poulteney (1585-1617) (or Pulteney) of Misterton in Leicestershire, a Member of Parliament for Wigan in Lancashire in 1601 and 1604, by his wife Margery Fortescue (d.1613), a daughter of Sir John Fortescue (c.1531-1607) of Salden, near Mursley, Buckinghamshire, Chancellor of the Exchequer. The marriage was without progeny. 
He died on 24 November 1679, aged 89, as is recorded on his monument in Belton Church. As he died without progeny his baronetcy became extinct. His heir to his property was his eldest great-nephew Sir John Brownlow, 3rd Baronet (1659-1697) of Humby, Lincolnshire, who having inherited from him the manor of Belton, built the surviving grand mansion Belton House. 
His monument in the Church of St Peter and St Paul, Belton, comprising half statues of himself and his wife finely carved in white marble, is inscribed as follows: 
Han was born in  Xiaoshan District, Hangzhou, Zhejiang, China. He went to Central South University and majored in Civil Engineering. After graduating from college, he entered an engineering state-owned enterprise. On a holiday, Han Dong went home to accompany his friends to participate in the selection of a performing arts school. There he met the director You Xiaogang who brought Han Dong to Beijing where he started his career as an actor. 
Pedakakani mandal is one of the 57 mandals in Guntur district of the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh. It is under the administration of Guntur Revenue Division and the headquarters are located at Pedakakani. The mandal is bounded by Tadikonda, Mangalagiri, Duggirala, Tenali, Chebrole and Guntur mandals. 
The mandal also forms a part of the Andhra Pradesh Capital Region under the jurisdiction of APCRDA. It is under the control of a tahsildar and the present tahsildar is SK.Ismail. Pedakakani mandal is one of the 3 mandals under Ponnur (Assembly constituency), which in turn represents Guntur (Lok Sabha constituency) of Andhra Pradesh. 
Pedakakani is the most populated village and Devarayabhotlapalem is the least populated settlement in the mandal. As of 2011[update] census, the mandal has 11 villages. 
Tangutur is a town in Prakasam district of the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh. It is a mandal headquarters  in Ongole revenue division. Nearby towns are Singarayakonda, Kandukur, Prakasam district, Kondapi and the nearest city will be Ongole. 
According to the 2011 Census of India, with total 7200 families, the total population of Tangutur was 27,652 comprising 13,674 males and 13,978 females. Tangutur has higher literacy rate compared to Andhra Pradesh. In 2011, literacy rate of Tangutur was 68.68% compared to 67.02% of Andhra Pradesh. In Tangutur Male literacy stands at 77.28% while female literacy rate was 60.34%. 
This article about a location in Prakasam district, Andhra Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bactriola falsa is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Martins and Galileo in 1992. It is known from Brazil. 
Culver CityBus is a public transport agency operating in Culver City, California, currently serving Culver City, the unincorporated community of Marina del Rey, and the adjacent Los Angeles neighborhoods. Its regular fleet is painted bright green and its rapid fleet primarily a chrome gray, distinguishing it from Santa Monica's Big Blue Bus, orange-colored Metro Local buses, and red-colored Metro Rapid buses, whose coverage areas overlap on Los Angeles's Westside. 
Culver CityBus was founded in 3 March 1928, making it the second oldest municipal bus line in California and the oldest public transit bus system still operating in Los Angeles County. Big Blue Bus was founded in 14 April 1928, the San Francisco Municipal Railway began streetcar service 28 December 1912. 
Within its service area of around 85.5 square kilometres, the Culver CityBus provides service to the communities of: 
Culver CityBus operates 3 daily routes, 3 weekday-only routes, and 2 Monday-Saturday routes within Los Angeles County.  Among its 3 weekday-only routes, Culver CityBus operates a Rapid route (Rapid 6). 
Culver CityBus currently operates an all New Flyer fleet of 54 buses. All buses run on CNG. Culver CityBus has retired its old fleet, mostly made of buses by Flxible, TMC/RTS, and Gillig. 
Culver CityBus is beginning to retire its C40LF fleet from 2001 and 2004. New XN40 buses were delivered in 2017, and are currently in service. 
The buses were originally painted green and white, but all buses were repainted to all green in 2000. 
In 2008, large decals honoring Culver CityBus's 80th year of service were affixed to buses. They were later removed in 2009. 
Culver CityBus began operating six New Flyer C40LFR buses on the new Rapid 6 starting on 4 January 2010. 
Rapid Buses are painted primarily a chrome gray to distinguish themselves from the regular bright green buses. 
In 2012, Culver CityBus took delivery of 20 New Flyer Xcelsior XN40 buses and started operating some of them beginning in late May 2012 with the rest to be phased in by late June. 
The 135th Indiana Infantry Regiment served in the Union Army between May 23 and September 29, 1864, during the American Civil War. 
The regiment was organized at Indianapolis, Indiana and mustered in on May 23, 1864. It was ordered to Tennessee and Alabama for railroad guard duty, until late September 1864. The regiment was mustered out on September 29, 1864. During its service the regiment lost twenty-eight men to disease. 
This biographical article relating to Canadian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Saba then embarked on a solo singing and acting career. Her debut album was released in 2004, and her first film came out in 2003. She has subsequently taken further roles in Egyptian films. 
Saba married Lebanese actor Youssef El Khal on 24 November 2011 in Em Sherif Restaurant in Ashrafieh, Lebanon, after being in a relationship for 10 years. Their daughter Nicole El Khal was born in 2013. Saba's mother is Armenian. 
 Vietnam national football team results, including the results of former French Cochinchina, State of Vietnam, South Vietnam and North Vietnam. 
Michele Morettini (born 25 December 1991) is an Italian cricketer. He was named in Italy's squad for the 2016 ICC World Cricket League Division Four tournament in Los Angeles, playing in two matches. 
This biographical article related to Italian cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
IntraLase was a company based in Irvine, California, producing lasers for the medical industry and for eye surgery. In March 2007, it was acquired by Advanced Medical Optics for $808 million in cash. Advanced Medical Optics was acquired by Abbott Laboratories in February 2009. The femtosecond laser, developed by IntraLase corporation and now owned by AMO, is trademarked under the name IntraLase. It is used to perform IntraLASIK eye surgery. 
This article about an industrial corporation or company is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sphingomonas desiccabilis  is a Gram-negative and non-motile bacterium from the genus of Sphingomonas which has been isolated from biological soil crusts in the Colorado Plateau in the United States. It has been sent on the International Space Station in 2019 and 2020 for the BioRock and BioAsteroid experiments, respectively. 
Turbonilla tridentata is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Pyramidellidae, the pyrams and their allies. 
Couch became a millionaire through acquisitions of land and real estate he and his brother made across the city's core. 
Couch died at the age of 50 on February 28, 1857 during a winter stay with his family in Cuba. Couch had fallen suddenly ill shortly before his death. His corpse was shipped back to Chicago, arriving on March 4. His funeral was held on March 6. 
At the time of his death, he was believed to be Chicago's second-wealthiest resident, after only William B. Ogden and John Wentworth. 
The 1891 United States Supreme Court decision of Potter v. Couch pertained to his last will and testament, which was being litigated over by family and other claimants seeking shares of the remainder of Couch's estate. 
In retirement from playing Cushe maintained a keen interest in the game.  Shortly after his retirement in 1999 he became a selector with the Wexford team.  During his tenure on the management team Wexford had little success and he stepped down in 2002. 
Tutuki is the fourth album, released in 2004, by the Oceanic group, Te Vaka. It features the song Tamahana which won first place in the world music category of the 2008 International Songwriting Competition. and first place in the International category of the Australian Songwriting Association competition. This is the first of Te Vaka's albums to win the Best Pacific Album at the New Zealand Music Awards. Tutuki debuted on the World Music Chart Europe at number 4. 
This Lincoln County, Montana state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Megachile astridella is a species of bee in the family Megachilidae. It was described by Pasteels in 1965. 
The 2002 Ohio Bobcats football team represented Ohio University during the 2002 NCAA Division I-A football season. Ohio competed as a member of the Mid-American Conference (MAC). The Bobcats were led by head coach Brian Knorr. 
Martin made his ODI debut against the West Indies cricket team in September 1999, and also played in the subsequent triangular ODI series in Australia against Australia national cricket team and Pakistan national cricket team in January 2000. However, he was unable to reproduce his domestic form and did not play again for India after 2001. 
Pauwasera, Phaktang, Barahapokhari, Mauwabote, Saunechaur and Suntale which previously were all separate Village development committee merged to form this new local level body. Fulfilling the requirement of the new Constitution of Nepal 2015, Ministry of Federal Affairs and Local Development replaced all old VDCs and Municipalities into 753 new local level body (Municipality). 
The rural municipality is divided into total 6 wards and the headquarter of this newly formed rural municipality is situated in Saunechaur. 
This article about a location in Khotang District, Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tau Lewis (born 1993 in Toronto, Ontario) is a Canadian artist working in a variety of mediums including hand-sewn, carved and assemblage pieces. 
In 2018, Lewis was awarded the Frieze Frame Stand Prize for her solo presentation with Cooper Cole Gallery at Frieze New York City, USA. 
In 2021 Lewis' sculpture "Symphony" was exhibited in the Rotunda of the National Gallery of Canada in Ottawa as part of its Contemporary Projects series. 
Ad Lagendijk (born 18 November 1947 in Zwanenburg) is a Dutch physicist working at the FOM-institute AMOLF in Amsterdam and at the University of Amsterdam. He is also a part-time professor at the University of Twente in Enschede, Netherlands. 
Ad Lagendijk is a physicist with a background in physical chemistry.  Lagendijk studies the propagation of light in complex matter, especially materials that strongly scatter light. He has a large international impact in this field with a few hundred scientific publications. 
Lagendijk gained fame outside physics as the author of columns in a national newspaper and as the author of the Survival Guide for Scientists, a book with advice  in the areas of communication and presentation, intended for junior scientists. He actively blogs in Dutch and English. 
Professor Ad Lagendijk received the Spinoza Prize of 2002 for his research on the propagation of light in strongly scattering media, a field that according to the jury, he defined himself and brought to maturity both experimentally and theoretically through his research. 
A major part of the founders of the organization belonged to the Program Tendency within the Socialist League (SF). However, that group left SF to form the International Group. 
Michigan scored twice in the first quarter on touchdown runs by Jack Weisenburger and Chappuis. The second touchdown was set up by a 53-yard run by Bump Elliott. The Wolverines added two more touchdowns in the second quarter on short runs by Chappuis and Bump Elliott. Three more touchdowns followed in the third quarter, including a long touchdown pass from Chappuis to Len Ford with Ford running the last 35 yards after the catch. Center Dan Dworsky also scored on a 36-yard fumble return. 
Michigan's starting lineup against Michigan State was Ford (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Soboleski (right guard), Dworsky (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), McNeill (right end), Weisenburger (quarterback), Derricotte (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Kempthorn (fullback). 
In the second week of the season, Michigan hosted Stanford. The game was the first between the two schools since the 1902 Rose Bowl which Michigan won by a 49-0 margin. In the 1947 rematch, Michigan scored 28 points in the first quarter and won the game 49-13. 
Michigan's starting lineup against Stanford was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Soboleski (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against Pitt was Ford (left end), Wistert (left tackle), Soboleski (right guard), Dworsky (center), Sickels (right guard), Dendrinos (right tackle), McNeill (right end), Pete Elliott (quarterback), Derricotte (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Kempthorn (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against Northwestern was Ford (left end), Wistert (left tackle), Soboleski (right guard), Dworsky (center), Sickels (right guard), Kohl (right tackle), McNeill (right end), Pete Elliott (quarterback), Derricotte (left halfback), Fonde (right halfback), and Peterson (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against Minnesota was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against Minnesota was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
In the sixth week of the season, Michigan regained its momentum and defeated Indiana 35-0 in Ann Arbor. In a game played amid intermittent snow flurries, highlights included a 61-yard run by Weisenburger in the second quarter and a 50-yard pass from Bob Chappuis to Dick Rifenburg in the fourth quarter. Michigan's five touchdowns were scored by Bump Elliott (2), Howard Yerges, Dick Rifenburg, and Henry Fonde.  Notre Dame defeated Army, 27-7, and retained the No. 1 ranking in the AP Poll. 
Michigan's starting lineup against Minnesota was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against Minnesota was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Kempthorn (fullback). 
On November 22, 1947, Michigan concluded the regular season with a 21-0 win at home against rival Ohio State. Bump Elliott, Bob Chappuis, and Jack Weisenburger each ran for touchdowns, and Jim Brieske converted all three PATs. Late in the game, the fans at Michigan Stadium began chanting, "California, Here I Come."  At the end of the game, Fritz Crisler was "streaming tears of joy as he walked off the field." 
Michigan's starting lineup against Ohio State was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup in the Rose Bowl was Mann (left end), Hilkene (left tackle), Tomasi (right guard), White (center), Wilkins (right guard), Pritula (right tackle), Rifenburg (right end), Yerges (quarterback), Chappuis (left halfback), Bump Elliott (right halfback), and Weisenburger (fullback). 
Notre Dame supporters argued that the post-season AP poll was final and should not be revisited. They contended that Michigan had run up the score on USC, noted that Notre Dame had not had an opportunity to play in a bowl game, and asserted that Michigan and other Big Nine schools were unwilling to schedule Notre Dame in the regular season. 
Commenting on the special poll, Michigan coach Fritz Crisler said "the men who voted couldn't have made a mistake if they had picked either team."  He described Notre Dame coach Frank Leahy as a "superb coach." Notre Dame President, Father John Cavanagh said, "We at Notre Dame feel grateful for the magnanimous statement of Coach Crisler. I listened to Michigan against Southern California and have only praise for the skill and accomplishment of your fine team." 
Despite the magnanimous statements of Coach Crisler and Father Cavanagh, the reversed decision in the post-bowl poll only stoked the debate over which team was best. Said one columnist: "Hottest argument of the moment is the one over which had the better football team, Michigan or Notre Dame."  Forty years later, the debate was still ongoing. In 1988, Michigan center Dan Dworsky noted: "Notre Dame still claims that national championship and so do we." 
On January 5, 1948, head coach Fritz Crisler announced that he had awarded varsity letters to 35 members of the 1947 football team.  The 35 letter winners were: 
Mondo Magneto is the debut studio Rock album by Brian Ray, released on October 16, 2006 through his independent record label Whooray Records. 
After decades of performing, writing and recording with musical artists, Brian Ray, a guitarist/songwriter/singer/producer released his first solo album, Mondo Magneto. "People have always asked me when I was going to do my own thing," Ray said, "I guess I was just busy."   
Unlike other albums, Mondo Magneto was recorded on analog, then moved over to digital for further editing. 
When he asked the blues singer Etta James if she would sing with him on the album her answer was simple - and immediate - "I'll do anything for Brian." 
Musicians on Mondo Magneto include Scott Shriner from Weezer, Davey Faragher from Elvis Costello's band, as well as Abe Laboriel, Jr., Wix Wickens and Rusty Anderson from Paul McCartney's band. The record release party was held at The Mint in Los Angeles, California on January 21, 2006. 
Charleston Diggler (born June 27, 1974) is an American professional wrestler, best known by his ring name Ace Darling. Darling has wrestled in various independent promotions in Pennsylvania, New Jersey, and Delaware, most notably for the East Coast Wrestling Association, Jersey All Pro Wrestling, World Wrestling Federation, World Championship Wrestling and Extreme Championship Wrestling. 
1After throwing Mest out of the team, Darling chose Glen Osbourne as a replacement without interrupting the championship reign. 
The Microturbo TRS 18 is a small, low thrust turbojet designed and built in France in the 1970s. It was installed on both manned and unmanned aircraft. 
The magazine published annual lists such as Top 300 brands. The editors of the magazine joined a jury members in the Epica contest on Europe's best advertising. The last edition of the magazine appeared on 18 December 2020. The parent company, Alma Talent, also closed two other magazines, Metallitekniikan and Tekniikan Historian. 
This European business magazine or journal-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
In that year, 1573, Nobunaga besieged Odani castle, which was held by Azai Nagamasa. Asakura Yoshikage, leading a force to relieve and reinforce the Azai garrison, came under attack by Nobunaga's army. He sought refuge in Hikida Castle, and came under siege himself. 
Tietz, co-founder of the Tietz Department Store, was the first to carry out the idea of the department store in Germany. 
The Tietz family divided the German market into two spheres of interest. Herrmann and Oscar Tietz concentrated on the South and East, while Leonhard Tietz ("Kaufhof") was active in the West and in Belgium. 
Oscar Tietz further developed the manufacturing side of the firm, establishing factories, organised in 22 subsidiary companies. During the 50th Anniversary celebrations of the Tietz Department in 1932, The Jewish Telegraph Agency noted that "the Tietz firm is still a family enterprise, and is conducted at present by Georg and Martin Tietz, the sons of Oscar Tietz, and by his son-in-law, Dr. Hugo Zwillenberg.  
In the Third Reich, all businesses of the Tietz family were "Aryanized" (i.e., seized from Jews and transferred to non-Jewish owners) and the family members emigrated. The Tietz department store was "aryanised" in 1934. 
Oscar's son Martin Tietz  migrated with his wife to Liechtenstein in 1939 and his assets were seized by the Gestapo. 
In 2020, the Hertie Foundation, one of the largest charitable foundations in Germany, was criticised for refusing to publicly address the Nazi past of its founder. 
The registered version of Math Rescue remains available for purchase. It was also released on Steam in 2015 with support for Windows and Mac OS. The game can also allow the player interact with a pair of Stereoscopic Vision Glasses. 
Math Rescue revolves around solving math problems. Boxes float in the air. Touching a box transports the player inside it, where they solve a math problem to get points. 
Math Rescue includes three episodes, called Visit Volcanoes and Ice Caves, Follow the Gruzzles into Space, and See Candy Land. Only the first episode is distributed as shareware, while the others are available commercially. Each episode contains 15 levels. The game also has a learning mode to permanently enable word problems in the game. 
Computer Gaming World called Math Rescue and Word Rescue "excellent choices for younger children ... though us older 'kids' will still find them entertaining. They are difficult to quit playing". The game was also given the award as "Best Education Software" in 1993. 
This article about a property in Aiken County, South Carolina on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The seat of the Legislative Assembly is at Chandigarh, the capital of the state. The term of the Legislative Assembly is five years, unless dissolved earlier. Presently, it comprises 117 members who are directly elected from single-seat constituencies. 
The season was suspended by the league officials on March 12, 2020, after several other professional and collegiate sports organizations followed suit as a result of the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. On May 26, the NHL regular season was officially declared over with the remaining games being cancelled and the Sabres missed the playoffs for the ninth straight year. 
Below are the Buffalo Sabres' selections at the 2019 NHL Entry Draft, which was held on June 21 and 22, 2019, at Rogers Arena in Vancouver, British Columbia. 
Joshua Samwel Nassari is a Tanzanian CHADEMA politician and Member of Parliament for Arumeru East  constituency since 2012. 
Like a ball balanced on top of a hill, denser fluid lying above less dense fluid would be dynamically unstable: overturning motions (convection) can lower the center of gravity, and thus will occur spontaneously, rapidly producing a stable stratification which is thus the observed condition almost all the time. The condition for stability of an incompressible fluid is that density decreases monotonically with height. 
If a fluid is compressible like air, the criterion for dynamic stability instead involves potential density, the density of the fluid at a fixed reference pressure.  For an ideal gas (see gas laws), the stability criterion for an air column is that potential temperature increases monotonically with height. 
A number of approximate formulations are used for calculating equivalent potential temperature, since it is not easy to compute integrations along motion of the parcel.  Bolton (1980)  gives review of such procedures with estimates of error.  His best approximation formula is used when accuracy is needed: 
A little more theoretical formula is commonly used in literature like Holton (1972)  when theoretical explanation is important: 
In the mesoscale, equivalent potential temperature is also a useful measure of the static stability of the unsaturated atmosphere. Under normal, stably stratified conditions, the potential temperature increases with height, 
the atmosphere is unstable to vertical motions, and convection is likely. Situations in which the equivalent potential temperature decreases with height, indicating instability in saturated air, are quite common. 
David H. Crowley was born on September 5, 1882 in Leslie, Michigan to parents Daniel Crowley and Margaret Crowley. In 1905, David earned a LL.B. from the University of Michigan Law School. 
On August 17, 1909, Crowley married Nina C. Barrett in Cheboygan, Michigan. Together, they had two children. Crowley was a member of the Detroit Athletic Club, the Knights of Columbus, and the Elks Lodge. 
Oncideres chagasi is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Martins in 1981. It is known from Brazil. 
Libe Solberg Rieber-Mohn (born 25 August 1965) is a Norwegian civil servant and former politician for the Labour Party. She was appointed as Director-General of the Directorate of Integration and Diversity by the King-in-Council on 17 June 2016, succeeding Geir Barvik. She formerly served as a State Secretary in the Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion and as Deputy Mayor of Oslo. 
She graduated as cand.sociol. from the University of Oslo in 1994, and worked as a research assistant at the Norwegian Institute for Social Research from 1994 to 1995. 
In 2005, when Jens Stoltenberg's second cabinet took office, she was appointed State Secretary in the Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion. She held this position until 2009. 
On the local level she was a member of Oslo city council from 1987 to 1991, and chaired the local chapter of the Workers' Youth League. She has also been involved in local politics in Gamle Oslo. Rieber-Mohn was the Labor party's candidate for governing mayor of Oslo in the 2011 local elections in Norway. She served as Deputy Mayor of Oslo from 2011 to 2015. 
She was appointed as Director-General of the Directorate of Integration and Diversity by the King-in-Council on 17 June 2016, succeeding Geir Barvik, and takes office in August 2016. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Phloeonemus is a genus of cylindrical bark beetles in the family Zopheridae. There are at least three described species in Phloeonemus. 
Ambika Charan came from a family of wrestlers. His grandfather, Shiv Charan Guha, patronized Pehlwani and is credited with popularizing the sport in Bengal. Ambika Charan was born to Abhay Charan Guha in 1843 in Hogolkuria in Kolkata. The locality is near the Masjidbari Street near Hatibagan. 
Ambika Charan suffered a serious injury at the age of eight or nine. At the advice of the doctor he began to continue his studies at home. He also continued his physical exercises and took lessons in horse riding at home. He was trained in Pehlwani by Kalicharan Chaubey of Mathura. 
In 1857, at the age of sixteen, Ambika, founded the first akhara of Bengal, at the advice of his grandfather. Ambika then travelled throughout British India learning different wrestling and weight lifting tricks. He engaged in wrestling bouts with contemporary Indian wrestlers and became victorious in many of them. He came to be known as "Ambu babu" or "Raja babu". 
His akhara became a pilgrimage to the budding wrestlers of India. Ambika Charan became a Pehlwani trainer and the budding wrestlers of Bengal used to train under him. Swami Vivekananda in his early years, learned wrestling in Ambu babu's akhara. 
His son, Khetra Charan Goho, (popularly known as Khetu babu) also became an accomplished wrestler. Khetu babu's nephew, Jatindra Charan Goho, went on to become an accomplished wrestler who became the first Asian to win the World Light Heavyweight Championship in the United States in 1921. 
The akhara culture subsequently flourished in Bengal and the Bengali Hindu elite were drawn into it. Hundreds of akharas began to proliferate in the nooks and crannies of Bengal, some of which later became the breeding ground of revolutionary nationalist activities. 
This biographical article related to martial arts in India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2009 Copa Indonesia Final was a football match that took place on 28 June 2009 at Jakabaring Stadium in Palembang. It was the fourth final of Piala Indonesia and  contested by Sriwijaya FC and Persipura Jayapura. It was Sriwijaya's second consecutive final having won the title last year. For Persipura, this was their third successive final appearance having lost their previous two, including a penalty shootout defeat to Sriwijaya in their most recent final. 
Parker described Cox's sandpiper as a species new to science in 1982; this wader was later revealed to be a hybrid. He also named the extinct Kangaroo Island emu (Dromaius baudinianus) in 1984 on the basis of subfossil bones. He was the senior author of the first two parts (all that were published) of the Annotated Checklist of the Birds of South Australia, Part 1: Emus to Spoonbills (1979), and Part 2A: Waterfowl (1985). 
This biographical article relating to Venezuelan rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Drzetowo is located in Poland, an historical municipal neighbourhood of the City of Szczecin. It was merged with another historical neighbourhood (Grabowo) and has formed present Drzetowo-Grabowo neighbourhood. 
All Japanese are familiar with the songs today, and most people have a great affection for them. Despite their somewhat recent origin, they are considered to be an important element of Japanese culture. The themes of the songs are very closely tied to nature. They reflect a more simple and gentle era. 
Selim studied in Tangail Bindubashini Government High School up to class two. Then he came to Dhaka and passed SSC examination from Motijheel Ideal School. He was then admitted into Jahangirnagar University. He joined Dhaka Theatre in 1983 while he was a university student. 
Selim is married to actress Rosey Siddique. Together they have two daughters,. In his early years he used to work for Reneta Pharmaceuticals Ltd. He studied in Jahangirnagar University in economics department. 
Self-Portrait in a Gorget is a c.1629 oil on panel self-portrait by Rembrandt, now in the Germanisches Nationalmuseum in Nuremberg. 
The International Bus Roadeo is an annual bus driving and bus maintenance competition, or roadeo, hosted by the American Public Transportation Association. A grand prize is given to the bus transit system with the highest composite bus operation and bus maintenance score. The bus driving competition consists of an obstacle course. For the bus maintenance competition, teams of mechanics must locate and fix defects in a number of bus power trains and other systems. 
The International Bus Roadeo is the final competition in a system of qualifying roadeos held at the regional, state, and district levels. Bus operators from across North American are represented at the roadeo. For instance, the Corpus Christi Regional Transit Authority Roadeo winners go on to a state competition in Waco. The winners of each regional or state roadeo go on to represent their region at the international roadeo. 
The name "roadeo" is derived from the rodeo competition. The original roadeos, which began in 1937, featured trucks in various categories going through the same obstacles that the bus drivers go through in the current roadeo. 
The first International Bus Roadeo was held in 1976. Regional competitions below the international one have been held since at least 1982. 
Each transit system is allowed to compete in the bus operation competition (the "operators' roadeo"), the bus maintenance competition (the "technicians' roadeo"), or both. 
On the day before the competition, the bus operators are required to inspect an inspection bus and find eight planted mechanical defects, as well as one planted security-related defect. The mechanical defects can appear in areas such as flooring and seats; the security-related defect may consist of an "abandoned" briefcase or package. 
Bus operators must drive their buses through a course containing various obstacles while under a strict time limit: 
As drivers negotiate the obstacle course, their buses are equipped with a device that generates a "smoothness of operation" score. Awards are given in the thirty-five-foot bus and forty-foot-bus categories. 
Bus maintenance teams usually consist of three employees from a transit system. In the technicians' roadeo, technicians must diagnose and repair various mechanical issues with buses. The roadeo consists of a number of portions: 
Lars Thomas Sivertsson (born 21 February 1965) is a Swedish handball player who competed in the 1996 Summer Olympics and in the 2000 Summer Olympics. 
In 1996 he was a member of the Swedish handball team which won the silver medal in the Olympic tournament. He played all six matches and scored twelve goals. 
Four years later he was part of the Swedish team which won the silver medal again. He played all seven matches and scored eleven goals. 
This biographical article related to Swedish team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Italian painter born in the 19th century is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2011, former foreign secretary of Bangladesh Mohamed Mijarul Quayes paid an official visit to Chile. 
According to a report published by Chilean foreign ministry's General Directorate of International Economic Relations in 2012, Bangladesh was among the leading Asian destinations for Chilean investment. 
In 2013, Chile granted duty-free and quota-free access to the Bangladeshi products in order to strengthen bilateral trade between the two countries. The bilateral trade between the two countries stands at $30.37 million as of June 2013, with all of the trade accounting for Bangladeshi export to Chile. About 93% of the Bangladeshi export to Chile was of textiles and ready made garments. The rest included jute yarn, jute fabrics, foot wears, caps and pharmaceuticals products. 
Werner Risi (born 15 July 1940) is a Swiss former swimmer. He competed in the men's 200 metre breaststroke at the 1960 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to a Swiss swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lasswell stated that the "Who" referred to "control analysis", the "Says What" referred to "content analysis", the "In Which Channel" referred to "media analysis", the "To Whom" referred to "audience analysis", and the "With What Effect" referred to "effect analysis". 
"The Structure and Function of Communication in Society" was reprinted in 1949, 1960, 1966, and 1971. However, the questions and the model did not change. 
SS Wimmera was a passenger steamship that was built in 1904 by Caird & Company in Greenock, Scotland, for Huddart Parker & Co of Melbourne, Australia. She was sunk on 26 June 1918 by a German mine north of Cape Maria van Diemen, New Zealand, killing 26 passengers and crew. 
The 16 Australian merchant seamen who were killed are commemorated by the Australian Merchant Seamen's Memorial at the Australian War Memorial. 
The Tsunami was developed from the La Mouette Top Secret as a rigid wing competition hang glider. Thevenot decided to market it under his Helite brand which was also used for a line of powered parachutes. Available c. 2003, the aircraft is now out of production and the brand is no longer used. 
The larvae feed on Picnomon acarna and Ptilostemon casabonae. They are pale greenish, covered with long white hairs. 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Dolphin Dream Society is a Croatian non-governmental and nonprofit organization founded in Zagreb in May 2001 with the intent to promote environmental awareness, environmental protection and maritime heritage as well as sustainable development of the Adriatic Sea, coast and islands.  The association was founded by a group of enthusiasts inspired by the "Dolphin Dream", a novel by Adrian Predrag Kezele who was also named association's honorary president. 
In its previous work the association has implemented a number of project activities with the program "Support the Adriatic Colours" (2003 - 2011) and its three projects: The Blue, The Green and The White having a special place and importance. 
As part of The Blue project 15 cleanup of the shore and seabed actions were implemented with 30 tons of waste pulled out from the Adriatic Sea. These actions were accompanied by the national campaign to promote the protection of the Adriatic Sea called "Support the color of the Adriatic - Preserve the Blue, and the systematic development of the educational study ALTEA targeting Croatian high school students. 
Today, following The White project, The Dolphin Dream Society is running the Maritima Art program - maritime heritage in responsible tourism. The program formed a comprehensive  tourist offer based on a traditional boat, as well as an educational program in order to preserve skills of traditional sailing with the lateen sail. 
The women's 100 metres event at the 1999 Summer Universiade was held on 10 and 11 July at the Estadio Son Moix in Palma de Mallorca, Spain. 
Lower-level reconstructions have also been made, and include Proto-Malayo-Polynesian, Proto-Oceanic, and Proto-Polynesian. Recently, linguists such as Malcolm Ross and Andrew Pawley have built large lexicons for Proto-Oceanic and Proto-Polynesian. 
Below are Proto-Austronesian phonemes reconstructed by Robert Blust, a professor of linguistics at the University of Hawaii at Manoa. A total of 25 Proto-Austronesian consonants, 4 vowels, and 4 diphthongs were reconstructed. However, Blust acknowledges that some of the reconstructed consonants are still controversial and debated. 
The following table shows how Wolff's Proto-Austronesian phonemic system differs from Blust's system. 
Dyen (1963), including data from the Formosan languages, expanded Dempwolff's set of coronal consonants:  
Blust based his system on a combination of Dyen, Tsuchida and Dahl, and attempted to reduce the total number of phonemes. He accepted Dahl's reduction of Dyen's S X x into S but did not accept either Tsuchida's or Dahl's split of Dyen's d; in addition, he reduced Dyen's s1 s2 to a single phoneme s. While accepting Dyen's c, he was hesitant about T and D (more recently, Blust appears to have accepted D but rejected T, and also rejected Z). 
Blust also observed the following mergers and sound changes between Proto-Austronesian and Proto-Malayo-Polynesian. 
However, according to Wolff (2010:241), Proto-Malayo-Polynesian's development from Proto-Austronesian only included the following three sound changes. 
Proto-Oceanic merged even more phonemes. This is why modern-day Polynesian languages have some of the most restricted consonant inventories in the world. 
Below is a table of John Wolff's Proto-Austronesian voice system from Blust (2009:433). Wolff's "four-voice" system was derived from evidence in various Formosan and Philippine languages. 
However, Ross (2009) notes that what may be the most divergent languages, Tsou, Rukai, and Puyuma, are not addressed by this reconstruction, which therefore cannot claim to be alignment system of the protolanguage of the entire family. He calls the unit to which this reconstruction applies Nuclear Austronesian. 
Currently, the most complete reconstruction of the Proto-Austronesian case marker system is offered by Malcolm Ross. The reconstructed case markers are as follows: 
Morphology and syntax are often hard to separate in the Austronesian languages, particularly the Philippine languages. This is because the morphology of the verbs often affects how the rest of the sentence would be constructed (i.e., syntax). 
Below are some Proto-Austronesian affixes (including prefixes, infixes, and suffixes) reconstructed by Robert Blust. For instance, *pa- was used for non-stative (i.e., dynamic) causatives, while *pa-ka was used for stative causatives (Blust 2009:282). Blust also noted a p/m pairing phenomenon in which many affixes have both p- and m- forms. This system is especially elaborate in the Thao language of Taiwan. 
CV (consonant + vowel) reduplication is very common among the Austronesian languages. In Proto-Austronesian, Ca-reduplicated (consonant + /a/) numbers were used to count humans, while the non-reduplicated sets were used to count non-human and inanimate objects. CV-reduplication was also used to nominalize verbs in Proto-Austronesian. In Ilocano, CV-reduplication is used to pluralize nouns. 
The Proto-Austronesian and Proto-Malayo-Polynesian personal pronouns below were reconstructed by Robert Blust. 
In 2006, Malcolm Ross also proposed seven different pronominal categories for persons. The categories are listed below, with the Proto-Austronesian first person singular ("I") given as examples. 
The following is from Ross' 2002 proposal of the Proto-Austronesian pronominal system, which contains five categories, including the free (i.e., independent or unattached), free polite, and three genitive categories. 
Below are colors in reconstructed Proto-Austronesian, Proto-Malayo-Polynesian, Proto-Oceanic, and Proto-Polynesian. The first three have been reconstructed by Robert Blust, while the Proto-Polynesian words given below were reconstructed by Andrew Pawley. Proto-Polynesian displays many innovations not found in the other proto-languages. 
In Kavalan, Amis, and Tagalog, the reflexes of *timuR mean "south" or "south wind," while in the languages of the southern Philippines and Indonesia it means "east" or "east wind." 
Also, the Malay reflex of *lahud is laut, which means "sea", used as directions timur laut (means "northeast", timur = "east") and barat laut (means "northwest", barat = "west"). Meanwhile, *daya only performs in barat daya, which means "southwest". 
On the other hand, the Javanese reflex of *lahud, lor, means "north" since the Java Sea is to the north of the island of Java. 
Below are reconstructed Proto-Austronesian, Proto-Malayo-Polynesian, Proto-Oceanic, and Proto-Polynesian numbers from the Austronesian Basic Vocabulary Database. 
Below are reconstructed Proto-Austronesian, Proto-Malayo-Polynesian, Proto-Oceanic, and Proto-Polynesian verbs from the Austronesian Basic Vocabulary Database. 
Sequences which are likely (or may have been) monosyllabic roots, but cannot be unequivocally reconstructed 
Reconstructed doubled monosyllables phonologically but which cannot be proven to be monosyllabic roots 
Sequences which occur as final syllables over a wide area but which cannot be reconstructed as a monosyllabic root 
A former Irish athlete, Wall served as the International Secretary for BLE (the forerunner to Athletic Association of Ireland) from 1984 to 2000. 
Elisabeth Carew (born 13 June 1985) is a Norwegian singer and songwriter. Carew is best known for competing in Melodi Grand Prix 2010 and 2014. 
In 2014, Carew was announced as one of the contestants in the Norwegian national selection for the Eurovision Song Contest 2014, Melodi Grand Prix 2014. She is competing with the song "Sole Survivor". Carew competed in the third semi-final on 9 March 2014 at the Folketeatret in Oslo. She advanced to the finals, which was held on 15 March 2014 in Oslo Spektrum. Despite being a considered a favourite to win the competition, Carew did not make the superfinal and placed 5th-9th in the final. 
Carew is the younger sister of Norwegian footballer John Carew. Her father is Gambian and her mother is Norwegian. 
Oppositions was an architectural journal produced by the Institute for Architecture and Urban Studies from 1973 to 1984. Many of its articles contributed to advancing architectural theory and many of its contributors became distinguished practitioners in the field of architecture. Twenty-six issues were produced during its eleven years of existence. 
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Shaheen is currently a member of the Syrian Senior national team and the Syrian U-23 national team. He was a part of the Syrian U-23 national team in the Mediterranean Games 2009 in Italy and he scored one goal against Italy U20 in the first match of the group-stage. 
This biographical article related to Syrian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
WCTT-FM (107.3 FM, "T-107") is a radio station broadcasting a Top 40/CHR and rock music format. It is licensed to Corbin, Kentucky, United States. The station is currently owned by Encore Communications, Inc. 
Sir Richard Clive Mottram GCB (born 23 April 1946) is a former British civil servant, who retired in 2007 from his most recent senior post as Permanent Secretary, Intelligence, Security and Resilience in the Cabinet Office. 
He serves on the board of a number of private and public sector organisations, including chairing the board of Amey PLC. He is a Visiting Professor at the London School of Economics and Political Science and member of the advisory board of LSE IDEAS. He is a trustee of the Royal Anniversary Trust, which oversees The Queen's Anniversary Prizes for Higher and Further Education. 
From 1986 to 1989, he was the Under-secretary responsible for the defence programme, and from 1989 to 1992, the Deputy Secretary with responsibilities for UK defence policy and strategy, and defence relations with other countries at the time of the end of the Cold War. He was the architect of the "Options for Change' Defence Review. 
After this, in 1992, he was appointed as a Permanent Secretary, first at the Office of Public Service and Science in the Cabinet Office. His responsibilities there included public service change, Civil Service management questions, and science and technology policy and the science budget. 
In 1995, he became Permanent Secretary at the Ministry of Defence, where he worked on, among other things, the Labour Government's Strategic Defence Review. 
Mottram was still at the DETR in 2002 when, after further controversy over alleged "burying of bad news" involving Moore and Martin Sixsmith, the department's Director of Communications, Stephen Byers announced that both Moore and Sixsmith had decided to resign. Mottram was in the middle of negotiations with Sixsmith at the time of the Byers announcement. According to Sixsmith he said to a colleague as Byers headed to the interview studios: 
We're all fucked. I'm fucked. You're fucked. The whole department is fucked. It's the biggest cock-up ever. We're all completely fucked.
After Sixmith included this quote in an interview with the Sunday Times about his "resignation" it was picked up extensively in the media and tended to be reported in bowdlerised form as "f***ed", leading Tony Wright, the Chairman of the Public Administration Committee at the time, to comment to Mottram that "Our note-takers have trouble with asterisks." 
Sir Richard has worked closely with a large number of Ministers and took the impartiality and professionalism of the civil service very seriously. His efforts to communicate the nature of this relationship were not, however, always successful. In his oral evidence to the House of Commons Public Administration Committee on 7 March 2002, he said 
He was made chair of the Joint Intelligence Committee at time when the credibility of the organisation needed to be re-established after intelligence reports were apparently "sexed-up" for PR purposes during the chairmanship of John Scarlett. The JIC's role had come under scrutiny in the review of the information about weapons of mass destruction in Iraq and the Hutton Inquiry into the suicide of MoD weapons expert, Dr. David Kelly. 
Sir Richard retired from the Civil Service in November 2007 when the responsibilities he held were reorganised into two posts, with the Cabinet Secretary taking on the Accounting Officer role for the Intelligence Agencies. 
Sir Richard served as a Board Member and then from 2002 to 2004 President of the Commonwealth Association for Public Administration and Management. From 2008 to 2014 he was chairman of the Defence Science and Technology Laboratory Dstl. He was a Board Member of Ashridge Business School from 1998- 2015. 
Mottram was appointed a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) in the 1998 New Year Honours and promoted to a Knight Grand Cross of the same Order in the 2006 New Year Honours. 
Johnson was the Co-operative Commonwealth Federation Member for Parliament for Kindersley, Saskatchewan. He first won his seat in the House of Commons of Canada in the 1953 federal election and was re-elected in 1957 before being defeated in the 1958 general election in the Diefenbaker landslide. He attempted to re-enter the House of Commons in several subsequent elections as a New Democrat but was unsuccessful. 
In 1977, Johnson was appointed to serve as Saskatchewan's agent-general in London, England. He also served for several years as president of the Saskatchewan CCF-NDP and was president of the federal New Democratic Party of Canada from 1963 to 1965. He died in Victoria, British Columbia in July 2019 at the age of 96. 
Gent was a pornographic magazine published by the Magna Publishing Group, publisher of Swank, Genesis, Velvet and many other popular men's magazines. It focused on women with large breasts, and is subtitled "Home of the D-Cups". 
It continued to be a market for popular fiction through the 1970s, 80s (then put out by Dugent Publishing Corp.) and 90s, publishing pieces such as "Strawberry Spring" by Stephen King. In later years, it was owned by the Princeton Media Group, publisher of other similar magazines such as Oui at which time it was derided by some as a "working-class Playboy wannabe", and overshadowed by the publicity surrounding Hustler publisher Larry Flynt. 
Another Gent magazine was published in Japan in the 1980s. Targeted at local fans of Western adult films, it was unrelated to the American publication and had a glossier look. 
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Farr married the former Anita Nicholson Harris in 1901, and the couple had two daughters, Jane and Anita, and an infant son who did not survive. 
As part of one of his first English classes at the new university, Farr implemented an honor system in 1905.  Other faculty members thought the honor system was a good idea, and began to implement it in their own classes on an ad hoc basis.  In 1914, the students requested the creation of a school-wide honor code, and university president Albert A. Murphree and the Florida Board of Control approved the concept in 1916. 
Farr also served as the first vice president of the University of Florida from its inception in 1905 until his retirement, and it fell upon him to lead the university through the world-wide influenza epidemic of 1918 when president Murphree was incapacitated with the illness.  Hundreds of the university's students and faculty fell ill with the deadly "Spanish flu," and although one professor and several students died, the university was fortunate to suffer few fatalities. 
Farr died in 1958.  He was one of the University of Florida's last living links to the generation that was responsible for the university's creation in 1905.  Farr's unpublished manuscript, The Making of a University, provides a first-hand account of the politics surrounding the creation of the university, and serves as one of the primary sources regarding the university's early history from its inception in 1905 through his retirement in 1934. 
"Homer and Lisa Exchange Cross Words" is the sixth episode of the twentieth season of the American animated television series The Simpsons. It originally aired on the Fox network in the United States on November 16, 2008. In the episode, Lisa discovers that she has a talent for solving crossword puzzles, and she enters a crossword tournament. Lisa's feelings are hurt when she discovers that Homer bet against her in the championship match. 
The episode received generally positive reviews from critics, and finished fourth in its timeslot during its initial airing on Fox, with a 3.9 Nielsen rating. 
The episode features three musical montages: the sequence of Homer helping couples to break up features "Farewell to You, Baby" by Carl Martin, Homer's gambling on Lisa's puzzle solving is set to "Word Up!" by Cameo and "Fanfare for the Common Man" plays in the background of the montage of words removed from the dictionary. 
Tim Long was nominated for Writers Guild of America Award in the animation category for writing the episode. 
Robert Canning of IGN did not think there was anything "terrible" about the episode, but he did not think there was anything to get excited about, either. Canning thought there were a number of throwaway jokes in the episode that he felt worked well, "but the episode as a whole failed to grab me. As stated, there are a number of episodes that already fit this mold, and most of those are far superior." 
Daniel Aughey of TV Guide thought the episode provided a "healthy balance" of humor, story and heart. "Exactly what makes a great Simpsons episode!" Aughey would have liked to see Homer's storyline explored as an A story in its own episode rather than cut short as a C story. 
Allen Wheelis succeeded as a writer. Over a period of five decades, he crafted a series of novels while also writing a substantial body of wide-ranging works that has gone on to influence students and the educated public alike. He wrote prolifically, authoring 14 books including novels and memoirs, as well as several pieces for Commentary, The New Yorker, and various professional journals. 
Many of Wheelis's writings have been acclaimed by critics. His writings are typified by a profound philosophical pessimism, and "drew heavily from his experiences as both a doctor and a man hobbled by neuroses". However, his wife Ilse Wheelis is not alone in pointing out that though Wheelis "had a pessimistic outlook on the human condition . . . he also celebrated it. He believed people could find happiness". 
A story that appeared in Wheelis's nonfiction book The Illusionless Man: Fantasies and Meditations on Disillusionment, published in 1966, was the basis of John Korty's film The Crazy-Quilt. 
Wheelis's essay "Spirit" was included in Douglas Hofstadter and Daniel Dennett's 1981 collection The Mind's I: Fantasies and Reflections on Self and Soul. 
In his book, How People Change: Freedom & Necessity, published in 1975, Wheelis describes in detail a defining story about his relationship with his father. The author states that these childhood events not only caused his writing but also what he writes and the conclusions he comes to. He sees in this the determinism he wants to destroy and asks how to get free of it. 
"Desire is endless and unappeasable, is most intense where most forbidden, and is never far from despair." 
"We must affirm freedom and responsibility without denying that we are the product of circumstance, and must affirm that we are the product of circumstance without denying that we have the freedom to transcend that causality to become something which could not even have been provisioned from the circumstances which shaped us." 
The D403 state road is scheduled for a reconstruction in order to provide a more efficient connection to the Port of Rijeka, but those plans have been postponed. Currently, D-403 comprises many urban at-grade intersections within the city of Rijeka. 
The road, as well as all other state roads in Croatia, is managed and maintained by Hrvatske ceste, state owned company. 
Jim R. Trujillo is an American politician and businessman who served as a Democratic member of the New Mexico House of Representatives from 2003 to 2020. Trujillo was appointed by Governor Bill Richardson to fill the vacancy caused by the resignation of Patsy Trujillo (no relation). 
Trujillo graduated from Pojoaque High School and studied architecture at the College of Santa Fe (now the Santa Fe University of Art and Design). 
A businessman, Trujillo owned an operated a store. He was appointed to the New Mexico House of Representatives in 2003. In 2019, he announced that he would not seek re-election in 2020. 
Justice Asok Kumar Ganguly is an Indian jurist. He served as the Chairman of the West Bengal Human Rights Commission and as a Judge of the Supreme Court of India who delivered judgements in some high-profile cases like the 2G spectrum case. 
Justice Ganguly was born on 3 February 1947. He graduated in M.A (English) from University of Calcutta in 1968 and then passed LLB from the same university in 1970. 
Sport in Afghanistan is managed by the Afghan Sports Federation. Cricket and association football are the two most popular sports in Afghanistan. The traditional and the national sport of Afghanistan is Buzkashi. The Afghan Sports Federation promotes cricket, association football, basketball, volleyball, golf, handball, boxing, taekwondo, weightlifting, bodybuilding, track and field, skating, bowling, snooker, chess, and other sports in the country. 
Cricket is the most popular sport in Afghanistan and is one of the main sports that Afghans participate in and watch on television. In the national level, cricket matches are played between provinces, mainly between the south and eastern provinces of the country.  According to locals, cricket has helped Afghanistan in bringing unity. 
Afghanistan Cricket Board (ACB) is the official governing body of the sport of cricket in Afghanistan. Its current headquarters is in Kabul, Afghanistan. The Afghanistan Cricket Board is Afghanistan's representative at the International Cricket Council and was an associate member of ICC from June 2013 to 2017. Now it is one of the full members of ICC since 2017. It is also a member of the Asian Cricket Council. 
Starting from 2017 season, Afghanistan has a four-day first-class competition (Ahmad Shah Abdali 4-day Tournament), a 50-over List A competition (Ghazi Amanullah Khan Regional One Day Tournament) and a recognized Twenty20 league (Shpageeza Cricket League). 
Today, cricket is the most popular sport in Afghanistan, and the Afghanistan team has made quick progress in the international arena through winning a number of international competitions. 
Buzkashi is the traditional and national sport and a "passion" in Afghanistan where it is often played on Fridays and special events, matches draw thousands of fans. Whitney Azoy notes in his book Buzkashi: Game and Power in Afghanistan that "leaders are men who can seize control by means foul and fair and then fight off their rivals. The Buzkashi rider does the same". Traditionally, games could last for several days, but in its more regulated tournament version, it has a limited match time. 
Basketball was first played in Afghanistan in 1936. In 1966, the Afghanistan National Olympic Committee (ANOC) founded the Afghanistan national basketball team after receiving challenges from India and Pakistan. Tom Gouttierre, an American Peace Corps and coach of the team at Habibia High School, became the first coach. It is played by both Afghan men and women. 
Afghans have taken a recent interest in the Mixed Martial Arts. There are several gyms in Afghanistan which promote the sport and have fighters. Siyar Bahadurzada is mixed martial artists who compete in the Ultimate Fighting Championship. They are well known for holding and wearing the Afghan flag around themselves before and after their professional fights. 
Rohullah Nikpai was the first Afghan representative of his nation to win a medal for Afghanistan in the Olympics. He won Bronze in the 2008 and 2012 Olympics, the only two occasions Afghanistan have received medals. This sport has recently thrived in Afghanistan by his influence. 
Boxing has recently flourished in Afghanistan, with Hamid Rahimi having a huge influence in the country. The first ever boxing match in Afghanistan was held in 2012 with Rahimi fighting and winning by TKO (Technical Knockout). 
Bodybuilding is widely enjoyed in Afghanistan. An Afghan by the name of Ahmad Yasi Salik Qaderi ("Mr. Muscles") became the overall winner of the 2017 World Championship in Bodybuilding and Fitness, which was held in Ulaanbaatar, Mongolia. 
Other sports in which Afghanistan competes include volleyball, golf, track and field, team handball, rugby, weightlifting, ice skating, bowling, baseball, snooker, and chess. Saleh Mohammad is a professional Afghan snooker player, who previously represented Pakistan in international competitions but is now representing Afghanistan. 
Buzkashi is a traditional sport and it is mostly played by people in northern Afghanistan and in Central Asia, as well as in northwestern parts of neighboring Pakistan. 
The Afghanistan Rugby Federation (ARF) was formed in 2011, and is registered with the National Olympic Committee and approved by the Government of the Islamic Republic of Afghanistan. The national team participated in the 2018 Asian Games in Indonesia and took part in the Olympic qualifiers in South Korea in 2019. 
In 2015 Afghanistan held its first marathon; among those who ran the entire marathon was one woman, Zainab, age 25, who thus became the first Afghan woman to run in a marathon within her own country. 
Lowell is a village in Dodge County, Wisconsin, United States, along the Beaver Dam River. The population was 340 at the 2010 census. The village is located within the Town of Lowell. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 340 people, 136 households, and 89 families living in the village. The population density was 340.0 inhabitants per square mile (131.3/km2). There were 163 housing units at an average density of 163.0 per square mile (62.9/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 99.4% White, 0.3% African American, and 0.3% Native American. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.5% of the population. 
There were 136 households, of which 31.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0% were married couples living together, 10.3% had a female householder with no husband present, 5.1% had a male householder with no wife present, and 34.6% were non-families. 27.9% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.50 and the average family size was 3.06. 
The median age in the village was 42.3 years. 21.5% of residents were under the age of 18; 6.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 28.3% were from 25 to 44; 31% were from 45 to 64; and 12.9% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the village was 50.6% male and 49.4% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 366 people, 142 households, and 93 families living in the village. The population density was 368.1 people per square mile (142.7/km2). There were 153 housing units at an average density of 153.9 per square mile (59.7/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 96.17% White, 0.27% Black or African American, 1.09% Asian, 1.64% from other races, and 0.82% from two or more races. 3.28% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race. 
There were 142 households, out of which 37.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.4% were married couples living together, 8.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.5% were non-families. 27.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 14.1% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.58 and the average family size was 3.18. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 30.3% under the age of 18, 5.7% from 18 to 24, 32.2% from 25 to 44, 21.6% from 45 to 64, and 10.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 34 years. For every 100 females, there were 104.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 104.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the village was $43,594, and the median income for a family was $46,750. Males had a median income of $35,694 versus $23,333 for females. The per capita income for the village was $14,393. About 4.8% of families and 9.5% of the population were below the poverty line, including 14.7% of those under age 18 and 6.3% of those age 65 or over. 
Jenni Ruiza is a Latina producer, actress, comedian, and writer from Bronx, New York. She was the co-founder of Comedy High, a comedy production company. She was also a co-host of  Fixxx Podcast. 
Ruiza began her career in middle school where she wrote screenplays. She made herself the starring role of each, alongside the women who inspire her, including Bette Midler, Diane Keaton and Meryl Streep. She wanted to star in TV shows and films, focusing on her love for comedy. 
Ruiza wanted to do comedic roles, which eventually led her to become a producer. She participated in Latino Stereotypes for Dummies. This short video was written by Jesenia and uses humor to explore the realities of stereotypes that Latinas face in the entertainment industry. Saturday Night Live served as an impetus for this project, as up until 2017 it did not include a Latina comedienne in its cast. 
The podcast The Fixxx promotes Ruiza and allows her to voice her opinions. Ruiza takes part in feature films, television and commercials. Her works include Full Frontal with Samantha Bee, In Case of Emergency and has been seen in commentary for Buzzfeed, Fusion, and Come Here and Say That with Alicia Menendez. 
The most common color is black and tan, which is also the original color. Lately, other colors have been approved: brown and tan, blue and tan, lilac and tan, yellow, pink, red and merle. 
Due to its need for human attention and eagerness to please and impress its owner, the Prague Ratter generally responds well to basic training and commands. This bright breed has the ability to learn to perform many impressive tricks and tasks. Many owners claim that these dogs can easily be taught to use a litter box, thus eliminating the need for constant trips outdoors. 
Establishing immediate trust and respect is key to successfully training the Prague Ratter. These dogs can be somewhat sensitive to criticism and respond best to positive reinforcement and reward-based training. 
Prazsky Krysarik might be small, but is nevertheless an easy dog to train as long as it is treated consistently. It can be trained for agility, freestyle, obedience, tracking etc. 
The sense of smell and hearing is highly developed, and Prazsky Krysarik is still a great rat hunter, just as its original purpose was. They have a high prey drive and will readily go after squirrels, rats, and mice. 
Until the end of the 20th century, the breed existed and developed exclusively within the borders of the Czech Republic and Slovakia. By the second decade of the 21st century, several hundred Prague krysariks live outside Czech Republic. Breed clubs have been established in several countries. In addition to the countries of Western Europe and Scandinavia, Prague ratters live in Russia, USA and Japan. There is a small number of ratters in Ukraine, Kazakhstan and Italy. 
In 2019, it became an FCI acknowledged breed. There are only about 6,000 Prague Ratters registered in the world and they usually only have 1-3 puppies per year. They are nevertheless presented at shows in the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Scandinavia. 
It is believed that the Prague Ratter is one of the dog breeds that do not have significant health problems. However, they can be prone to: 
Riddoch was born at Turriff, in Aberdeenshire, Scotland, and arrived in Victoria with his parents and family in 1851, settling in Newtown, Geelong. He left for the Ovens River goldfields and was quite successful. He returned to Geelong and set himself up as a storekeeper and wine merchant. In 1861 he purchased Yallum Park Estate, a sheep and cattle station near Penola. He founded the Coonawarra fruit colony there, and built a grand residence; he was noted for his hospitality. 
John was elected to the district of Victoria in the House of Assembly, and served from March 1865 to April 1870 with Adam Lindsay Gordon followed by James Umpherston then Henry Kent Hughes as colleagues, and from December 1871 to April 1873 with Edwin Derrington. 
His brother George followed him as a member of the House of Assembly for the District of Victoria in 1893, and served a three-year term. In 1901 he was returned to the Legislative Council as a representative of the Southern District, and retired  at the end of 1909. 
On April 1, 2019, Tucker and Carlile performed "Bring My Flowers Now" at Loretta Lynn's All-Star Birthday Celebration Concert at the Bridgestone Arena in Nashville. 
The album was officially announced on June 5, 2019. The album's first single, "The Wheels of Laredo" was released with the album's preorder the same day, as well as its music video. Also on June 5, Tucker and Carlile performed "Delta Dawn" at the 2019 CMT Music Awards, where they were joined by Martina McBride, Trisha Yearwood, Deana Carter, Lauren Alaina, RaeLynn and Carly Pearce. 
The album's second single, "Hard Luck", was released on June 28, along with its accompanying music video which features guest appearances from the album's producers, Brandi Carlile and Shooter Jennings. 
The third single, a cover of Miranda Lambert's "The House That Built Me", was released on August 2 and its music video was released on August 26. 
The album's fourth single, "Bring My Flowers Now", was released on August 16. The song's music video premiered on October 22. 
"The Winner's Game" was released as the fifth single from the album on November 25. It had previously only been available with the album through Tucker's online store on a bonus lathe cut vinyl featuring the song and a personalized message, which was limited to 50 copies. 
A live version of "Bring My Flowers Now" was released on December 13. It was recorded during a sold-out show at the Troubadour in Los Angeles on October 16. It was followed by the release Live from the Troubadour on October 16, 2020, a live album consisting of Tucker's full set from the show. 
"Pack Your Lies and Go" was released as the album's sixth single on November 6, 2020. It had previously been released as a bonus track on the Target exclusive version of the album. 
The majority of the album was written by Brandi Carlile and twin brothers Tim and Phil Hanseroth. The trio wrote seven of the album's ten tracks. The remaining three songs are covers. 
The album received universal acclaim from music critics. At Metacritic, which assigns a normalized rating out of 100 to reviews from mainstream publications, the album received a weighted average score of 83 based on 7 reviews. 
The album debuted at number eight on the Billboard Top Country Albums chart, selling 10,000 units in its first week of release, almost all in traditional album sales. The album also debuted at number two on the Billboard Folk Albums chart and number 68 on the Billboard 200. The album saw success internationally as well, peaking at number two on the UK Country Albums chart and number 60 on the Scottish Albums chart. 
Ghobeishavi Previously played for Aboomoslem and Rah Ahan, both of whom participate in Iran Pro League. 
In 2003, Ghobeishavi was summoned by Iranian Football Federation to attend a national camp in preparation for the Asian Nations Cup. 
This biographical article related to a football goalkeeper from Iran is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Wikipedia does not currently have an article on "antemedial", but our sister project Wiktionary does: 
In linear algebra, the trace of a square matrix A, denoted tr(A), is defined to be the sum of elements on the main diagonal (from the upper left to the lower right) of A. 
This follows immediately from the fact that transposing a square matrix does not affect elements along the main diagonal. 
This means that the trace of a product of equal-sized matrices functions in a similar way to a dot product of vectors (imagine A and B as long vectors with columns stacked on each other). For this reason, generalizations of vector operations to matrices (e.g. in matrix calculus and statistics) often involve a trace of matrix products. 
where the first equality is because the traces of a matrix and its transpose are equal. Note that this is not true in general for more than three factors. 
Unlike the determinant, the trace of the product is not the product of traces, that is there exist matrices A and B such that 
When the characteristic of the base field is zero, the converse also holds: if tr(Ak) = 0 for all k, then A is nilpotent. 
that is, the trace of a square matrix equals the sum of the eigenvalues counted with multiplicities. 
Conversely, any square matrix with zero trace is a linear combinations of the commutators of pairs of matrices.[note 3] Moreover, any square matrix with zero trace is unitarily equivalent to a square matrix with diagonal consisting of all zeros. 
The trace of a permutation matrix is the number of fixed points, because the diagonal term aii is 1 if the ith point is fixed and 0 otherwise. 
The matrix PX is idempotent, and more generally, the trace of any idempotent matrix equals its own rank. 
Expressions like tr(exp(A)), where A is a square matrix, occur so often in some fields (e.g. multivariate statistical theory), that a shorthand notation has become common: 
The trace corresponds to the derivative of the determinant: it is the Lie algebra analog of the (Lie group) map of the determinant. This is made precise in Jacobi's formula for the derivative of the determinant. 
which clearly has trace zero, indicating that this matrix represents an infinitesimal transformation which preserves area. 
A related characterization of the trace applies to linear vector fields. Given a matrix A, define a vector field F on Rn by F(x) = Ax. The components of this vector field are linear functions (given by the rows of A). Its divergence div F is a constant function, whose value is equal to tr(A). 
The kernel of this map, a matrix whose trace is zero, is often said to be traceless or trace free, and these matrices form the simple Lie algebra        s l    n     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {sl}}_{n}}  , which is the Lie algebra of the special linear group of matrices with determinant 1. The special linear group consists of the matrices which do not change volume, while the special linear Lie algebra is the matrices which do not alter volume of infinitesimal sets. 
For a complex simple Lie algebra (such as       s l     {\displaystyle {\mathfrak {sl}}}  n), every such bilinear form is proportional to each other; in particular, to the Killing form. 
The latter, however, is just the Kronecker delta, being 1 if i = j and 0 otherwise. This shows that tr(A) is simply the sum of the coefficients along the diagonal. This method, however, makes coordinate invariance an immediate consequence of the definition. 
which yields multiplication by n, as the trace of the identity is the dimension of the vector space. 
Using the notion of dualizable objects and categorical traces, this approach to traces can be fruitfully axiomatized and applied to other mathematical areas. 
Mariia Tailakova (born 12 March 2001) is a Russian table tennis player. Her highest career ITTF ranking was 84. 
This biographical article relating to a Russian table tennis figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She was taught by Rick Macci, a former tennis player. Macci taught many people including Serena and Venus Williams. 
Black won two singles titles on the ITF Circuit in her career. On February 2, 2015, she reached her best singles ranking of world No. 404. On September 14, 2015, she peaked at No. 348 in the doubles rankings. 
Black made her WTA Tour main-draw debut at the 2014 Abierto Mexicano Telcel. Having been awarded a wildcard, she played Serbian sixth seed Bojana Jovanovski in the first round, losing in straight sets. 
Tornado and her younger sister Hurricane Tyra had at one point been referred to as "the next Williams sisters". 
In 2017, she was sidelined by a hip injury. Black used GoFundMe to successfully get the $40,000 needed for the hip surgery. Her last match on the circuit so far took place in March 2017. 
This American biographical article related to tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Following the riot, Holmes and Hunter continued their education at UGA, graduating several years later and holding careers in their fields. The integration at UGA was followed by further integration at universities throughout the state in the following years. 
3hreeSixty is a Hong Kong retailer of natural foods and organic foods. It is a member of Dairy Farm group. It offers earth friendly household products, non-chemically based personal care items and wellness-related lifestyle products. Its target customers are middle class families and its retail prices are higher than other supermarkets. 
Vera Chaplina's special interest was the baby animals, and in 1933 she was put in charge of the zoo's motherless youngsters. In 1937 she became chief of one of the zoo's largest departments, the wild animals section Moscow Zoo. 
Vera Chaplina worked at the Moscow Zoo until 1946, writing stories when she could find the time. Since then she has devoted more time to literary pursuits and became a full-time writer. Chaplina's stories were translated into English, German, French, Spanish, Portuguese, Japanese Chinese, Hebrew, Polish,  Czech, Hungarian, Latvian, Estonian, Romanian, Danish, Swedish, and Serbian. 
New Hate is the second EP by Israeli groove metal band Betzefer, released in May 2003. It was mixed by ex-Eternal Gray guitarist Eyal Glotman and recorded in his studio, with mastering by Maor Appelbaum. 
This was the band's last unsigned release, as their next release was already on the Roadrunner Records label. 
Acalolepta siporensis is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1939. It is known from Indonesia. 
"Cartucho" means "cartridge" in Spanish, and refers to the characteristic belts of ammunition worn by Mexican revolutionary soldiers. It also, however, is the nickname of a character introduced in the book's opening vignette. As for the reasons for keeping the Spanish term in the English translation, Campobello's translator explains that "the English equivalent [. . .] has none of the Spanish rhythm and feeling." 
On its initial publication, the book was somewhat overlooked, in part because Campobello was marginalized as a Villista at a time when most of the literature and films of the Revolution were openly against Pancho Villa. Still, Max Parra argues that critical reception was favourable among "the small world of Mexico City's intellectual community" and quotes the 1935 assessment of Berta Gamboa de Camino, who described the book as "alive and real, breathing, full of human feeling and deep pathos." 
Moreover, due to its distinctive style and testimonial impact, as well as the fact that it is the only major portrayal of the Revolution written by a woman, Cartucho has increasingly been recognized as a major literary work from this era.  
She has participated at the 2012 Summer Olympics and finished on 7th place in Group All-Around final. 
She has competed at world championships, including at the 2015 World Rhythmic Gymnastics Championships, where she won the bronze medal in the 5 ribbons event and eventually competed alongside her teammates Airi Hatakeyama, Sakura Noshitani, Sayuri Sugimoto and Kiko Yokota at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, finishing outside of medals in the group all-around final with an eight-place score of 34.200. 
This biographical article related to Japanese rhythmic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chippewa Valley Technical College is one of the 16 technical and community colleges in the Wisconsin Technical College System, centered in Eau Claire, Wisconsin.  It serves an eleven-county area with the largest campus located in Eau Claire (actually home to three separate campuses:  Clairemont, Gateway, and West) with major regional centers in Chippewa Falls, Menomonie, Neillsville and River Falls. 
This article about a university or college in Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Armand Drevina (born 3 February 1994) is a German-Kosovar footballer who plays as a midfielder for SC Borussia Freialdenhoven. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Semaj Rakim Christon (born November 1, 1992) is an American professional basketball player for ratiopharm Ulm of the German Basketball Bundesliga. He played college basketball for Xavier. 
The Cincinnati, Ohio native attended Winton Woods High School with whom he led the Fort Ancient Valley Conference in scoring as a senior with 21 points per game, adding 5.2 assists. He was a District 16 Player of the Year, Fort Ancient Valley Conference West Division Player of the Year, Cincinnati Enquirer All-Star, All-Southwest District Second-Team selection, and Honorable Mention All-State. 
In July 2011, Christon committed to Xavier, playing in the Atlantic 10 Conference of the NCAA Division I, but would join the team in 2012, first attending prep school Brewster Academy along with fellow recruit Jalen Reynolds. Christon, rated a four star recruit by Rivals.com, chose Cincinnati college Xavier over reported offers from Illinois, Providence and Georgetown. 
At Brewster, he was part of a star-studded lineup that included future NBA players JaKarr Sampson, T. J. Warren and Mitch McGary, serving as the floor general and assist-provider as the school romped to a 32-1 record and a National Prep School Championship, with Christon earning All-NESPAC First Team honours. 
During his high school career, Christon also played AAU basketball for Club Ohio, participating in the Under-17 National Championship, and later on for the Cincinnati Knights. 
In March 2014, Christon declared himself as an early entrant for the NBA draft, forgoing his two remaining years of college eligibility. Despite speculation that he would withdraw his entry, Christon hired an agent and submitted the paperwork in April 2014, thereby ensuring he wouldn't return to Xavier for his junior season. 
Christon finished his collegiate career with 1,034 points in 64 games (16.2 average), adding 281 assists (4.4), he led the Musketeers in scoring and steals during both of the seasons he played and in assists during his freshman season. 
Projected to be drafted anywhere between the late first round and late second round, Christon was selected by the Miami Heat with the 55th overall pick in the 2014 NBA draft on June 26. His draft rights were later traded to the Charlotte Hornets, and then again to the Oklahoma City Thunder. He joined the Thunder for the 2014 NBA Summer League where he experienced his first taste of professional basketball. 
Later that summer, Christon moved to the Italian Serie A, signing with Consultinvest Pesaro on August 3, 2015. In 30 games, he averaged 14.3 points, 3.7 assists, 3.3 rebounds and 1.6 steals in 33.2 minutes per game. 
On July 31, 2018, Christon signed with the Puerto Rican team Santeros de Aguada for the rest of the 2018 BSN season. 
On January 27, 2020, Christon officially signed with Kirolbet Baskonia of the Liga ACB and the EuroLeague. He averaged 9 points, 3.2 rebounds and 2.7 assists per game in ACB competition. The team opted out of Christon's contract on July 1. 
On November 14, 2017, Christon was named a member of the United States national team for the 2019 FIBA World Cup qualification. Christon led the team to a 2-0 record during the November first-round games, played in both games, averaged 13.5 minutes, 6.5 points, 1.0 rebounds and 2.5 assists per game, shot 44.4 percent from the field, 100 percent (2-2 3pt FGs) percent from 3-point and 100 percent from the foul line (3-3 FTs). 
He supported the doctrine of the apologetic miracle being proof of prophecy, the non-creation of the Qur'an, intercession, and the possibility of seeing God. 
Ibn Taimiyyah called al-Baqillani 'the best of the Ash'ari mutakallimun, unrivalled by any predecessor or successor'. 
Fifty-five titles of works written by al-Baqillani have been listed, the great majority on legal and theological matters, and many written against his opponents. 
Apataniidae is a family of early smoky wing sedges in the order Trichoptera. There are about 18 genera and at least 180 described species in Apataniidae. 
Tata is a province in the Moroccan economic region of Souss-Massa. Its population in 2004 was 121,618.  
Isaiah Major (born January 9, 1970 in Chicago, Illinois, United States) best known as DJ Rush, is an American musician, DJ and record producer of electronic music. 
Isaiah Major was born in Chicago, Illinois, United States. Isaiah finished his degree in Computer Operations, Anger Management and won several first place awards in Art competitions.[citation needed] 
In the blooming house scene of Chicago, DJ Rush quickly rose to prominence in the electronic music genre. He made his first appearances as a DJ in the Chicago clubs Music Box, the Powerhouse and the Warehouse where he played his sets for up to ten hours. He also began producing. 
In 1991 DJ Rush released his first single ("Knee Deep") on the label Trax Records. He began to gain ground in London and Berlin. In 1996 he released two full-length albums on Trax Records. 
In 1998 DJ Rush successfully had a Europe-wide breakthrough with the record "Motherfucking Bass". It was widely regarded as one of the "club hymns" of that year. Following this success he teamed up with Tina Panitzke to start the booking agency and record label Kne'Deep in Berlin. In 2001 he displaced Jeff Mills as the Reader's Choice for most popular DJ in Groove-Magazine (a German magazine for electronic music released since 1989). 
As his fame grew, he used his status to help up and coming techno artists get their breakthrough by remixing their tracks or releasing them on his label, Kne'Deep.  He sometimes DJ's and MC's simultaneously as a unique way to entertain the crowd. DJ Rush is often regarded as one of the most iconic persons of techno. 
USS Guadalcanal (LPH-7), the third Iwo Jima-class amphibious assault ship (helicopter), was launched by the Philadelphia Naval Shipyard 16 March 1963, sponsored by Zola Shoup, wife of General Shoup, the former Commandant of the Marine Corps; and commissioned 20 July 1963, Captain Dale K. Peterson in command.  It was the second ship in the Navy to bear the name. 
Career highlights include 21 July 1966, when she recovered the Gemini X astronauts and their spacecraft after they landed in the Atlantic east of Cape Kennedy, and 13 March 1969, when she recovered the Apollo 9 capsule and crew off the Bahamas. In October 1985 the ship logged its 100,000th aircraft landing. 
Guadalcanal was decommissioned in 1994, and stored as part of the James River Reserve Fleet until she was used as a target and sunk in the Virginia Capes area on 19 May 2005. 
On 1 November 1966, a UH-2B Seasprite helicopter assigned to the ship crashed as it was taking off from the flight deck. Guadalcanal was in the Naval Shipyard in Portsmouth, VA to start a major overhaul at the time.  Three Navy men and one civilian shipyard worker were killed and 12 others were hospitalized.  Nine more sailors and civilians were treated for minor injuries. 
On 9 May 1968 she floated adrift off North Carolina due to a burned out bearing in the propulsion system. 
On 27 January 1976 she went aground in Augusta Bay, Sicily on a peak of coral which pushed in areas on either side of the bow, but did not crack or hole the ship.  Three days later, with cargo, personnel, helicopters, and fuel off-loaded to assist the effort, the ship was refloated. 
On 17 September 1981 near Sardinia, Italy, a USMC CH-53D helicopter crashed while attempting to land aboard the ship during training exercises killing all five crewmen. 
On 25 May 1993 Guadalcanal and the USS Monongahela (AO-178), collided during underway replenishment off of Cape Hatteras, North Carolina  when Guadalcanal's main gyrocompass failed. Five crew suffered minor injuries and $1.635M in damage was caused to the two ships. 
The Abu Sayda bombing was a chlorine car bombing attack that occurred on 15 May 2007, in an open-air market in the Iraqi Diyala Governorate village of Abu Sayda. The attack killed up to 45 people and wounded 60 more in the Shia village, the highest death toll of all chlorine bombings in Iraq. Iraqi and American military sources initially denied the use of chlorine. 
On 26 February 2019, the President of Republic Sergio Mattarella inaugurated the Italian academic year in Tuscia University. His speech was held after the introductory intervention of Marco Frey, president of the Italian Foundation Global Compact Network. Subsequently, Mattarella came to the Monastery of St. Rose of Viterbo (for a private visit). 
This Italian university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Studdale, Waldershare, Kent on 30 June 1916, son of Ernest and Christine Langford-Holt, and like most of his family educated at Shrewsbury School; his grandfather, George Jones Holt, had served as Mayor of Shrewsbury. During the Second World War, he served as a pilot, first in the Battle of Britain and later with the Fleet Air Arm. 
During his political career, his positions included serving on the Parliamentary Science Committee, the Estimates Committee, the Expenditure Committee and the Select Committee on Defence. During Churchill's later years, he was entrusted by the Tory Whips to look after the grand old man himself. He was knighted in 1962. 
He was married four times, firstly to Elisabeth Neustadtl in 1943.  The couple were divorced in 1951, and she married Major Robert Rivers-Bulkeley. In 1953, he married Flora Innes Stuart, daughter of Ian St Clair Stuart, but the marriage was dissolved in 1969, after which he married Maxine Veale in 1971. After the couple divorced in 1982, he was married for the last time to Irene Kerr. He died in London on 23 July 1993, aged 77. 
This article about a Conservative Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom representing an English constituency and born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The GWC Band is part of the Coffee High School Marching Trojans. It is under the direction of Steve Myers, who is also the Band Director of the Coffee High School Band. 
LANtastic is a peer-to-peer local area network (LAN) operating system for DOS and Microsoft Windows (and formerly OS/2).  The New York Times described the network, which permits machines to function both as servers and as workstations, as allowing computers, "to share printers and other devices." 
InformationWeek pointed out that "these peer-to-peer networking solutions, such as Webcorp's Web and Artisoft's LANtastic, definitely aren't powerful, but they can act as 'starter' local area networks" yet added that even Fortune-sized companies find them useful. 
LANtastic supports Ethernet, ARCNET and Token Ring adapters as well as its original twisted-pair adapter at 2 Mbit/s. 
Its multi-platform support allows a LANtastic client station to access any combination of Windows or DOS operating systems, and its interconnectivity allows sharing of files, printers, CD-ROMs and applications throughout an enterprise. LANtastic was especially popular before Windows 95 arrived with built-in networking and was nearly as popular as the market leader Novell at the time. 
The New York Times described the network, which permits machines to function both as servers and as workstations, as allowing computers "to share printers and other devices. 
LANtastic was originally developed by Artisoft, Inc. in Tucson, Arizona, the first company to offer peer-to-peer networking. 
Artisoft bought TeleVantage, and renamed the latter Artisoft TeleVantage. Artisoft subsequently bought Vertical Communications (September, 2004), and renamed itself (January, 2005) to be Vertical Communications. 
Following the release of TeleVantage, Lantastic and Artisoft's other legacy products were acquired by SpartaCom Technologies in 2000. SpartaCom was later acquired by PC Micro. 
LANtastic 8.01 was released in 2006. It can connect PCs running MS-DOS (also PC DOS) 5.0 or later and Windows 3.x up to 7 (in case of Windows XP and 7, some limitations apply). 
In 1989, BYTE magazine listed LANtastic as among the "Distinction" winners of the BYTE Awards, stating that the $399 starter kit with two cards was "a lot of LAN for the buck" and noting that columnist Jerry Pournelle used it "despite the silly name". 
Artisoft products were described in 1994 as "popular with small businesses." By 1996 they were able to buy the 1991-founded Stylus Innovation for $12.8 million. 
A package named Lantastic-95 was designed to give more security than the Windows 95 "signon" screen (for which pressing ESCape is the way to bypass it) and also support "long name" files. 
After success in her home country and stints with the groups Urban K Loud, Munchie and Exodus, Alda moved to London and received a solo record contract with Wildstar Records, scoring two top 20 hit singles on the UK Singles Chart in 1998; "Real Good Time" and "Girls Night Out". Her debut album, Out of Alda, was also released in 1998. 
In motorsport rallying, a crew's due time is simply the time that a team is due at the next time control. If the crew arrive on or before their due time, they will incur no time penalty. In practice, because determining a winner depends on being able to sort finishers in order of accrued penalty points (those with the fewest wins), due times are usually set to be very difficult if not impossible to attain. 
Due times can be specified using ordinary time of day, or using special timing schemes such as targa timing. 
Lorenzo Justiniano Parra Garcia  (born August 19, 1978) is a Venezuelan Professional boxing who held the WBA flyweight title from 2003 to 2007. He has also challenged for the WBA Super bantamweight title in 2008 and the WBA bantamweight title in 2011. 
On December 6, 2003, Parra beat Eric Morel by a unanimous decision, for the WBA world championship title. Parra was stripped of his title in March 2007 after he failed to make weight for a bout with Takefumi Sakata, and went on to lose the fight anyway. As of 2018, Parra is still fighting and currently on a 13 fight Losing streak. 
There are several conservation areas that are home to the brown hyena, including the Etosha National Park in Namibia, the Central Kalahari Game Reserve in Botswana and the Kgalagadi Transfrontier Park. The maintenance of these protected areas aids in the conservation of these animals. Educational campaigns are being utilized to promote awareness about hyenas and dispel prevailing myths, while problem individuals are removed from farmlands and urbanized areas. 
After leaving the Navy, Fleming became an announcer at a radio station in Rocky Mount, North Carolina. Here, he first shortened his name to "Art Fleming". His radio career later took him to Akron, Ohio, and back home to New York. He was the first announcer to deliver the slogan "Winston tastes good, like a cigarette should" for Winston cigarettes. 
Fleming's acting career began at age four, when he appeared in a Broadway musical. His first television role was as a stunt double for Ralph Bellamy in the detective series Man Against Crime. In 1959 he starred as detective Ken Franklin in the ABC TV series International Detective, credited as Arthur Fleming. He also played attorney Jeremy Pitt in The Californians, an NBC Western set in San Francisco during the gold rush of the 1850s. 
Throughout his career, Fleming starred in about 5,000 episodes of television programs and 48 motion pictures. After Jeopardy!'s first cancellation in 1975, Fleming returned to acting. In 1977 he played the role of W. Averell Harriman in the movie MacArthur starring Gregory Peck, and appeared in the comedy film American Raspberry, and also appeared in episodes of Starsky and Hutch, Kingston: Confidential, and the 1976 TV miniseries The Moneychangers. 
Fleming also hosted a radio version of College Bowl for CBS Radio from 1979 to 1982. He hosted the NBC radio weekend magazine Monitor during 1972. Fleming reprised his role as host of Jeopardy! in the 1982 movie Airplane II: The Sequel and in "Weird Al" Yankovic's music video "I Lost on Jeopardy". Fleming was also often called upon to host mock versions of Jeopardy! at trade shows and conventions. 
From 1979 to until his retirement in 1992, Fleming hosted a daily radio talk show on KMOX in St. Louis. On Sunday evenings, he occasionally co-hosted Trivia Spectacular with David Strauss, a St. Louis schoolteacher. He also hosted the syndicated radio program When Radio Was, as well as two installments of the PBS science program NOVA as part of the National Science Test, where a studio audience tested their knowledge of science against a celebrity panel. 
Fleming died of pancreatic cancer at his home in Florida on April 25, 1995, six days before his 71st birthday. According to his obituary in the Los Angeles Times, he had been diagnosed with cancer two weeks before his death. He was cremated and his ashes were scattered at sea. 
This biographical article related to medicine in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Freedom 30 is an American sailboat, that was designed by Gary Mull and first built in 1986. The design is out of production. 
  The "Fab 40" (i.e. "Fabulous Forty") was a weekly playlist of popular records used by the British "pirate" radio station "Wonderful" Radio London (also known as "Big L") which broadcast off the Essex coast from 1964 to 1967. 
"Fab" (short for "fabulous") was a very fashionable adjective in the mid-1960s, associated with the Beatles, who were known as the "Fab Four", and much used by such trend-setters as Cathy McGowan, who presented the weekly rock music show Ready Steady Go! on independent television. 
When the BBC opened its own "pop" station Radio One in September 1967, its sales-based top 30 chart was known informally for a time as the "Fun 30", no doubt in imitation of London's "Fab 40". 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football forward, born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Valued in the garden as a summer-flowering shrub, the cultivar 'Sybille' has gained the Royal Horticultural Society's Award of Garden Merit. 
Government College for Girls, Hisar is a public funded college located in  Hisar in the Indian state of Haryana. 
The college offers BA, BCom and BSc undergraduate courses in arts, science, commerce and computers, exclusively for girls. 
Spectrotrota is a monotypic genus of moths in the family Pyralidae. Its sole species, Spectrotrota fimbrialis, is found in Australia. 
The genus formerly also included Spectrotrota normalis, which is now considered to belong to the genus Araeopaschia instead. 
The following is a list of Philippine television ratings for 2009 coming from AGB Nielsen Philippines (AGB) and Taylor Nelson Sofres (TNS). 
For AGB Nielsen, Mega Manila accounts for about 48% of total TV households in urban Philippines. The Mega Manila and Luzon markets combined account for about 67% of the total TV households in urban Philippines. Non-urban households aren't included in both Mega Manila and NUTAM surveys. For TNS, Mega Manila comprises about 56% of national households. 
Note that the National Urban Television Audience Measurement (NUTAM) does not represent the entire Philippines but only urban areas; NUTAM markets comprise 39% of the entire country. The Mega Manila market comprises 55% of the NUTAM market. 
Winger is the debut studio album by American rock band Winger. The album was released through Atlantic Records in 1988 and was produced by Beau Hill. 
The music was radio-friendly, but with a progressive twist. The lyrics, however, were typical of the age and genre. 
The name "Sahara" appears in the lower right hand section of the album cover. The band initially wanted to call themselves "Sahara", but that name was taken by another band at the time. Though they ultimately chose the name Winger, "Sahara" remained on the cover. 
A number of radio and video hits were extracted from the album, including "Headed for a Heartbreak" and "Seventeen", peaking at No. 19 and No. 26 at the Billboard's single chart. On February 11, 1989, the album peaked at number 21 on the Billboard 200, and after that stayed on the chart for 63 weeks. It achieved platinum status in the United States and went gold in Canada and Japan.[citation needed] 
In support of the album, Winger toured for over a year with bands like Bad Company, Scorpions, Cinderella, Bon Jovi, Poison, Skid Row and Tesla. 
Promotional videos were shot for the four singles "Madalaine", "Seventeen", "Headed for a Heartbreak" and "Hungry". 
Sonia Denoncourt (born June 25, 1964) is a retired soccer referee from Canada. She worked for FIFA as head of women's referee development, Director of Refereeing at Concacaf and currently work as the North America Academy Director at You Are The Ref International. 
Denoncourt began refereeing in 1978 at the age of just 14 and later decided to give up playing the game to further her career as a referee at the age of 22. Denoncourt became the first female FIFA accredited referee in 1994. She went on to referee the 1995, 1999 and 2003 FIFA Women's World Cups. 
Women's football was made its debut at the Summer Olympics in 1996 and Denoncourt was selected as one of four female referees that would officiate in the tournament and she refereed the first ever women's football match in the Olympics when she took charge of a match between Germany and Japan. She also officiated a semi-final match between Norway and United States and was the Fourth official in the final. 
Denoncourt was selected as one of the nine match officials that would participate in the 2000 Olympic football tournaments. She refereed two group matches, Australia vs. Sweden and Norway vs. China, and was picked to referee in the women's football final at the 2000 Olympics between Norway and United States. 
On 22 August 2011 Malyi scored a tying goal for Ukraine in the game against Thailand at the 2011 Summer Universiade in China. 
On 11 January 2017, Malyi signed a one-year loan deal with FC Tobol. After playing for FC Ordabasy during the 2019 season, Malyi returned to Astana in January 2020. On 2 July 2020, Astana announced that Malyi had left the club after the expiration of his contract. 
This biographical article related to a Ukrainian association football defender born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Kazakhstani association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2004 she collaborated with Laurie Anderson on the acclaimed O Zlozony/O Composite, a multi-media project for the Paris Opera Ballet with choreography by Trisha Brown, based on Czeslaw Milosz's poem "O Zlozony". The piece premiered at the Opera Garnier in Paris in December 2004. 
Agnieszka Wojtowicz-Vosloo's first feature film After.Life, a psychological horror thriller starring Liam Neeson, Christina Ricci and Justin Long, premiered at the AFI Film Festival in Los Angeles on 7 November 2009. Anchor Bay Entertainment, a division of Overture Films, acquired theatrical rights for the U.S. and the U.K., and released the film in theaters on 9 April 2010. The DVD and Blu-ray were released in the US on 3 August 2010. 
In a Wall Street Journal profile "Death Becomes Her" by Matthew Kaminski, Liam Neeson said Wojtowicz-Vosloo "reminds me a little of Kathryn Bigelow," the Oscar-winning director of The Hurt Locker. In July 2010 the filmmaker was featured in Elle magazine and on the cover of Gazeta Wyborcza, Polish newspaper. 
He was born in Rome and joined the Jesuit order. He was later assigned to Florence and Loreto, before returning to Rome. Among his writings were: 
which continued under the editors PC Caraffa and Filippo Briet. The work in 1761 was decreed to be prohibited by the inquisition. 
This biographical article about an Italian historian is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Holtorf traveled inexpensively, avoiding hotels and sleeping in the car, from which the rear seats were removed, or in hammocks pitched near it, supporting his trips by map making. His map of Jakarta, begun before his voyages in 1977 but updated during them, is the first detailed map of the city. As of 2001, it was 385 pages long. Holtorf has also extensively photographed his voyage. His car is displayed in the Mercedes museum in Stuttgart. 
Irish to the Core is the seventh album by Irish folk and rebel band The Wolfe Tones. The album features a number of political songs including Botany Bay and Rock on Rockall. 
As a schoolboy at Scotch College, Heywood excelled in multiple sports including tennis, in which he won the Victorian Schoolboys Doubles title in 1942, and football, where he captained the team into an undefeated year in 1942. Heywood made his VFL debut in the 1943 season and after sporadic appearances that year was a regular selection in 1944, playing 16 of a possible 18 games. He was used mostly as a half forward flanker. 
His football career was put on hold in 1945 with his service in the RAAF taking precedence. After being discharged from Darwin in 1946 he moved back to Melbourne where he undertook and completed a Commerce Degree. He won premierships in the Victorian Amateur Football Association with the University Blacks during his time at Melbourne University. 
Heywood played another full season in 1950, including a game against Hawthorn where he kicked six goals, and retired after ten senior appearances in 1951. 
As a sports commentator, Heywood called football games and appeared on panel shows on ABC TV as well as commentating on tennis matches at the same network. He also commented on Saturday football games for radio station 3AW.  He was a committeeman of the Melbourne Cricket Club and a promoter of its Gallery of Sport. 
An election to the Llandeilo Rural District Council was held in April 1925. It was preceded by the 1922 election and followed by the 1928 election. The successful candidates were also elected to the Llandeilo Board of Guardians. 
As in the past many candidates stood without party affiliations although an increased number of Labour candidates contested the industrial wards but the party lost ground following the party's defeat at a national level at the 1924 General Election. As in previous elections a number of the members representing rural wards were returned unopposed. 
All members of the District Council also served as members of Llandeilo Board of Guardians. In addition, three Guardians were elected to represent the Ammanford Urban District and another three to represent the Cwmamman Urban District, both of  which also lay within the remit of the Llandeilo Guardians. A further three Guardians were elected to represent the Llandeilo Urban District. 
Elected candidates at both Ammanford and Cwmamman stood specifically as Liberals, in contrast to the non-political nature of previous Guardians elections. 
The three sitting members, including Henry Herbert, a Guardian for nearly forty years, were re-elected. 
His mother was Mary (or Margaret) Hoare, daughter of Samuel Hoare (1716-1796), a London merchant from an Irish background, and Grizell Gurnell (1722? - 1802), of Ealing. The Hoares lived on what is now Stoke Newington Church Street, opposite Clissold Park. in 1824; and Samuel Jr, a banker and abolitionist. 
His father, Joseph Woods the elder, was an abolitionist. He and Samuel Hoare Jr were two of the four Quaker founders of the London Abolition Committee, the predecessor body to the Committee for the Abolition of the Slave Trade. 
Joseph Woods' early education was at home, where his parents taught him Latin, Greek, Modern Greek, Hebrew, Italian and French. Later (at about age 16) he studied architecture under Daniel Asher Alexander. 
Woods was responsible around 1790 for the design and building of Clissold House in Stoke Newington, for his uncle Jonathan Hoare. In 1806 he founded the London Architectural Society and became its first President. In 1816, immediately after the end of the Napoleonic Wars, he was able to travel throughout the Continent and visited France, Switzerland, and Italy, studying their architecture and botany. Drawing on part of this experience, his book Letters of an Architect was published in 1828. 
This biographical article related to a Pakistani cricket person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Arsham Parsi left the organization and founded a new organization called the Iranian Railroad for Queer Refugees. 
While living in Iran in 2001, Parsi founded an internet group that later became known as the Persian Gay and Lesbian Organization. The organization produces a monthly email newsletter called Cheraq (light) and has 6000 members in Iran. 
IRQO provided an avenue for homosexuals in Iran to communicate with like minded activists around the world. Following the Iranian election protests in 2009, IRQO distributed an open letter from university students in Iran deploring the state of gay rights in the country. The organization also published a letter from gay Iranian Mehdi Kazemi after his boyfriend was executed and he was at risk for deportation to Iran. 
In 2008, IRQO was one of the two winners of the International Gay and Lesbian Human Rights Commission's (IGLHRC) Felipa de Souza Award and Arsham Parsi received that award at the New York's ceremony. 
Coal is an unincorporated community and coal town in Kanawha County, West Virginia, United States, along Cabin Creek. It was also known as Cofoco. 
This article about a location in Kanawha County, West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Former Associate Editor Journal of Operations Research; IIE Transactions; International Abstracts of Operations Research.  
His present editorial positions include the Editor-In-Chief of OMEGA - The International Journal of Management Science and the Co-Editor-In-Chief of International Journal of Management Science and Engineering Management. 
The maiden voyage of Mexicano was made from Havanna to Ferrol with a light armament  of 80 guns under Captain Miguel Felix Goycoechea, who reported that the ship sailed smoothly and with endurance. 
This biographical article relating to Estonian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Fowey Gallants or the Gallants of Fowey, was group of privateers and pirates who operated out of the port of Fowey, in Cornwall, during the Hundred Years' War in the 14th and 15th centuries. 
Roseland Park is a now defunct amusement park previously located at 169 Lake Shore Drive in the city of Canandaigua, New York, along the north shore of Canandaigua Lake.  Roseland started operation in 1925 under its founder and original owner, William Muar.  It continued to operate for 60 years until its closure on Labor Day September 2, 1985. 
The following is a partial list of attractions Roseland had at various points throughout its history. 
A housing development now sits on the property where Roseland Park once was.  Though the park has long since shut down, its name still exists today in the form of Roseland Waterpark, which is also located in Canandaigua. 
Karina Olkhovik (born 17 June 2000) is a Belarusian footballer who plays as a forward for Premier League club FC Dinamo Minsk and the Belarus women's national team. 
Olkhovik has been capped for the Belarus national team, appearing for the team during the 2019 FIFA Women's World Cup qualifying cycle. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Belarus is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Interest in tiramisu in the United States increased in 1993 when Tom Hanks' protagonist in the comedy Sleepless in Seattle heard of it only as a mysterious thing that modern women loved. 
Prosoplus grisescens is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1938. 
Villars-le-Grand is a former municipality in the district of Broye-Vully in the canton of Vaud in Switzerland. 
The municipalities of Bellerive, Chabrey, Constantine, Montmagny, Mur, Vallamand and Villars-le-Grand merged on 1 July 2011 into the new municipality of Vully-les-Lacs. 
Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 2.9% and transportation infrastructure made up 5.2%.  Out of the forested land, 1.7% of the total land area is heavily forested and 1.4% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 77.4% is used for growing crops and 7.9% is pastures, while 2.4% is used for orchards or vine crops.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water. 
The municipality was part of the Avenches District until it was dissolved on 31 August 2006, and Villars-le-Grand became part of the new district of Broye-Vully. 
Most of the population (as of 2000[update]) speaks French (262 or 90.3%), with German being second most common (24 or 8.3%) and Portuguese being third (2 or 0.7%).  There is 1 person who speaks Italian. 
Of the population in the municipality 134 or about 46.2% were born in Villars-le-Grand and lived there in 2000.  There were 55 or 19.0% who were born in the same canton, while 72 or 24.8% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 16 or 5.5% were born outside of Switzerland. 
In 2008[update] there were 2 live births to Swiss citizens and 2 births to non-Swiss citizens.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens increased by 2 while the foreign population increased by 2.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was a decrease of 10 and the non-Swiss population increased by 2 people.  This represents a population growth rate of -2.8%. 
As of 2000[update], there were 115 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 154 married individuals, 12 widows or widowers and 9 individuals who are divorced. 
In the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SVP which received 39.93% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (24.39%), the SP (15.18%) and the CVP (5.26%).  In the federal election, a total of 96 votes were cast, and the voter turnout was 43.4%. 
In 2008[update] the total number of full-time equivalent jobs was 42.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 38, all of which were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 1, in manufacturing.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 3, all in education. 
In 2000[update], there were 9 workers who commuted into the municipality and 100 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 11.1 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.  Of the working population, 5.3% used public transportation to get to work, and 60% used a private car. 
From the 2000 census[update], 78 or 26.9% were Roman Catholic, while 174 or 60.0% belonged to the Swiss Reformed Church.  There were 3 (or about 1.03% of the population) who were Islamic.  23 (or about 7.93% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 12 individuals (or about 4.14% of the population) did not answer the question. 
In Villars-le-Grand about 98 or (33.8%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 23 or (7.9%) have completed additional higher education (either University or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 23 who completed tertiary schooling, 69.6% were Swiss men, 21.7% were Swiss women. 
As of 2000[update], there were 18 students in Villars-le-Grand who came from another municipality, while 29 residents attended schools outside the municipality. 
Edith Seamon was raised in South Orange, New Jersey. Her brother, Billy Seamon, and sister, Anne Burnstein, also became leading bridge players. 
Jazz is Dead is an instrumental Grateful Dead cover band that interprets classic Dead songs with jazz influences. The group is notable in featuring veterans of jazz and jazz fusion ensembles. The group's composition has changed over time, and T Lavitz was the band's only constant member until they reformed in 2015 (five years after Lavitz's death). 
In March 2006 the band set out for a month-long tour featuring the music of Blues for Allah to coincide with its 30th anniversary. 
In 1999 Billy Cobham was replaced by Dixie Dregs and Winger drummer Rod Morgenstein and Phil Lesh and Friends drummer Jeff Sipe. 
In 2001, guitarist Jeff Pevar (Ray Charles, Joe Cocker, Crosby Stills & Nash) replaced Jimmy Herring. Little Feat's Kenny Gradney also played bass with the group at some shows. 
The group went through a few more line-up changes (mostly bassists and drummers) over the years including the addition of Dave Livolsi on bass in 2002 and the reinstated dual-drummer line-up of Sipe and Morgenstein in 2006. 
In celebration of the 50th Anniversary of The Grateful Dead, Jazz Is Dead reformed for several shows in August and September 2015.  The lineup will include Alphonso Johnson on bass, Jeff Pevar on guitar, drummer Rod Morgenstein, keyboardist Chris Smith and one-time Grateful Dead pianist Tom Constanten. 
In 2012 the group released the latest JID CD "Grateful Jazz", produced and arranged by Pevar, featuring T Lavitz, Jeff Pevar, Rod Morgenstein, David Livolsi and special guests, Alphonso Johnson, Luis Conte, Bill Evans, Jerry Goodman, Bill Holloman and Howard Levy. This CD serves as a swan song to the late T Lavitz. More info at http://pevar.com/music/jazzisdead-gratefuljazz/ 
He became 1,220th Knight of the Order of the Golden Fleece in 1921. After the war, he retired from public life. He headed the Order of St. George until it was dissolved by Nazi Germany. 
Of the total of the 700 Indians captured, for their use as slaves, upon arrival in Cartago the number was 500, while 200 died on the road or escaped. Nine years after his capture, the governor of Costa Rica reported that of these 500, 300 had died from smallpox and measles. 
On July 1, 1710, Presbere was sentenced to death by garrote, since Costa Rica had no executioner to apply the cruel death typical of the colonial era called "garrote vil", which consisted of the prisoner being seated in a chair to apply a tourniquet on the neck to which it was slowly turned. 
On Wednesday, March 19, 1997, the Legislative Assembly of Costa Rica declared Pablo Presbere defender of the freedom of indigenous peoples. Pablo Presbere was declared benefactor of the country in the area of defenders of freedom. 
The protagonists of the film are the Emperor Guangxu (who is presented as benevolent and wise, but constrained by the filial piety he owes the Empress Dowager) and Imperial Concubine Zhen (who bravely encourages him to resist the Empress Dowager). 
In the first scene, Guangxu (Shu Shi) is invited to choose his wife from among the ladies at court. However, when he tries to choose the woman he loves, Cixi (Tang Ruojing) browbeats him into choosing someone else. The woman he loves is relegated to being a concubine, Imperial Concubine Zhen (Zhou Yun). 
This is the year when the Boxers, in the name of defending the Qing dynasty, murdered large numbers of foreigners and Chinese Christians and besieged the Foreign Legation Quarter in Beijing. 
Sorrows of the Forbidden City was released on DVD by Guangzhou Beauty Culture Communication Co., Ltd., in 2006. 
Tomoxia carinata is a species of beetle in the genus Tomoxia of the family Mordellidae. It was described by Smith in 1883. 
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a forward born in the 1930s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He later worked as a guide at the zoo and in 1933 he was successful in becoming a student of biology, studying the reproduction of the red squirrel. He was influenced by the biologist Aleksandr Formozov.  
He then travelled through the steppe to Gasan-Kuli on the Caspian coast and found work in the eponymous nature reserve in Turkmenistan. Here he studied water birds. In 1940 he married zoologist Olga Nikolayevna Sassonova. 
In 1941 the draft board referred him to a medical station in Siberia's Tomsk to fight tularemia. He contracted tuberculosis and became seriously ill during this period but recovered. He also continued studies through correspondence courses at Moscow State University and completed his examination in 1944.  
Prior to the 2018 Contest, Ireland had participated in the Junior Eurovision Song Contest three times since its debut in 2015. TG4 previously attempted to participate at the Junior Eurovision Song Contest 2014, but required funding from the Broadcasting Authority of Ireland (BAI), which was rejected. 
The first semi final was broadcast on 14 October 2018, in which Ryan O'Shaughnessy was the guest judge and the opening act. 
Saibh Skelly and Jessica Doolan both advanced to the final duel stage and performed their songs for the second time. After their second performances, the jury members selected Jessica Doolan as the winner of this semi-final and she advanced to the grand final on 11 November. 
The second semi final was broadcast on 21 October 2018, in which Linda Martin was the guest judge and Aimee Banks was the opening act. 
Sarah Kenny and Kerry Ann Mc Creery advanced to the final duel stage and performed their songs for the second time. After their second performances, the jury members selected Kerry Ann McCreery as the winner of this semi-final, making her advance to the grand final on 11 November. 
The third semi-final was broadcast on 28 October 2018, in which Brian Kennedy was the guest judge and Zena Donnelly was the opening act. 
Anna and Ava and Cora Harkin advanced to the final duel stage and performed their songs for the second time. After their second performances, the jury members selected Cora Harkin as the winner of this semi-final, making her advance to the grand final on 11 November. 
The fourth semi-final was broadcast on 4 November, in which Dustin the Turkey was the guest judge and Muireann McDonnell was the opening act. 
Taylor Hynes and Shaniah Llane Rollo advanced to the final duel of the show. After performing for a second time, the judges decided that Shaniah would advance to the final. 
Taylor Hynes (born 7 February  2004) is an Irish child singer. He represented Ireland in the Junior Eurovision Song Contest 2018 with the song "IOU". He previously entered Junior Eurovision Eire in 2016, where he failed to make the final. He returned to the selection in 2018 and came second in his heat, however a day after his heat was broadcast, he was leaked by Belarusian TV as Ireland's Junior Eurovision entrant. He was born in Dublin, but currently lives in Clonee. 
IOU is a song by Irish child singer Taylor Hynes. It represented Ireland at the Junior Eurovision Song Contest 2018. The music video clip features Hynes alongside Eurovision winner Niamh Kavanagh and 2018 Irish entrant Ryan O'Shaughnessy. 
During the opening ceremony and the running order draw which both took place on 19 November 2018, Ireland was drawn to perform ninth on 25 November 2018, following Belarus and preceding Serbia. 
Two Blondes is a short story from Charlaine Harris's series The Southern Vampire Mysteries, released on August 3, 2010. This short story is featured in Death's Excellent Vacation 
This article about a fantasy short story (or stories) published in the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a horror short story (or stories) published in the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dairy Farm Nature Park is a 63-hectare nature park located at 100 Dairy Farm Road, Upper Bukit Timah in Singapore. 
Formerly a cowshed, the building that is currently the Wallace Education Centre was restored and now houses the Wallace Environmental Learning Lab (WELL), as well as an interpretative centre where visitors can learn about the changing landscapes of Dairy Farm and Bukit Timah Nature Reserve through various exhibits. 
Established by NParks and Raffles Girls' Secondary School, WELL is a holistic programme where primary and secondary school students will be able to discover more about Singapore's natural heritage through engaging hands-on activities. 
With materials developed by Raffles Girls' Secondary School, teachers trained in WELL will be able to self-conduct various educational programmes, ranging from half-day workshops to overnight learning camps. This is the first time that such programmes are offered in parks. WELL will enable students to explore the trails of Dairy Farm, and conduct research such as water, soil, rock and insect studies, and carry out data analysis at the Lab. 
The Wallace Education Centre, WELL, and the Wallace Trail have all been named after Alfred Wallace, in honour of his contributions to natural science. A contemporary of Charles Darwin, Wallace is the other "father" behind the Theory of Evolution. Wallace had stopped over in Singapore in 1854 during his journeys to the Malay Archipelago, and collected many species of beetles in the vicinity of the Dairy Farm site. 
At the south-western end of the park lies the Singapore Quarry, which now offers visitors a tranquil setting with a scenic view. In such a short time, the transformation of the site into a wetland has attracted many fauna, including the little grebe - a critically endangered bird that was known to be found only in Lorong Halus, as well as many species of dragonflies - many of which are rare. 
The flora consists of predominantly fruit trees which include: durian, rambutan, jackfruit and mango trees along with exotic plant species, such as heliconias, dumbcane and colourful climbers. The fauna consists of butterflies, dragonflies, birds, insects, and mammals. If looking in the right area, one may be able to find monkeys, flying lemurs, pangolins and bats. 
"Good as I Was to You" is a song written by Billy Livsey and Don Schlitz, and recorded by American country music artist Lorrie Morgan.  It was released in January 1997 as the third and final single from her album Greater Need.  The song reached #4 on the Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks chart in May 1997. 
The song depicts a woman who, after learning her significant other (either her husband or boyfriend; no distinction is made in the song), confronts him in a restaurant, where he is dining with another woman. The woman angrily tells him all the good things she's done for him and expresses disgust and disappointment that he would respond by cheating on her. She then tells the other woman that she can have him and that she (the protagonist) no longer wants anything to do with her now ex. 
Swallowtail butterflies are large, colorful butterflies in the family Papilionidae, and include over 550 species. Though the majority are tropical, members of the family inhabit every continent except Antarctica. The family includes the largest butterflies in the world, the birdwing butterflies of the genus Ornithoptera. 
Swallowtails have a number of distinctive features; for example, the papilionid caterpillar bears a repugnatorial organ called the osmeterium on its prothorax. The osmeterium normally remains hidden, but when threatened, the larva turns it outward through a transverse dorsal groove by inflating it with fluid. 
The genera of extant swallowtails are usually classified into three subfamilies, Baroniinae, Parnassiinae, and Papilioninae, the latter two being further divided into tribes. In swallowtails, besides morphological characteristics, the choice of food plants and ecological lifestyle reflect phylogeny and classification. 
The Baroniinae are a monotypic subfamily, restricted to a very small region in Mexico and are considered to be the most basal of the subfamilies. Baronia brevicornis is considered to be a relict species, and shares features with a fossil taxon Praepapilio. Baronia is unique among papilionids as having an Acacia species (family Leguminosae) as its food plant. 
The Parnassiinae are a subfamily of essentially Holarctic butterflies. The vast majority of species, mostly Parnassius, can be found in mountain habitats. Parnassiinines can also be found in other habitats such as "arid deserts (Hypermnestra), humid forests (Luehdorfia) and even lowland meadows (Zerynthia)". The tribes recognized in the Parnassiinae are Parnassiini, Zerynthiini, and Luehdorfiini. 
The tribes recognized in the Papilioninae are Leptocircini, Teinopalpini, Troidini, and Papilionini. 
An additional subfamily, Praepapilioninae, consisting of a single genus Praepapilio, includes two species of extinct butterflies, each member being described from single fossils found in a middle Eocene deposit in Colorado, United States (Durden and Rose, 1978). 
For example, the eastern black swallowtail's main host plant in the wild is Queen Anne's lace, but they also eat garden plants in the carrot family, including carrots, parsley, dill, and fennel. 
Egg. "Dome-shaped, smooth or obscurely facetted, not as high as wide, somewhat leathery, opaque." (Doherty.) 
Larva. Stout, smooth or with a series of fleshy tubercles on the dorsum: sometimes with a raised fleshy protuberance (the so-called hood or crest) on the fourth segment. The second segment has a transverse opening, out of which the larva protrudes at will and an erect, forked, glandular fleshy organ that emits a strong, penetrating, and somewhat unpleasant odor. 
Pupa. Variable in form but most often curved backwards. It is angulate, with the head truncate or rounded and the back of abdomen is smooth or tuberculate. It is attached by the tail, normally in a perpendicular position, and further secured by a silken girth round the middle. In Parnassius, the pupa is placed in a loose silken web between leaves. 
Adult forewing of Graphium agetes. Second anal vein, 2A, extends up to the wing margin and does not link with the first anal vein, 1A. 
Papilionid chrysalis are typically attached to a substrate by the cremaster and with head up held by a silk girdle. 
Swallowtail butterflies practice Batesian mimicry, a behavior in which the butterflies' appearance closely resemble that of distasteful species that prevents predation. Swallowtails differ from many animals that practice mimicry. The tiger swallowtail butterfly (Papilio glaucus), exhibits a female-limited polymorphism for Batesian mimicry and others, such as the Canadian tiger swallowtail (Papilio canadensis) do not display any form of mimicry. 
Predators include the red-winged blackbird, Pennsylvania firefly, five-lined skink, green darner, goldenrod spider, Chinese mantis, fiery searcher, and striped skunk. 
After mating, the male Parnassines produce a glue like substance that is used to seal the female genital opening and prevent other males from mating. They lay individual eggs on the underside of the leaves of their food plants. There is no parental investment once the eggs have been laid. 
The pupae are typically attached to the substrate by the cremaster but with head up held by a silk girdle. The Apollos, however, pupate in debris on the ground and also build a loose cocoon. In the temperate regions, the winters are passed in a pupal diapause stage. 
Since swallowtail butterflies are large, colorful, and attractive, they have been targeted by butterfly collectors. The largest of these, the birdwing butterflies are particularly sought after and are cultured in butterfly farms to supply collectors. 
Many members of the family, as larvae, feed on plants of the citrus family, Rutaceae. Making some of these attractive butterflies pests in citrus orchards. 
The Oregon swallowtail is the state insect of Oregon. The eastern tiger swallowtail is the state insect of Virginia and the state butterfly of Georgia, Delaware, and South Carolina. The black swallowtail is the state butterfly of Oklahoma. 
The following list includes all 81 waterfalls in Colorado that have official names according to the United States Geological Survey. There are also numerous unnamed waterfalls in the state. 
The district was established in 1993 by merging the former districts (Kreise) of Finsterwalde, Bad Liebenwerda and Herzberg. 
The district is named after two rivers - the Elbe river forms the western border with Saxony, the Black Elster (Schwarze Elster) is a tributary of the Elbe and runs through the district. The district is part of the Lusatia region. The fens along the Black Elster are a habitat of several rare animals, like common kingfishers, beavers and Eurasian otters. 
Development of Population since 1875 within the Current Boundaries (Blue Line: Population; Dotted Line: Comparison to Population Development of Brandenburg state) 
Recent Population Development and Projections (Population Development before Census 2011 (blue line); Recent Population Development according to the Census in Germany in 2011 (blue bordered line); Official projections for 2005-2030 (yellow line); for 2014-2030 (red line); for 2017-2030 (scarlet line) 
The coat of arms was granted in 1995. The lion in the bottom left derives from the county of Meissen (see Saxony), to which the southern area of the district belonged historically. The black bars derive from the Saxony-Wittenberg county as the area around Bad Liebenwerda belonged there in the past. The red bars derive from the oldest coat of arms of Brandenburg, and the bull is the symbol for the Lower Lusatia area were the district is located. 
Born in 1963, the daughter of playwright Charles L. Mee, Mee grew up in New York City. She earned her bachelor's degree from Harvard University in 1985, and went on to earn an MA and a Ph.D. from New York University's Department of Performance Studies, where she worked with Richard Schechner. She currently teaches Dramatic Literature at New York University. 
In 1988, Mee directed the world premiere of Charles Mee's The Imperialists at the Club Cave Canem at HOME for Contemporary Theatre and Art, which received reviews from the Village Voice and The New York Times, and was picked up by Joseph Papp for a run at The Public Theatre. In 2000, Mee staged another production of The Imperialists at the Club Cave Canem at The Market Theatre in Cambridge, Massachusetts. 
She directed two productions in Malayalam with Sopanam, located in Kerala, South India: Faust (1993) and Arambachekkan (1996), both by Kavalam Narayana Panikkar. She directed Kavalam Narayana Panikkar's play Ottayan at The Ontological at St. Mark's Theatre in 1992, and Girish Karnad's Hayavadana at The Ontological at St. Mark's Theatre in 1993. 
In 2001, Mee staged the world premiere of First Love with Ruth Maleczech and Fred Neumann of Mabou Mines, at New York Theatre Workshop. She staged a second production in 2002 at The Magic Theatre in San Francisco with Joan Mankin and Robert Parnell. 
The New York Times included Ferry Play in their list of top ten NY Fringe shows for 2015, and The Wall Street Journal noted that Ferry Play turns the Staten Island Ferry into an immersive theatre experience. 
In Pool Play, audiences sat at the edge of the pool with their feet in the water for an exploration of America's relationship with the swimming pool that included synchronized swimming, an boatman, musical numbers, and a fish along with stories about segregated pools, and a meditation on pollution. Sarah Lucie of Show Business Weekly described it as being "well executed" and with a "strong ensemble." Theatre is Easy also reviewed the show. 
Versailles 2015 is a site-specific play for a New York City apartment. The piece was reviewed by the New York Theatre Review, who said that the show was "over far too quickly." 
This biographical article related to association football in Saudi Arabia, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John G. Fleagle is an American anthropologist, primatologist, and Distinguished Professor at State University of New York, Stony Brook. 
He graduated from Yale University cum laude in 1971, and from Harvard University with a M.S. in Anthropology in 1973, and from Harvard University, with a Ph.D. in Biological Anthropology in 1976. 
In 1931, oil was discovered on the ranch, commencing development of the San Miguelito Oil Field. This field became one of the most prolific oil fields in the region. 
Ludmila Feodorovna Saunina (born 1952 in Yekaterinburg) is a Russian chess player, and a woman grandmaster. 
She has won several women's chess championships: the Russian Chess Championship in 1972, the Moldovan Chess Championship in 1976, the World Senior Chess Championship and the European Senior Chess Championship. 
This biographical article relating to a Russian chess figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In postcolonial theory, the term subaltern describes the lower social classes and the Other social groups displaced to the margins of a society; in an imperial colony, a subaltern is a native man or woman without human agency, as defined by his and her social status. Nonetheless, the feminist scholar Gayatri Chakravorty Spivak cautioned against an over-broad application of the term the subaltern, because the word: 
[There is] no need to hear your [native] voice, when I can talk about you better than you can speak about yourself. No need to hear your voice. Only tell me about your pain. I want to know your story. And then I will tell it back to you in a new way. Tell it back to you in such a way that it has become mine, my own. Re-writing you, I write myself anew. I am still author, authority. I am still [the] colonizer, the speaking subject, and you are now at the center of my talk.
As a means of constructing a great history of society, the story of the subaltern native is a revealing examination of the experience of colonialism from the perspective of the subaltern man and the subaltern woman, the most powerless people living within the socio-economic confines of imperialism; therefore, the academic investigator of post-colonialism must not assume cultural superiority when studying the voices of the subaltern natives. 
Flag Off or  'Flagged Off  means official start or beginning of an event or undertaking. In this a piece of cloth, usually rectangular in size, and of distinctive color and design, is used as a symbol, standard, signal, or emblem and waved. 
The network of channels are available in 54 countries, in 20 different languages, providing viewers with European and international sporting events. 
On 1 March 1993, the cable and satellite channel Screensport merged with Eurosport; five days later, that channel's transponder space was taken over by RTL II. Eurosport eventually came under a French consortium comprising the TF1 Group, Canal+ Group and Havas Images. In January 2001, TF1 took full ownership of Eurosport. 
In May 2007, Yahoo! Europe and Eurosport formed a co-branded website which Eurosport used as its web portal, including an online TV guide, in the UK, Ireland, Spain, Italy and Germany. 
In 2008, Eurosport launched an online subscription service, Eurosport Player, that allows Internet users to watch both Eurosport and Eurosport 2 live, plus additional coverage not available via broadcast. During the 2009 Australian Open, the Internet player offered coverage from five courts. 
Eurosport, having been one of the first channels to broadcast on the Astra 1 group of satellites, was the last satellite channel in Europe to broadcast in an analogue format. On 30 April 2012, shortly after 03:00 CET, the rest of the remaining analogue channels at 19.2 East ceased transmission. Eurosport's analogue channel finally ceased transmission on 1 May 2012 at 01:30 CET, marking the end of an era in European satellite broadcasting. 
On 13 November 2015, Eurosport introduced its new brand identity and changed the name of its main channel to Eurosport 1. 
In February 2017, Discovery launched the channel in India, branded as DSport which was later renamed to Eurosport in 2020. The channel was made available on various platforms in both SD and HD feeds. 
In addition, Eurosport programming was added to Discovery streaming services Dplay and later Discovery+. 
This is the main channel of Eurosport. A high-definition simulcast version of Eurosport launched on 25 May 2008. The first event covered in HD was the 2008 French Open at Roland Garros. On 13 November 2015 it changed its name to Eurosport 1 HD. 
Eurosport 1 is currently broadcast in twenty-one languages: English, French, German, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese, Dutch, Swedish, Norwegian, Danish, Finnish, Icelandic, Russian, Polish, Czech, Hungarian, Romanian, Bulgarian, Serbian, Greek, Turkish, Cantonese and Croatian. 
In Asia-Pacific territories, Eurosport offers a specific channel to this region. Eurosport (Asia-Pacific) launched on 15 November 2009. The service is available in Australia through Foxtel, Optus and TransACT. On 3 November 2014, a HD simulcast launched on Foxtel. 
A supplementary channel featuring more live sports events, programming and news updates. Eurosport 2 launched on 10 January 2005 and is currently available in 35 countries, broadcasting in 17 different languages[a]. 
Eurosport 2 HD Xtra is a German pay-TV channel launched in 2017. Eurosport bought Germany-only rights for Bundesliga, Supermoto and other broadcasting rights. Eurosport 2 has no German-only signal and Eurosport 1 is free-to-air, so the new Channel was needed. 
On 21 July 2021, Eurosport 3 HD, Eurosport 4 HD, Eurosport 5 HD, Eurosport 6 HD, Eurosport 7 HD, Eurosport 8 HD and Eurosport 9 HD launched in the UK and Ireland for the 2020 Summer Olympics in Tokyo. 
As of 21 July 2021, on-screen graphics and text are being shown on the respective channel. The text says "The best of [sport] during the Olympic Games Tokyo 2020 starts Saturday 24th at [time]".  
In the UK, British Eurosport launched in 1999, replacing Eurosport International on most platforms with some schedule variations and local commentary. The launch of British Eurosport and creation of programming specifically for the UK was initially funded by Premium TV, which did not have a stake in the sports channel, but received a share of the revenue. British Eurosport had live studio presentations of major sporting events and tournaments. 
On British Eurosport James Richardson previously hosted the coverage of Serie A football on the Channel from 2002 to 2005 and 2004 UEFA European Football Championship with regular guests including Alan Curbishley, DJ Spoony, former Chelsea FC players Paul Elliott, Ed de Goey, Ray Wilkins, Roberto Di Matteo & former Chelsea goalkeeper Carlo Cudicini now at LA Galaxy, former England International Luther Blissett and European football journalists Gabriele Marcotti and Xavier Rivoire. 
Will Vanders is known for his spirited coverage of K-1 events, and greets the viewer in Japanese, Korean, Chinese, and Thai to introduce the martial arts show, Fight Club, on Monday nights. 
For tennis, studio presentation for the Australian Open, French Open, U.S. Open and WTA Tour Championships on British Eurosport is hosted by Annabel Croft with the segment Hawk-Eye presented by former British number 2 Jason Goodall. (Goodall was briefly ranked ahead of Chris Bailey, Nick Brown, Andrew Castle, Nick Fulwood, Mark Petchey, and James Turner, in May 1989). 
British Eurosport covers the snooker season including ranking events not broadcast by BBC Television including the Shanghai Masters and China Open. Neal Foulds and former world champion Joe Johnson are among the commentators. 
British Eurosport has also three figure skating commentators: former Winter Olympic Games competitors Chris Howarth & Nicky Slater, and veteran commentator Simon Reed - brother of actor Oliver Reed. 
On 10 February 2009, British Eurosport started to broadcast most of its programming in the 16:9 'widescreen' ratio. After the collapse of Setanta Sports, rights for the 2009 season in the USPGA Golf tour reverted to British Eurosport. 
In April 2010, Eurosport 3D launched but was only broadcast during a select number of events, such as the French Open and 2012 Summer Olympics. 
Eurosport DK was a Danish television channel owned by Discovery Networks Northern Europe. The channel replaced Canal 8 Sport and Eurosport 2 in Denmark on 1 July 2015. 
On 28 May 2015, Discovery Networks Northern Europe announced that they would merge Canal 8 Sport and Eurosport 2 into Eurosport DK in Denmark, broadcasting football from Danish Superliga, the Bundesliga, Major League Soccer, Capital One Cup, UEFA Euro 2016 qualifying, Tennis from ATP Tour, WTA Tour and 3 Grand Slams, Cycling from UCI World Tour, Winter sport, Motorsports. 
Eurosport 3, Eurosport 4 and Eurosport 5 (and their HD equivalents) were additional channels created for the 2018 Winter Olympics broadcasting Olympic Broadcasting Services live and highlights streams for the duration of the Olympic Winter Games.[dead link] 
A sports news channel on air from 1 September 2000 to 4 January 2018, featuring live scores, highlights, breaking news and commentary. The service combined video, text and graphics with the screen divided into 4 parts: a video section displaying highlights and news bulletins, a breaking news ticker at the bottom and a scoring section for in-depth analysis of results and game stats. 
In 2016 Eurosport bought the rights for Formula One for Portugal and created a pay-tv channel for the occasion. It ended on the next year, after one season and the F1 went back to SportTV. The channel had more Motorsport competitions, such as Formula E, WTCC, Dakar Rally, and more. 
Eurosport Australia was a short-lived sports television channel available from February 2020 until 7 December 2020. It was available on Fetch TV until the contract between Eurosport and Fetch TV ended. 
Being an international channel, Eurosport's performance differs significantly between different countries. The figures below show Eurosport 1's share of overall viewing in some countries. 
Eurosport provides viewers with European and international sporting events. It broadcasts different sporting events in each region. This includes several football competitions: 
In June 2015 it was announced that Eurosport had secured the pan-European rights (except Russia) to the winter and summer Olympic Games between 2018 and 2024. 
In July 2017 Eurosport had secured the domestic and international rights from 2017 to 2020 of the Italian Lega Basket Serie A (LBA). Eurosport is the new owner of the pay TV, international and internet rights. Eurosport has TV rights also for Italian Basketball Supercup and Italian Basketball Cup. 
In October 2018, Eurosport has reached an agreement with the World Boxing Super Series for the exclusive acquisition of the Competition's broadcast rights in Spain 
In October 2018, Eurosport sealed a 3-year deal to show British Darts Organisation major events BDO World Darts Championship, World Masters (darts) & World Trophy 
In January 2019 it was announced that Eurosport will screen 39 ATP tennis tournaments including the tour finals in Russia for 3 years. 
Eurosport Events (formerly known as 'KSO Kigema Sports Organisation Ltd') is the Eurosport group's sporting events management/promotion/production division, which promotes the FIA World Touring Car Cup (WTCR) and the FIA European Rally Championship. 
Eurosport Events was also the promoter of the Intercontinental Rally Challenge, a rival rallying series to the World Rally Championship, and of the FIA European Touring Car Cup. The IRC ceased at the end of the 2012 season, with Eurosport taking over series promotion of the ERC from 2013. The European Touring Car Cup has been active until 2017. 
Eurosport airs MotoGP and Superbike World Championship in various territories including the Netherlands, Belgium, Romania, France and Germany, 
On 29 September 2015, Eurosport acquired the Portuguese broadcasting rights for Formula One between 2016 and 2018. 
On 30 September Eurosport and FIM announced that they had signed a contract regarding partnership for FIM's international speedway championships where Eurosport will be the promotor for 10 years. They also announced a deal to show SGB Premiership matches live throughout the season. 
Region-specific events are noted in the table below with a flag indicating the country it is broadcast in. If no flag is present, the broadcast is multi territory. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball pitcher born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Yamaguchi Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pacifica: Australasian Theological Studies was a peer-reviewed academic journal that covered the field of theology. It was sponsored and later owned by the University of Divinity (formerly the Melbourne College of Divinity), which engaged Sage Publications as the journal's publisher from 2013. Pacifica was established in 1988 and ceased publication in 2017. 
The journal was abstracted and indexed in Academic Search Elite, ATLA Religion Database, New Testament Abstracts, Old Testament Abstracts, and Current Contents. 
The Biozentrum of the University of Basel specializes in basic molecular and biomedical research and teaching. Research includes the areas of cell growth and development, infection biology, neurobiology, structural biology and biophysics, and computational and systems biology. With more than 550 employees, the Biozentrum is the largest department at the University of Basel's Faculty of Science. It is home to 30 research groups with scientists from 45 nations. 
In 1971, at the time when the Biozentrum was founded, the concept of developing an interdisciplinary biological research facility was unique in Europe. Scientists from academy and industry as well as representatives of the Canton of Basel-Stadt promoted the Biozentrum's development. 
In 2021, the Biozentrum will move into a 73m high research tower which is being financed by the Cantons of Basel-Stadt and Basel-Landschaft. The new building will provide a modern infrastructure that meets the needs of modern-day research as well as enough room for 550 researchers and 800 students. The Biozentrum is headed by its director Alexander F. Schier. 
Research at the Biozentrum embraces a wide range of topics, however one main focus all the research groups share is a strong interest to understand the molecular organization of living organisms. 
The major areas of research are concerned with the structure and function of macromolecules, the wiring of regulatory circuits, and the general principles underlying complex biological systems and their dynamic interactions. 
Currently, the research groups of the Biozentrum are grouped into five major areas of investigation: Growth & Development, Infection Biology, Neurobiology, Structural Biology & Biophysics and Computational & Systems Biology. 
The courses of studies in molecular biology at the Biozentrum are characterized by the early exposure of the students to current research, the offer of all research areas and methods relevant to molecular biology, a modern technical infrastructure and the practical-work-oriented supervision. 
The bachelor's degree program in "Computational Sciences" leading to a Major in Computational Biology also starts with one year of basic studies in mathematics, physics and chemistry and courses in computer science. In the second year mathematics and computer science are combined with the basic principles of molecular biology. Two six-week block courses with theoretical and experimental content as well as two research projects are part of the program of the third academic year. 
The prerequisite for admission to the master's degree in Molecular Biology is a "Bachelor of Science in Biology" with a "Major in Molecular Biology", in some cases a "Major in Integrative Biology", or a "Bachelor of Science in Computational Sciences" with a "Major in Computational Biology". In general, the program takes three semesters to complete. Students concentrate principally on an own research project. They work at least ten months in the laboratory. 
The PhD program builds on a university degree in biology or related discipline and requires the student to engage in an independent research project within a period of three to four years. The program is completed by writing a thesis. The students also receive practical training in the latest methods and techniques of molecular biology research and attend courses of the Graduate Teaching Program. 
To expand their knowledge and experience, young researchers often spend a few years in research groups abroad. Accordingly, postdoctoral researchers from all continents are working at the Biozentrum. 
Since 1973 the Biozentrum has been led by a chair. In 2009, the position was changed to director. The following persons have occupied this position: 
This biographical article related to the military of Portugal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
  The California Australian Football League (CAFL) was the first organized league of Australian rules football in the United States of America, and is in itself a member of the United States Australian Football League.  Wayne Pollock served as the CAFL's first head.  The current president is Chris Olson. 
In 2005, the league went into indefinite stasis with clubs participating in either the newly formed Metro Footy league the Southern California Australian Football League and the US Footy Nationals. 
Like other cavefish, it is depigmented and has no visible eyes. This species coexists with another hypogean (underground-living) loach, Schistura oedipus. The species is specialized for fast subterranean flowing water in the deeper zone of the cave (more than 500m from the entrance). It depends on cave microorganisms and organic matter, and is very sensitive to disturbance, water quality and hydrographic change. 
In 2016 it was reported that the waterfall climbing cave fish walks with a tetrapod-like diagonal-couplets lateral sequence gait, displaying a robust pelvic girdle attached to the vertebral column. 
Sedgefield was a non-metropolitan district in County Durham, England. It was abolished on 1 April 2009 and replaced by Durham County Council. 
Since the first election to the council in 1973 political control of the council has been held by the following parties: 
This article about a member of the Christian clergy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
With a running time of 107 minutes, it was released in a limited theatrical engagement as well as on video-on-demand by Cinedigm on February 3, 2017. 
Fascinated by the root causes of violent behavior, globally renowned psychologist Dr. Amanda Tyler has an opportunity to interview and analyze death row inmate Jackson Shea. As the interview commences with Jackson's fate hanging in the balance, Amanda must determine whether or not a stay of execution should be granted. 
It is located in the mitochondrion and Frataxin mRNA is mostly expressed in tissues with a high metabolic rate. The function of frataxin is not clear but it is involved in assembly of iron-sulfur clusters. It has been proposed to act as either an iron chaperone or an iron storage protein. Reduced expression of frataxin is the cause of Friedreich's ataxia.  
Like most mitochondrial proteins, frataxin is synthesized in cytoplasmic ribosomes as large precursor molecules with mitochondrial targeting sequences.  Upon entry into mitochondria, the molecules are broken down by a proteolytic reaction to yield mature frataxin. 
Frataxin is localized to the mitochondrion. The function of frataxin is not entirely clear, but it seems to be involved in assembly of iron-sulfur clusters. It has been proposed to act as either an iron chaperone or an iron storage protein. 
FRDA is characterized by ataxia, sensory loss, and cardiomyopathy.  The reason frataxin deficiency causes these symptoms is not entirely clear.  On a cellular level, it is linked to iron accumulation in the mitochondria and increased oxidant sensitivity.  For reasons that are not well understood, this primarily affects the tissue of the dorsal root ganglia, cerebellum, and heart muscle. 
An overexpression of frataxin in Drosophila has shown an increase in antioxidant capability, resistance to oxidative stress insults and longevity, supporting the theory that the role of frataxin is to protect the mitochondria from oxidative stress and the ensuing cellular damage. 
1ly7: The solution structure of the c-terminal domain of frataxin, the protein responsible for friedreich ataxia 
Warner Brothers art director and interior decorator to the stars Harold Grieve acquired a number of works by the artist and championed the artist's work to his clients.  Noted film directors Ernst Lubitsch and Alfred Hitchcock, costume designer Edith Head, screenwriter Jo Swerling, and actors Charles Laughton, Gary Cooper, James Stewart, and Beulah Bondi, among others, were collectors. 
Staggia Senese is a village in Tuscany, central Italy, administratively a frazione of the comune of Poggibonsi, province of Siena. At the time of the 2001 census its population was 2,129. 
The Sierra de Tejeda is in the central section of the Betic Range of Southern Spain. This part of the Betic cordilla has folds verging southwards from the Burdigalian age. The folds are cut by WSW-directed faults caused by extensional detachments in the Sierra de Tejeda anticline, and the fault surfaces are in turn cut by later NNW-directed faults from the Tortonian age. 
Kovacsics made her international debut on 22 September 2009 against Germany. She represented Hungary on five World Championship (2009, 2013, 2015, 2017, 2019) and also participated on five European Championship (2010, 2012, 2014, 2018, 2020). 
This biographical article related to Hungarian team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Felix Kolawole Salako (1961 -) Professor of Soil Science  Current Vice-Chancellor, Federal University of Agriculture, Abeokuta (FUNAAB)  
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a midfielder born in the 1960s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
  The station was formerly called Bathing Beach or Traeth Mawr briefly in the 1980s.  Passengers can break their journey here to enjoy Fairbourne's long sandy beaches, Penrhyn amusements and the children's playground. 
He has signed a two-book contract with Penguin India and the first book has been titled Paperback Dreams. 
He was born and brought up in Jalandhar, a small town in Punjab. His keen interest in film, drama and literature drove him to writing after he graduated as an architect attaining a thorough knowledge of Fine Arts and Design apart from Architecture. His first book was a huge nationwide success and within months after the release of the book, he was considered among the top-selling contemporary Indian authors. 
Retinoscopy (Ret) is a technique to obtain an objective measurement of the refractive error of a patient's eyes. The examiner uses a retinoscope to shine light into the patient's eye and observes the reflection (reflex) off the patient's retina. While moving the streak or spot of light across the pupil the examiner observes the relative movement of the reflex or manually places lenses over the eye (using a trial frame and trial lenses) to "neutralize" the reflex. 
Static retinoscopy is performed when the patient has relaxed accommodative status.  This can be obtained by the patient viewing a distance target or by the use of cycloplegic drugs (where, for example, a child's lack of reliable fixation of the target can lead to fluctuations in accommodation and thus the results obtained).  Dynamic retinoscopy is performed when the patient has active accommodation from viewing a near target. 
Retinoscopy is particularly useful in prescribing corrective lenses for patients who are unable to undergo a subjective refraction that requires a judgement and response from the patient (such as children or those with severe intellectual disabilities or communication problems). In most tests however, it is used as a basis for further refinement by subjective refraction.  It is also used to evaluate accommodative ability of the eye and detect latent hyperopia. 
Murari earned a Masters in Physics at Patna University and then, feeling that his background in physics would be useful in cinema, he obtained a Masters in Cinema in 1947 from the University of Southern California, Los Angeles. His first Hollywood internship was on Orson Welles' film, Macbeth. He returned to India early the next year and joined the Films Division as a deputy director just a few months after its creation. He then become a director, and then assistant producer. 
Murari taught courses in documentary filmmaking and film direction, among other subjects as teaching Principal. He was very popular for his polite, kind-hearted nature and his dedication to his students. According to Subhash Ghai, he was "a thorough gentleman who cared for his students" and constantly strove to "reinvent teaching methods in filmmaking at FTII." 
In 1972, he returned to the Films Division, where he produced more films. His film Homi Bhabha - A Scientist in Action won the National Film Award in the Experimental Category in 1973. Another film from this period, Lost Child, based on the story by the well-known Indian writer Mulk Raj Anand, also won recognition.[citation needed] 
Murari died on 13 April 2007 at the age of 85 after battling cancer. He is survived by his wife Lakshmi Murari, three sons, Ashok, Anoop and Vivek, and a daughter, Radha Chadha. 
1957: High Commendation Certificate at the Seventh World Congress of the International Society for the Welfare of Cripples at London 
He won the first President's Gold Medal in 1954 for his 1952 documentary film Mahabalipuram. He also won several other national awards and international acclaim at festivals in Berlin, Venice, Edinburgh, San Francisco and Cannes. 
Magnolfi was awarded a medal for his efforts supporting the orphans. In the third Congress of Scientists, (1841) held in Florence, the innovation of this technological orphanage were praised by Enrico Mayer, a pedagogist and fellow philanthropist from Livorno, as a model for such institutions. 
Magnolfi also helped found a Cassa di Risparmio in Prato, a bank which allocated loans to small businesses and craftsmen. Magnolfi helped fund the railway line (1848) connecting Florence, Prato, and Pistoia. 
Magnolfi was buried at a chapel built in his orphanage, designed by Fortunato Rocchi, instructor of design at the institute, and frescoed by Eustachio Turchini, containing a bas-relief donated by the Ginori porcelain company, and a sculpted monument by Vincenzio Chilleri with a bust by Egisto Giampaoli, a pupil of Dupre. 
Boston Blackie's Little Pal is a 1918 American silent drama film, directed by E. Mason Hopper. It stars Bert Lytell, Rhea Mitchell, and Rosemary Theby, and was released on August 26, 1918. 
Blackie, through a series of telegrams, appeals to the maternal instincts of Mrs. Wilmerding, getting her to reconcile with her husband. That job complete, Blackie debates about whether or not to return the jewels. 
Exhibitors Herald gave the film a very positive review, ranking the overall production "very good", and the story and star as "excellent". They extolled Lytell's performance in what they called a "unique role", and highlighted the work of his supporting cast, including Rhea Mitchell, Rosemary Theby, Frank Whitson, and Howard Davies. They called the cinematography "perfect". 
The 2017 Bahrain FIA Formula 2 round was a pair of motor races held on 15 and 16 April 2017 at the Bahrain International Circuit in Sakhir, Bahrain as part of the FIA Formula 2 Championship. It was the first round of the 2017 FIA Formula 2 Championship and was run in support of the 2017 Bahrain Grand Prix. 
Following the 2016 GP2 Series, the championship was renamed the FIA Formula 2 Championship. The feature race was won by Artem Markelov whilst the sprint race was won by rookie Charles Leclerc. 
Other penalties from the qualifying session included Sean Gelael, Sergio Canamasas and Stefano Coletti, all of whom failed to slow sufficiently for the VSC. 
Leclerc leaped off the line, into an early lead with Norman Nato in hot pursuit. De Vries wasted his front row start and dropped down to fourth, while Markelov moved into the top three. After a few laps, Nato's persistence led to a pass into turn one, giving Nato the lead. A couple laps later, Nato's pace started to decline and Leclerc would retake the lead; all the while, Markelov being the watching brief. 
Meanwhile, further down the field, Jordan King passed Oliver Rowland to take fourth place, whilst the battle for sixth saw Alexander Albon pass Nyck de Vries, who by this stage was falling down the order rapidly due to seriously-degraded tyres. Luca Ghiotto and Nobuharu Matsushita finished in seventh and eight respectively, giving both a front row start for the sprint race. 
With the tremendous pace and fantastic tyre management, Markelov took the first win of the 2017 FIA Formula 2 Championship and cemented his campaign for the championship. 
Charles Leclerc won a thrilling sprint race, despite pitting for fresh tyres earlier in the race. The Monegasque driver started from sixth on the grid and promptly drove to the front to grab an early lead. Despite the early lead, Prema decided to adopt a one-stop strategy seeing as how tyre management was an issue for both Prema drivers. 
With this victory, Leclerc left the round in the lead of the championship and whilst Prema didn't leave with the lead of the team's championship, they had clearly demonstrated that they were, once again, the team to beat. 
The incident occurred when 12 members of the IWW were convicted by Judge T. D. Evans. Evidence is divided on whether the resultant $100 fines were for vagrancy or failure to own a Liberty Bond, which violated no law.  
Judge Evans also convicted five men who, though they were not members of the IWW, were witnesses for the defense.  After sentencing, the police rounded up the 17 men and delivered them into the custody of the black-robed Knights of Liberty, a short-lived local group. 
The Knights of Liberty abducted the men at gunpoint and drove them to a deserted location west of town. The men were then, one by one, bound to a tree, whipped, then tarred and feathered. 
Rolnik is arguably the most influential business and economics journalist in Israel, promoting open, competitive markets with strong social safety net and is considered a leader in the fight against corruption. 
Rolnik and TheMarker led an informative campaign to introduce competition in the mobile telephony market, that was dominated by 3 companies. As a result, prices dropped by 50% to 90% when competition was enforced without any material loss of employment in the labor market. 
Rolnik is a Clinical Associate Professor at the University of Chicago Booth School of Business. He teaches courses on economic policy, media and regulation in Chicago, Tel Aviv University and the Interdisciplinary Center Herzliya. 
Rolnik has a BA degree in Economics from Tel Aviv University (July 1996) and an MBA from the Tel Aviv and Northwestern University's Kellogg-Recanati program (July 1998). Rolnik attended Harvard University's Advanced Management Program (AMP; Nov 2003) and its Advanced Leadership Initiative (2014). 
Rolnik became a reporter in the Israeli army at the age of 18, later the economic reporter and later editor for the army radio station. Immediately after his military service he joined Haa'aretz, and at the age of 24 became the editor and head of the financial markets section. 4 years later he joined the editorial board of the newspaper. 
In 1999 Rolnik founded and led financial news company TheMarker. 6 years later he sold his shares to Ha'aretz and became its deputy publisher. He led the editorial and business operations of TheMarker for 13 years as Editor-in-Chief. 
In December 2013 Rolnik won the Israeli journalism Sokolov Prize for founding TheMarker, changing Israeli Media, changing public discourse in Israel and influencing the government and legislators to undertake significant changes in the structure of the Israeli economy. 
Rolnik supports open and competitive markets and points out to failures in the private and public of the Israeli economy. He led a series of informative journalistic campaigns, mainly regarding structural reforms, fostering of competition and reducing concentration in the business and capital sectors. 
In 2014 Rolnik was teaching a course in the Faculty of Management at Tel Aviv University entitled the "Structural Issues in the Israeli Economy." 
In January 2008 Rolnik was awarded a "quality of economic journalism" prize by Israel's Society for the Public's Right to Know. In its explanatory notes, the organization wrote that "Rolnik is one of the best business journalists and commentators in Israel today. In his clear and challenging writings, Rolnik demonstrates civilian courage of the first degree and does not refrain even from writing about, and even attacking, influential elements in the Israeli economy". 
In December 2012 Rolnik was acknowledged by the Kinneret College for fighting  the concentration of economic power and for his continued support of the July 2011 social protests. In its statement, the college said that Rolnik "succeeded in creating an outstanding newspaper within a few years, constantly guiding its readers in the complex local and global economic and social environment and encouraging the adoption of social change". 
In March 2011 Daniel Doron, the director of the Israel Center for Social and Economic Progress, wrote in The Jerusalem Post: "The strong bond between government and capital that developed here has a third partner, the media. Until recently, when Yisrael Hayom broke the mold, the media were a duopoly owned by the tycoons, and protected them (with the noble exception of TheMarker and its valiant editor Guy Rolnik, who, at great cost, leads the struggle against excess media concentration)". 
In December 2011 Raviv Drucker, anchor of television Channel 10 investigative program "The Source", said he "identifies" with Rolnik's fight against tycoons and added that "Rolnik and TheMarker created, with their own hands", the government-appointed committee that dealt with the concentration of economic power. "It is thanks to them", he said, "that we found out the extent to which our capital and debt markets sometimes resemble a close-knit circle of cronies." 
This biographical article relating to Polish athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The name of the settlement literally means 'creek, stream'. Warm Creek (Slovene: Topli potok), a tributary of the Kolpa River, flows through the village. 
This article about the Municipality of Kostel in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Castle Combe Castle stood to the north of the village of Castle Combe, Wiltshire, England (grid reference ST839779). 
The castle was a medieval motte and bailey castle standing on a limestone spur overlooking the Bybrook River. It was probably built by Reginald de Dunstanville, 1st Earl of Cornwall in the 12th century and was unusual in that it had a keep with at least four and possibly five baileys. Earthworks and some stonework remain. 
Since 1981 the site has been a scheduled ancient monument and is described in the National Heritage List for England as "Motte and bailey castle 600m north of Castle Combe". 
Center Township is one of the eighteen townships of Monroe County, Ohio, United States. As of the 2010 census, the population was 3,647, including 2,384 living in the village of Woodsfield. 
The village of Woodsfield, the county seat of Monroe County, is located in northern Center Township. 
The best-known species is the Parktown prawn, not to be confused with the well-known Koringkrieke or armoured ground crickets, which never have been in the family Anostostomatidae. 
Henicus monstrosus is a nocturnal anostostomatid. The males are unusual in their anatomy; their heads are disproportionately large and bear forward-directed prongs. They have extremely long, curved mandibles that are functional, but seem to play no part in the eating process. 
The company was founded in 1885 in San Francisco as a partnership between two young Europeans; a German, John Stauffer Sr., and a Frenchman, Christian de Guigne. Ships exporting wheat to Europe used stone from the chalk cliffs of Dover as ballast. This discarded ballast became the inexpensive raw material for the newly formed company. The company was incorporated by John Stauffer Sr., who died on March 4, 1940 at the age of 78. 
In 1931, the company announced plans for a new manufacturing subsidiary, the Pacific Hard Rubber Company. 
Hans Stauffer, nephew of founder John Stauffer Sr, who joined his uncle at Stauffer Chemicals in 1920 and who retired as president in 1967, died in 1986. 
In 1984, the company was accused by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission of overstating its 1982 and 1983 earnings through non-standard accounting. 
The company was in the headlines in the mid-1980s for selling its design for a chemical plant to make phosphorus trichloride to Krebs A.G., a Swiss company. The plant modeled after a Stauffer plant in Pennsylvania, was subsequently built by Krebs for El Nasr Pharmaceutical Company of Egypt. Phosphorus trichloride is well known for its dual use capacity as a starting material for pesticide products as well as Sarin. 
Van High School is a combined junior and senior High School in Van, West Virginia, serving the southwestern part of rural Boone County, West Virginia.  The school has a rivalry with Scott High School due to the threat of consolidation. When it comes to sports, one of their main rivals is Tug Valley. 
The school has only 116 students by the count of the WVSSAC and various consolidation ideas with Sherman High School and even into a unified county wide school have been floated.  The school is placed in class "A" for athletics. 
The school colors are blue and gold, and the mascot is the "Bulldog".  The school is among the smallest in the state to field a football team. 
Rowale is a small village in Ratnagiri district, Maharashtra state in Western India. The 2011 Census of India recorded a total of 453 residents in the village. Rowale's geographical area is 480 hectares (1,200 acres). 
The University of Novo Mesto (UNM, Slovene: Univerza v Novem mestu) is a private university in Slovenia. It is located in the town of Novo Mesto. 
Graham Dale, born January 1978 in Dublin, Ireland, is a former US Marine, later a network engineer and writer. 
Dale was born in Raheny, Dublin, Ireland. He emigrated to the United States in 2000. He served with the US Marine Corp., including in Iraq.  As a result of his trauma in Iraq, Dale is registered as suffering with PTSD and receives disability benefit associated with his disorder.[citation needed] 
As of 2019 he resides in Cedar Park, Texas where he works as a computer network engineer. He is also an active Volunteer Firefighter and EMT with the Jollyville fire department in Austin, Texas. 
Xenohammus quadriplagiatus is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1938. It is known from Laos. 
Sayyid Mohammed Taqi al-Khoei was a brother of Abdul Majid al-Khoei and son of Ayatollah Al-Udhma Sayyid Abul Qasim al-Khoei. 
The Shvetsov M-71 was a Soviet radial engine built in small numbers during World War II. It was derived from the Shvetsov M-25, which was a license-built copy of the American Wright R-1820-F3 Cyclone engine. 
Hyde was the son of Sir Lawrence Hyde, of Heale, Woodford, near Salisbury, Wiltshire. He was the brother of Robert Hyde and Alexander Hyde, and cousin of Edward Hyde, 1st Earl of Clarendon. He was a student of Middle Temple in 1608 and matriculated at Magdalen Hall, Oxford on 9 March 1610, aged 16, then was awarded BA on 19 July 1612. 
In 1624, Hyde was elected Member of Parliament for Hindon. He was re-elected for Hindon in 1628 and sat until 1629 when King Charles decided to rule without parliament for eleven years. 
Hyde died in 1643 and was buried on 3 December 1643. He was married in 1619 to Amphillis, daughter of Sir Richard Tichborne of Winchester; she died in 1632. Secondly to Katherine, who outlived him. In October 1651 she gave shelter to the future Charles II at Heale House during his flight after the Battle of Worcester. 
Lemerle's dwarf hippopotamus (Hippopotamus lemerlei) is an extinct species of Malagasy hippopotamus. 
Malagasy hippopotamuses were first discovered in the mid-19th century by Alfred Grandidier, who unearthed nearly 50 individual hippos from a dried-up swamp at Ambolisaka near Lake Ihotry, a few miles from the Mozambique Channel. In 1989, Scandinavian palaeontologist Solweig Stuenes described H. madagascariensis and H. lemerlei from these bones. 
It may have descended from full-sized hippos who shrunk due to insular dwarfism, similar to many Mediterranean island hippos, such as with the Cretan dwarf hippopotamus or the Cyprus dwarf hippopotamus. 
Hippopotamus lemerlei bones have been mostly discovered in the rivers and lakes (riparian environments) of western Madagascar, suggesting a habitat very similar to that of the modern hippo of modern Africa. H. lemerlei also shared the high-placed eyes that make it easier to see while submerged. 
Hippopotamus lemerlei and contemporary Aldabrachelys tortoises were the dominant grazers in Madagascar. Malagasy hippos in general, however, were less grass-specialised than the mainland African hippo. 
At least seven hippopotamus bones show unequivocal signs of butchery, suggesting that they survived until humans arrived on Madagascar, perhaps coexisting with humans for about 2,000 years. It is also possible that over-hunting by humans led to their extinction. 
"The Car" is a song written by Gary Heyde and C. Michael Spriggs, and recorded by American country music artist Jeff Carson.  It was released in October 1995 as the third single from his debut album Jeff Carson.  The song reached number three on the Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks chart in December 1995. 
The song is a ballad about a relationship between the narrator and his father. In the first verse, the narrator expresses desire for a Ford Mustang, but cannot get one due to his father being busy with work. The son nonetheless wants the car because it will offer "a chance to be with him". 
In the second verse, the narrator says that he has let go of his dream of having a Mustang until he gets word that his father has died. He also finds that the father has left a note for him along with a set of keys for a Mustang. In the final chorus, the narrator states that "there will always be a part of us together in that car". 
A review in Billboard was positive, praising Carson's "warm, affecting voice" while calling it "one of the most powerfully moving songs released this year." 
"The Car" debuted at number 64 on the U.S. Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks for the week of October 7, 1995. 
De Rossi is the highest scoring midfielder for the Italian national side post-World War II, with 21 goals in 117 international appearances, and the all-time second highest-scoring midfielder for Italy, behind only Adolfo Baloncieri. He is also the fourth-most capped player for the Italian national team. 
De Rossi was chosen as a Pringles spokesperson for Euro 2008, along with other top European football players such as Thierry Henry, Fernando Torres, Alexander Frei, Philipp Lahm and Michael Owen. He also appears in an Adidas "Dream Big" Commercial along with Steven Gerrard, Michael Ballack and David Beckham. 
De Rossi is featured on the cover of the Italian edition of EA Sports' FIFA 09 video game. The picture on the cover is taken from De Rossi's emphatic goal-scoring celebration after scoring against Internazionale in the Supercoppa Italiana in 2008. 
De Rossi has a tattoo on his leg of a mocked-up triangular "hazard" sign of a tackle being performed, reflecting his tough-tackling reputation. 
On 26 December 2015, De Rossi married his partner, English-born Italian actress and model Sarah Felberbaum, in a private ceremony in the Maldives; the couple had been in a relationship since 2011, and have a daughter together, Olivia Rose, born on 14 February 2014, and a son together, Noah, born on 3 September 2016. 
In March 2016, he put his 